VOL. II.1
PREDICTION.
In
the year 1812, shortly after the declaration of
war with Great Britain, I made an excursion, partly
on business, partly of pleasure, into that beautiful
and romantic section of Pennsylvania, which lies
along its north-eastern boundary. One morning,
while pursuing my journey, I heard at a distance
the sound of martial music, which gradually became
more distinct as I ascended the Blue Ridge, and
seemed to proceed from a humble village, situated
in the deep valley beneath, on the bank of the
Delaware
.
Nothing could exceed the splendour of the
scene that lay below. The sun was just rising; his
first beams were gradually stealing through the break
or gap in the distant mountains, which seems to have
been burst open by the force of the torrent; and as
they gilded the dark green foliage of the wilderness,
presented a view which might well awaken the genius
of art, and the speculations of science, but was far
too pure to be estimated by those, whose taste had
been corrupted by admiration of the feeble skill of
man.
There are indeed throughout the globe various
features which the most plausible theories are scarce
sufficient to account for, and among them may truly
be classed that to which we have alluded, where the
Delaware has cut its way through the rugged bosom
of the Kittatinny mountain. The scene is indeed
sublime, and while raising the eye from the surface
of the water to the blue summit of the ridge, a
perpendicular
height of twelve hundred and fifty feet,
the question forcibly occurs, was this wonderful
work the effect of an inward convulsion of nature,
or was it occasioned by the irresistible pressure of
water, ages before the European dreamed of the
existence of a western world?
After gazing and reflecting for some time on the
wonders of nature, thus suddenly spread before me,
I resumed my journey. The music which still
continued
,
proceeded, as I found, from a band of
soldiers
drawn up in the main street of the village,
surrounded by their friends and families, who had
evidently assembled for the purpose of taking a
melancholy
farewell. I descended the mountain by
the circuitous path, and rode up to the inn before
which the crowd had gathered, but they were all too
busily engaged with their own feelings to notice the
arrival of a stranger. Wives were listening to the
last injunction of their husbands, the widowed
mother
to the voice of her valued son, the prop of her
declining years, and many a bashful maiden lent her
ear to the protestations of eternal affection which,
at that time, sounded tenfold sweeter as they flowed
from the lips of the warlike lover. The shrill fife
was playing, the drum beating, and amid the jargon
of voices, the corporal was heard swearing like a
trooper, in order to keep up the dignity of his
station
.
The little bandy-legged drummer beat with
uncommon earnestness: it was uncalled for at the
time, and I was at a loss to account for his making
such a deafening noise, when I perceived a shrewish
looking beldame at his elbow, whose shrill voice
satisfied me that he would find comparative
tranquillity
in the field of battle, to being within its
appalling
influence. The fifer, out of compassion, lent
the aid of his shrill music to relieve his friend from
this last unpleasant lecture.
Removed from the crowd, I observed a young
man, an officer of the corps, in conversation with a
young woman, who did not strive to conceal her
sorrow
on the occasion. Health, beauty, and
innocence
were strongly depicted in her countenance,
and her rustic garb concealed a form, even thus
decorated
,
far more attractive than many who move for
a season the constellation of a ball-room, and
imagine
they have attained the extent of worldly
ambition
.
The young man's face was animated, yet, in
the enthusiasm of the moment, he could not conceal
the sadness of his heart, while gazing on the lovely
being standing in tears beside him; the order was
given to march; he embraced her, imprinted a
fervent
kiss upon her pale forehead, placed her in the
arms of an aged woman, who stood hard by, and
hurried to the ranks. The soldiers left the village,
followed by a troop of little urchins, who were either
pleased with the parade, or were desirous of
prolonging
the melancholy moment of separating from
a parent or brother. The women remained in the
street watching them as they slowly ascended the
mountain path until they were out of sight, and then
returned to their lonely cottages: one only lingered
on the spot until the last sound of the distant drum
was no longer repeated by the echo of the
mountains
.
I inquired of the innkeeper concerning the young
woman just mentioned, who informed me that her
name was Lucy Gray, the only child of a poor
widow, who in former days had been in more
prosperous
circumstances: that she had been betrothed
to Hugh Cameron, the young soldier, from their
childhood, and that their nuptials were to have been
celebrated in a few weeks, but as he was draughted
for the frontiers, prudence obliged them to
postpone
the ceremony until the campaign should be
over.
Mine host was as loquacious as most village
landlords
,
and as he was familiar with the life, birth, and
parentage of every individual in the village, it was
not long before I received a full account of the young
officer, who, to use the narrator's own words, had
gained the good will of all the gray heads and green
hearts on that side of the Blue Mountain.
Hugh Cameron had been protected from his
infancy
by his grandmother, who was a native of the
Highlands of Scotland, and whose mind was strongly
imbued with the numerous superstitions of the
uneducated
of her country. He was the child of her
only daughter, who had fallen a victim to unlimited
confidence in him she loved, and finally expiated
her offence by a broken heart. Hugh soon learnt
the history of his mother's shame from his playmates,
who, upon the slightest offence, would remind him
of it, in derision, for man appears determined most
religiously to adhere to the law, as laid down in
Deuteronomy, where it is written, that the
unfortunate
in birth, even to his tenth generation, shall
not enter into the congregation of the Lord.
The taunts of his school-mates, preyed upon the
mind of the boy; he avoided them and sought
seclusion
.
What time was allowed from study, was
passed in the deepest recesses of the mountain, or
on the giddy precipice, where the eagle made his
eyry. Often was he seen by the astonished villagers,
apparently hanging in mid air, by some projecting
rock, hitherto untrodden by mortal foot, shouting
with joy at the affrighted birds of prey, as they wildly
dashed in circling flight around his head. They had
nothing to fear from the approach of the daring boy,
for his was not a heart wantonly to inflict a wound
upon the humblest of God's creatures. His feelings
were acute, and his imagination vivid. For hours
he would listen to the tales of his grandmother, of
warlocks, witchcraft, omens, and prognostics of
death. With her, not a breeze agitated the woods
or the river; not a drop of rain fell, nor an insect
moved, but for a special purpose. He never became
weary of listening to her, nor she of relating the
wonderful legends with which her mind was stored.
The village schoolmaster was also every way
calculated
to give a freshness of colouring to the rude
narratives of the old crone, and increase their
fascination
1*
with the semblance of reality. He had lived
long and seen much of the world: a Hungarian, a
classical scholar, and fond of that lore which too
frequently
destroys the worldly hopes, and enervates
the mind of the possessor. He fed on thriftless
verse until his mind sickened at the realities of life.
His reading had been various and profound, but that
which was speculative and visionary, possessed more
charms for his mind, than that which partook of
earthly matter. He was an accomplished musician,
and many a time at midnight was his solitary flute
heard in the deep recesses of the mountain, and on
the surface of the river.
He was an isolated man, and imagined no earthly
being possessed a feeling in unison with his own.
When he discovered the wildness and delicate
texture
of his pupil's mind, they became almost
inseparable
companions. The youth improved rapidly
under his guidance, not only in literature and music,
but in the facility of creating theories, which, at the
time they expanded and enlarged his mind, involved
it in an ocean of difficulty and doubt, without a
compass
to guide it to a haven.
With years the feelings of the youth became more
sensibly alive to the charms of nature. For hours
he would contemplate the rolling river, and as wave
succeeded wave, the Hungarian would discover some
analogy to human life, which served to illustrate his
visionary theories. The hollow moan of the forest,
at midnight, which foretold the coming storm, was
music to their ears, and those hours which the
wearied villagers devoted to repose, were passed by
the old man and his pupil in gazing at the stars.
The Hungarian fancied he had ascertained the star
of his nativity, and for years whenever visible, he
regularly rose at the hour of twelve, to note its
station
in the heavens. He had made his calculations
and predicted the day of his death. He
communicated
the time to his pupil, who, though a convert
to his opinions, and fearful that the prediction would
be verified, treated it lightly, and endeavoured to
remove the impression from his mind. The attempt
was fruitless. The night preceding his death, at
the hour of twelve, he called at Hugh Cameron's
cottage, awoke him, and they proceeded to the
grave-yard
together in silence, for the Hungarian's mind
was so engrossed with thought, that Hugh did not
venture to break the chain of reflection.
They paused beneath the tall cypress that stood
in the eastern corner of the yard: the old man
examined
the position of the star upon whose
movements
he said depended his destiny, and then
turning
to his companion, added
It is a weakness to feel any concern about the
disposition of the body when life is extinct, for though
the dust of which this frail tenement is composed,
be scattered to the four corners of the earth, there
is that magnetism inseparable from each particle
which at one day will cause re-union; yet it is
natural
that the mind at parting from the body, should
feel some interest in its future destiny, and I have
often marked spots where I fancied the sleep of the
dead would be more undisturbed than in others; and
this is one of them. I make but one request; when
the few sands which yet linger of my life are run,
see that my remains be decently interred beneath
the cypress tree. This is all I ask of you in this
world.
Hugh replied that he hoped he would live long to
command many a service of a less melancholy
nature
.
The old man continued in a solemn tone: Do you
see that star; it is already low in the west, and its
rays are fitful and feeble. When the first gray light
of the morning shall have extinguished it, my light
will also be extinguished. I have predicted it for
years, and at this moment there are too many omens
concurring to leave a doubt of the accuracy of my
calculation. At times the mind is so delicately
attuned
as to shrink instinctively from unseen
approaching
danger, without the slightest sound or
touch to communicate it to the outward senses, and
such is the present state of my feelings. My life
has been a long one; not altogether unprofitably, and
I humbly trust, harmlessly spent. `My basket and
my store' are not quite empty, and to you I bequeath
the gleanings of my life. Among my papers you
will find one to this effect. I have not much to leave,
but what little there is will be of consequence to one
whose mind is constituted like yours. He struck
his cane into the earth, and added: Remember this
spot, Hugh Cameron; here let my head lie. Come,
my last request is made.
He left his stick where he had planted it, and they
returned in silence to the village. When they came
in front of Hugh's cottage, they parted. It was a
parting under a full conviction of meeting no more
in this world. Much time elapsed before Cameron
could compose his troubled mind to sleep, and when
finally exhausted, he slumbered in a state of
unconsciousness
.
He arose about two hours after the sun,
and hurried towards the residence of his friend. His
heart felt like a lump of lead in his bosom, as he
discovered
at a distance the shutters of his chamber
window bowed. The chamber was on the ground
floor of the cottage, and opened into a little
flower-garden
,
the cultivation of which, was the
Hungarian's
chief delight. He was curious in flowers, and
had acquired the art of varying their colours by the
application of minerals to the root. Hugh crossed
the garden, and with trembling hands, pulled open
the shutters. He stood for a moment transfixed
with grief, then shrunk from the sight that presented
itself.
On a broad board supported by chairs, lay the
mortal remains of his friend, already clad in the
garments
of the grave. He silently closed the window,
and on entering the house, learnt, that as the
Hungarian
had not appeared at his usual hour of rising,
the family had entered the room, apprehensive that
he was ill, and discovered him lying in bed, his body
already stiff and cold. Upon a small table, near the
head of the bed, a lamp was still burning, though
broad daylight, and his clenched hands still held his
bible, which rested upon his bosom; the book still
open at the page he was last reading. Every
circumstance
proved that his death was as calm as the
sleep of the spotless infant. He was buried in the
place pointed out the preceding night, and all the
villagers from infancy to age, followed him in
sorrow
to the grave. On examining his papers his will
was found, in which he bequeathed his little
possessions
exclusively to his pupil, Hugh Cameron.
This is briefly the substance of the prolix
narrative
of mine host. My horse being refreshed, I
mounted and pursued my journey, reflecting upon
how frail a thread human happiness depends. As I
passed along the street, all was silent and dejected;
not even a dog stirred to bark at me, but as the
village
gradually receded from my view, other thoughts
engrossed my mind, and the lovely Lucy Gray and
her sorrows were forgotten.
Shortly after the peace, business obliged me to
take a similar journey. The sun was about setting
as I found myself upon the summit of the Blue
Mountain, and the welcome village in the deep
valley
,
again presented itself. My jaded horse
leisurely
descended, carefully kicking every stone out
of the way that lay in his rugged path. When half
way down the height, I paused to rest the weary
animal
.
A young woman suddenly emerged from a
cluster of blooming laurels and wild honey suckles,
which grew round the base of a large projecting rock.
Her dark hair was luxuriant, and bound with
neatness
and simplicity; her face lovely and blooming,
yet slightly overcast with sadness, and the matchless
symmetry of her small and elastic frame, was
heightened
by the uncommon neatness of her rustic
apparel
.
On one arm hung a basket, well stored with
rich and various mountain flowers, while the other
was extended, to assist a young man to rise who was
seated at a short distance from the rock, and upon
whose enfeebled frame the hand of death pressed
heavily. He was a cripple, deprived of his right
arm, and his manly forehead was disfigured by a
wound. He rose with difficulty, and stood silent;
absorbed in thought.
I fear, said Lucy, for it was the widow's child,
we have extended our walk too far. The mountain
path was too rugged for you yet. You are fatigued,
but in a few weeks you will be strong enough to
revisit
the haunt you loved so when a boy.
No, Lucy, no, he replied in a hollow,
tremulous
voice, I shall never again clamber to the
rugged
brow of yonder ridge, upon which the beams of
the setting sun are now dancing. It would give a
new impulse to my heart to be for a moment there,
and the flagging stream of life would flow more
freely
;
but I shall never again gaze on the setting sun
from that loved spot; never again listen to the roar
of the torrent that dashes down that precipice.
They disappeared behind the rock and struck into
another path; I urged my horse forward, and as I
descended, the drowsy tinkling of bells was heard,
as the sheep-boy, whistling, leisurely followed his
charge to the fold. The village boys were driving
the herds to water; some were paddling the light
canoe across the river, while others, more idle, were
busied with their childish sports upon the lawn.
Several women were at work with their wash-tubs on
the bank, and, as I drew nigh, a momentary
cessation
from labour ensued. One of them in particular
was calculated to attract notice. She was tall and
meagre; her visage was sharp, swarth, and wrinkled,
and every line of it denoted that the family into
which it was the fate of Socrates to wed, had not
become
extinct even to the present age. My eyes
were turned upon her, and I recognised her
countenance
.
I accosted her, and she no sooner gave loose
to her inharmonious tongue, than my doubts
vanished
.
It was impossible to forget the sound having
once heard it. It was the voice of the village shrew,
the bandy-legged drummer's wife.
And are you the stranger, she exclaimed,
drawing
her skinny arms from the suds in which they
were immersed, and placing them a kimbo, Are you
the stranger, who baited at our village years agone,
when our husbands and our sons were marching to
the wars in the Canadas?
I am the same.
Well my old eyes have not failed me yet, in
spite of all my sorrow. That was a woeful day to
many of us, and many a woeful day did it bring after
it. I inquired after the fate of her husband. Good
man, she continued, he has gone to a more
peaceful
world than this. He was a hard-working man,
and well to do, and never wronged another of the
value of that suds, and that is more than some can
say that ride in their gilt coaches. But he is now
gone where honesty will turn to better account, than
all the gold and dross of this world. If he were but
back again, I should not be slaving here like a galley
slave as I am, to find bread for his poor dear orphan
boy. Gilbert! she cried in a shrill tone, and
continued
:
but I will train him up in the right path,
and he will not depart from it. Gilbert! she again
cried with increased energy. He is the comfort of
my age, the joy of my widowed heart. Gilbert, you
Gilbert, she shrieked, which way can the brat
have gone? She espied the luckless little ragged
urchin hard by, laughing aloud and wrestling with a
water dog, dripping wet from the river. I'll change
your note, you undutiful hound, take that, she
exclaimed
,
at the same time suiting the action to the
word. The boy made a hasty retreat, crying, and the
dog ran after him, barking, and rubbing his wet skin
on the green sward, in the fulness of joy, which can
hardly be attributable to the lad's misfortune.
I inquired of the virago how her husband, the
drummer, died.
Like a soldier on the frontiers. He was shot with
a musket ball, and fell by the side of Hugh
Cameron
,
who, Heaven bless him, was at the same time
maimed, and made a cripple for life. See, yon he
goes, leaning on the arm of Lucy Gray. Poor souls,
their only joy is to be together, but that joy will not
last long. I have lived a goodly time, and have seen
many, but never a pair like them. Their troth was
plighted before the wars; he loved Lucy more than
life, from the time he was a boy, and used to break
the hush of the mountains with the sound of his flute
at midnight, with him who now rests under the big
cypress tree. Yet when he found himself a cripple,
and unable to support his Lucy by the labour of his
hands, he sent a letter from the hospital where he
was lying, many a long mile from this, releasing
Lucy
from her vows, and making her quite free to
marry
another if she fancied him.
It was nobly done on his part: what answer
returned
Lucy?
She wrote to him, that as Hugh Cameron was no
longer able to work for Lucy Gray, she was able and
willing to work for Hugh Cameron. He no sooner
received the letter than he left the hospital, and
travelled
homewards, for he was impatient to see her
that he now loved more than ever. He travelled far
and fast, night and day, which brought on a fever,
and when he arrived at last, he looked like the
shadow
of what he was. He lay on his sick bed for
weeks; the fever was cured, but it left behind a
disease
which no medicine can cure.
Lucy and the invalid had by this time entered the
village; I felt a curiosity to see more of them, and
taking an abrupt leave of the loquacious widow, I
rode up to the inn, and was cordially welcomed by
my quondam host. I lost no time in directing my
steps towards the widow Gray's cottage: As I
approached
the unceasing hum of the widow's wheel
denoted that she was at her station. I entered, and
on making myself known as an early acquaintance
of her husband, she recognised me, though her
features
had escaped my memory. The room was
uncommonly
neat. The fragrance of the wild flowers,
culled by Lucy, was perceptible. They were placed
in water upon a bureau, in front of a looking glass,
in a well polished mahogany frame. Lucy and the
young soldier were in the garden. We passed into
it through the back door of the cottage, shaded by an
arbour, over which the vines were already gradually
stealing. The lovely girl was at the extremity of
the little garden, bending over a flower that required
her attention.
Every evening it is thus, said the widow,
whenever she can spare an hour from her labour,
she devotes it to the garden, and really the care she
takes adds much to the appearance of our dwelling.
Truly, I observed, her labour has not been
idly spent.
A blessing, continued the widow, appears to
attend all she does.
The invalid appeared intent upon what Lucy was
doing, but the praise which escaped the widow's
lips, did not escape him. He turned towards us and
said
True, mother, even the drooping narcissus
revives
at her touch, your aged heart grows glad in her
presence, and the weight of years is forgotten; nay,
even I dream of coming happiness when I see her
smile, but the narcissus will bloom only for a few
days longer, then wither and sink to the earth.
But the flower will revive again in spring, said
Lucy, more beautiful than at the time it faded.
All things look glad in spring, he continued,
the notes of the various birds are more melodious,
the buds burst forth, the mountain trees put on their
rich attire, the flowers of the valley dispense their
hidden fragrance, the ice-bound brook is freed from
its fetters, and every breeze is fresh with fragrance;
but I, amid this general revival, must fade and die
alone. I would the autumn were already arrived,
and the leaves were falling, for then to die would be
natural, and I should leave the world with less
regret
.
We returned to the cottage, and the widow
resumed
her station at the wheel, while Lucy prepared
the tea-table, which was covered with fine bleached
linen, which the widow mentioned with an air of
pride, was the product of her hands. The humble
VOL. II.2
meal was soon ready, and was eaten with
thankfulness
and delight by the cottagers; a joy unknown
to those who have not by their own labour first
produced
the sustenance of life.
The meal being over, the widow returned to her
wheel, and recounted the occurrences of former days,
until the sadness of the present was forgotten in the
remembrance of the past. The brow of the invalid
became more cheerful, and Lucy's spirits resumed
their natural buoyancy from the transient gleam of
sunshine that lit up the face of her lover. She sang.
Her voice was sweet, and there was a heart-thrilling
wildness in it, seldom to be found in those more
refined
and cultivated. It was powerful and
spirit-stirring
.
Hugh Cameron dwelt upon each note with
intense interest. His features became animated,
and he mingled his voice with her's. The widow
stopped her incessant wheel and lifted her head to
listen. The invalid suddenly raised his voice, and
cried, That note again, Lucy, that note again.
She repeated it with so full a tone, and so clearly,
that the glasses in the window, and on the cupboard,
vibrated with the sound.
Hush; that is the note, I know it well. Now
listen. He attempted to imitate the note, but he
failed, for his voice was too feeble. He then added,
Not yet, Lucy, not yet; my time is not come yet.
The cheerfulness of the poor girl was suddenly
changed to sadness; she ceased to sing; the widow's
countenance fell, and she resumed her labour in
silence.
The evening was now considerably advanced, and
I arose to take my departure. The invalid
accompanied
me towards the inn. I expressed my
curiosity
to know what he meant by his observation,
when he failed to imitate the note.
That, said he, was the note to which the
heavenly spheres were attuned, when concord
prevailed
throughout the creation; when the plan was
first set in motion, and God pronounced all good.
I looked at him with astonishment. He
continued
:
I have heard that note, at midnight, proceed
from the voice of my dog, as he howled beneath my
chamber window at the moon. It was ominous. I
have heard it in the voice of the screech-owl, while
perched on the large cypress tree in the
churchyard
;
I have heard it in the echoes of the
mountains
when I have shouted; in the howling of the
tempest, in the murmuring of the waters, and the
rustling of the trees; for every thing, animate and
inanimate, retains that sound, to which universal
harmony will again be attuned by the masterhand.
And when that sound proceeds from this voice, I
shall cease to think of earthly matters. I perceive
you doubt the truth of my theory. If you suspend
a piece of metal or glass by a thread, and strike the
note which lies dormant therein, upon a musical
instrument
,
you will draw it forth; the substance will
respond; and when the heavenly harps are attuned,
and their notes are permitted to extend to the
numberless
spheres, all created things, both animate and
inanimate, will join in the concord, the discordant
particles will be reconciled and all be harmony again.
All things partake of heaven. Even the daisy of the
valley and the wild flowers of the mountain, retain
and diffuse a portion of the aromatic atmosphere,
which prevails in purer regions than this. As we
approach death, the sense of smelling becomes more
acute and delicate; so much so, that I can already
discover in the flowers of the season, that fragrance
which belongs to this world, and that which is
ethereal
.
There are numberless omens in nature, which
warn the wise man of approaching change, and they
are not to be idly slighted. With these remarks
we arrived at the inn; he pressed my hand at
parting
,
and slowly retraced his steps to the widow's
cottage.
I arose early the succeeding morning, and
continued
my journey towards the border line of New
York. I was absent about two weeks from the
village
,
and it was a calm evening as I again
approached
it, through the valley formed by the Delaware.
Before the village appeared, I heard the solemn
tolling of a church bell, which grew louder and
fainter, as the breeze that swept up the valley rose
and died away. Every hill responded to the knell.
I quickened my pace, and as I drew nigh to the
village
,
it appeared quite deserted. I rode up to the
tavern, but my attentive host did not make his
appearance
.
I remained seated on my horse, with my
face towards the Blue Ridge. The winding road
which led across the mountain, though nearly
concealed
by the towering trees, was at intervals to be
seen, perfectly bare, from the village. A long
retinue
appeared crossing one of those interstices; it
moved slowly along, and was lost in the shades of
the forest. When the last had disappeared I
alighted
,
and discovered at a short distance a lad with
his eyes fixed intently on the spot, over which the
mournful train had passed. It was little Gilbert,
the drummer's child. I inquired the reason of the
village being deserted, and he sobbed, Hugh
Cameron
is dead, and they are now burying him where
he wished to be buried. The boy, still weeping,
led the way to the stable, and supplied the horse
with food.
What are the promises of this world! There was
a time when fancy whispered to Hugh Cameron,
the ceaseless hum of the widow's wheel would be
silenced; her chair would occupy the most
conspicuous
place around his fire-side, and clambering
on her knees would be seen, a little image of his
lovely Lucy. The dream was a joyous one, and
life is but a dream. He whose fancy can paint the
hopes of to-morrow in the most vivid colours, attains
the summit of all earthly bliss; for there is much,
very much in anticipation, but little, very little in
fruition.
In the evening I went to condole with the
mourners
.
Lucy had already retired, for her's was a
sorrow
to obtrude upon which, would add to its
poignancy
.
The day you left us, said the widow, the
departed
crossed the river with Lucy and little Gilbert.
They strolled up the cypress hollow until they
arrived
at his favourite retreat, where the torrent dashes
impetuously down the side of the mountain, and the
surrounding precipices send back numberless echoes.
He seated himself, and listened intently to the roar
of the waters. Not a sound escaped him, and every
note was tried by his ear. He stooped by the stream
where the water gurgled over its pebbly bed, and
discovered notes imperceptible to any ear less acute
than his own. A sudden gust of wind agitated the
tall pines; he stood erect, paused, and pointing to
the bending tops of the trees, exclaimed, `it is there
too, Lucy; even in that hollow moan of the monarch
of the forest I detect it.' He shouted, and the valley
rung with echo; he repeated it, listened to every
sound, and his face became animated as he caught
the faint return made by the most distant hill. His
dog raised his ears and barked. `It is there too,
Lucy,' he exclaimed, `even the voice of poor Carlo
is full of melody, and your voice, Lucy, even when
you first told me that you loved, sounded not so
musically, so heavenly sweet.' He directed
Gilbert
to gather for him the mountain honey-suckle,
the cypress branches, the laurel, and such flowers
and blossoms as were putting forth. The boy soon
came with his arms full, and laid them at the feet
of the invalid. `My sense of smelling,' he said,
`was never so acute. The fragrance arising from
these branches almost overpowers me. Yet I enjoy
it, and although widely different in their odours, I
can perceive a portion of the same subduing
fragrance
proceeding from each. Their colours are
more vivid, sounds are more distinct, and my touch
more sensible than formerly. These changes tell
me that I shall never visit this valley again.' He
rose from the rock upon which he was seated, took
Lucy by the arm, and proceeded towards the village
in silence. Carlo walked closely and dejectedly
by his master's side, and even the reckless Gilbert
did not venture to break the silence, until he had
2*
safely paddled them across the river, and was left
alone to secure the canoe.
From that day, continued the widow, he grew
worse, and it was evident to all that the dear boy
would not be long with us. The evening preceding
his death, he was lying on the bed, and Lucy and
myself were taking our solitary meal with little
appetite
,
for he who dispensed joy around our board,
was unable to take his wonted place. He turned
in his bed, and said in a voice scarcely above his
breath, `Mother, what time does the moon go down?'
I told him the hour, and inquired why he asked.
`Nothing,' he added, `only this, mother, say all you
have to say to me before the moon goes down.' His
voice was scarcely articulate. Lucy burst into
tears, and removed her chair to the head of his bed.
He perceived her grief, and pressing her hand to his
feverish lips, said, `Do not weep, Lucy, indeed I
have more cause to grieve than you, though my heart
feels little of sorrow at present.' She asked him
his cause of grief. `It is this, Lucy, that I cannot
repay your matchless love and unwearied care of
me. The poor girl's tears flowed afresh, and her
heart sobbed as if it would break. The evening was
spent in reading such passages of the scriptures to
him as he pointed out. His mind continued firm
and clear. About midnight he desired that the
casement
of the window might be thrown open. It
opened upon a full view of the river. The night
was sultry, and almost as bright as day. An owl
was hooting from the grave-yard, and the
whip-poor-will
was flying low and screaming. Poor Carlo
howled sorrowfully. The sounds did not escape the
notice of the dying man. Two or three canoes were
in the middle of the river, with a bright blazing fire
kindled in the stern of each. He said in a low
voice, `The villagers are preparing to spear the
salmon trout; then the moon must be nearly down.'
His bed lay beside the window, and he desired to
be removed to the extremity that he might look out
upon the sky. He did so. His face became
animated
,
and as we replaced him in his former
position
,
he said, `The works of God never before
appeared
to me so exquisitely beautiful;' and yet his
whole life had been passed in admiring the works of
God. He whispered to me, that it was time for us
to take our last farewell. My heart, in the course
of a long life, met only once with so trying a
moment
as that of parting with the boy; but my Lucy
my poor Lucy; I thought her heart would break
outright. He then desired the window to be closed;
the light to be removed into the next room, and not
to be disturbed. At a short distance, we listened
to the rattling in his throat, for about an hour, when
it suddenly ceased. Lucy imagined he slept, and
softly approached the bed. I put my hand under
the bed cover, and felt his feet. They were stone
cold. Animal heat had forsaken his extremities, and
the chills of death were fast invading his heart. I
induced my child to retire to her chamber, under
the belief that he slept, and she did not learn his
fate until she arose in the morning. Thus ended
the widow's simple narrative.
Poor Lucy Gray! No being is more deserving
of commiseration, than an amiable female brooding
over the sorrows of hopeless love. If her afflictions
are occasioned by the treachery of man, the
bitterness
of thought poisons the very sources of life, and
works a sure and rapid decay. Even a deviation
from the path of rectitude, may be philosophised into
a virtue, when occasioned by one beloved, but it will
rise up in judgment when passion has lost its
influence
,
and the fatal conviction flashes upon the mind,
that the object was unworthy of the sacrifice. But
she who has watched by the death-bed of him she
doated on, and by her angel presence drawn his
thoughts to heaven, and taught him resignation;
who kissed his soul when parting from his lips, and
watched the glazed eye that even in death
expressed
his tenderness, until she fancied that he lingered
still, and paused to hear him breathingsuch a one
may mingle in society, and pass along unnoticed
with the rest of the crowd; she may join the
sportive
dance, and seem to partake of its merriment;
the wound may apparently be healed, and the smile
of cheerfulness may enlighten her countenance; but
still her midnight thoughts are working in the grave,
and straining near to madness to picture the being
that is mouldering there. She fades, without being
conscious herself of gradual decay, and like the
tulip
,
becomes more lovely, in consequence of disease
engendered at the root. Such has been the fate of
myriads of the fairest and best of creation; and such
was the destiny of Lucy Gray.
THE
MAN WITH A NOSE.
[1]
[1]
This sketch was first published in January, 1830. Another,
and it is presumed the true, version of the same anecdote,
has since appeared in Mr. Dunlap's entertaining work,
entitled
The History of the Arts of Design. This fact is
referred to in order to avoid the charge of plagiarism, from
an author who has done so much for American literature,
in his quiet way, and without the customary flourish of
trumpets
.
His literary talents are acknowledged;he stands at
the head of the little band of native dramatistsand it is to
be hoped that the time is not far distant, when he may be
encouraged
to lay before the public a collection of his dramatic
pieces, which justly entitle him to a lasting and enviable
reputation
.
What need'st thou run so many miles about,
When thou may'st tell thy tale the nearest way.
Shakspeare
.
On
stepping into a stage coach, we all feel a
greater or less degree of curiosity respecting our
travelling companions. We immediately inquire
of ourselves, Who can they be, and whither are
they going?though, had we met them elsewhere,
we would not have given five straws to have been
put in possession of their history from the time of
their birth, and to have a revelation of their future
destiny thrown into the bargain. Were I disposed
to moralize, I would say that a stage coach is your
only true leveller; and to be squeezed into one, and
jolted over a turnpike, for sixteen hours in
succession
,
at the rate of eight miles an hour, is the surest
way to awaken the sensibilities, in spite of cushions,
bolstering, and a seat between the axletrees.
I was called to the interior of Pennsylvania last
spring. The stage was full, and, as we left
Philadelphia
before day, the passengers could not see
each other's visages. A profound silence prevailed
for the first ten miles, which may have been in
consequence
of the difficulty of making an
observation
in the dark; but, no sooner had the first golden tints
of the sun appeared, than the drowsy travellers, one
and all, rubbed their eyes, and the talent of Lavater
was called in requisition.
We rode a few hundred yards farther in silence,
when a fat, pursy gentleman, who occupied about
two-thirds of the back seat, broke the spell by
saying
,
We are packed like figs in a drum, and every
jolt only serves to settle us more compactly.
If that be the case, my dear, we shall be well
settled
by the time we arrive at our journey's end,
observed a young woman on the same seat. A
simper accompanied the remark, which denoted
that she intended to be witty; and perhaps she was
so, for her husband chuckled at the idea until the
low, growling chuckle was changed into an asthmatic
cough. When he had recovered sufficient breath,
he said, Your wit will be the death of me yet.
And that, said she, looking tenderly, would
be the death of my wit. I judged from the look
that they had been recently married; and, if so, the
principle which prevails in preparing fowls for
market
had been observed in the present instancefat
and lean together.
Immediately after this sally, another exclaimed,
in a theatrical tone, 'Sdeath, I undergo more cramps
and pains than ever Prospero inflicted on Caliban.
The scoundrel of a driver must have stowed more
than his complement into the vehicle.
Let us count noses, cried the young woman.
That I must beg you to undertake, madam,
replied
the other, bowing; for, if I begin with you, I
shall never get to the end of my task. He was a
little dapper fellow, of about five feet five, with a
profusion of hair on his head, which was surrounded
by a travelling cap, stuck on with a rakish air. He
wore a rusty frock coat, with military collar,
buttoned
tight up to the neck, around which was
swathed
a large cravat, which made up in quantity what
it wanted in cleanliness. The collar of his shirt
had modestly retiredperhaps ashamed to be seen
in such company. His right hand was thrust in his
bosom, and his left arm was placed akimbo, to the
great annoyance of his next neighbour; but then it
gave the little tragedian an air of importance, such
as became the representative of kings and princes of
the blood. He determined to be every inch a king,
though riding in a stage coach. When he paid the
lady the foregoing compliment, he bowed, and
endeavoured
to throw a vast deal of meaning into his
countenance, by way of elucidating what he would
be at; but it was unnecessary. Let a woman alone
to ferret out a compliment, even though it be spoken
in high Dutch. She archly replied, If that be the
case, sir, begin on the other side of the stage, and
you will count more rapidly. The little fellow
with the bushy head bowed and smirked, while the
pursy gentleman growled, and moved his mass of
mortality as if his seat had become rather
uncomfortable
.
His better halfbetter, perhaps, in quality,
but not in quantityobserved his uneasiness, and
enquired what ailed him.
The road is rough, my pet bird, and it seems as
if every stone were a load-stone, and attracted the
wheels to it.
Oh! is that all? said she, and smiled more
sweetly than ever Hero smiled upon Leander, or
Eurydice upon her fiddling husband, after having
defied the devil and all his works to get possession
of her.
All, quite all! replied the pursy gentleman,
and smiled also; but his smile was not quite as
sweet as that of his bewitching companion.
When shall we proceed to count noses?
inquired
the bushy-headed tragedian, at the same time
drawing his chin within his military collar and
enormous
cravat.
At once, said the lady. So, begin.
Shall I trouble you?
Since you insist. One, two, three.She paused.
Go on.
One, two, three.She paused again.
Zounds! there are more than three in the stage,
or is that the extent of your arithmetic, madam?
said the tragedian, smiling.
The lady made no reply, but kept her eyes bent
towards the opposite part of the stage. He
complimented
her again, but she seemed not to hear him,
and her eyes were immovable. Could she have been
shocked at the complexion of his cravat, or did she
imitate the retiring modesty of his dickey?
Neither
!
A lady will receive a compliment from a
dirty beau as the pearl fisher takes his prize,
without
regard to the rough and dirty shell of the oyster.
One, two, three!She could go no further.
The tragedian turned to see what object thus
engrossed
her attention, and rendered her deaf even to
a compliment. He beheld it, and his lower jaw fell
with astonishment. When somewhat recovered, he
exclaimed,
Bardolph, by all that's wonderful!
Slawkenbergius was a fool to him, cried the
lady. The pursy gentleman looked in the same
direction
,
and grumbled something like Heaven
protect
us! half chuckle, half earnest.
The object of their admiration was a man of about
fifty. He was dressed in a rusty black coat, of the
Lord Townly cut, which gave incontrovertible marks
of having belonged to a former age. The wearer had
increased in size since the time of first putting it on;
so much so, that the button holes could now scarcely
squint at each other, around a certain protuberance
which shall be nameless, but which adds more to the
dignity of a justice, in his chair, than a knowledge
of the statutes. A degree of relationship was,
however
,
still kept up between the button holes, by
means of pieces of tape. His rusty coat had been
carefully brushed, and, though a piece of antiquity,
it had nothing of the dust of former ages about it.
His linen was as white as snow, and his small
cravat
,
in all respects unlike that of the tragedian, was
twisted into the dimensions of a rope, and tied as
tight as a halter round his neck. He wore a foxy
scratch, which was surmounted by a hat, which
appeared
not to have had a nap since the days of the
seven sleepers, but which had been brushed with the
accustomed care from long habit.His hands were
locked in each other before him; he sat erect, and
looked out with evident delight upon the
surrounding
landscape. There was an air of gentility about
him that could not be mistaken, and yet the
sprightly
woman found it impossible to get beyond this
object
in her enumeration. And why so?His face,
in longitude, would have corresponded with that of
a horse, and was of a mahogany complexion. His
forehead was elevated and wrinkled. His eyebrows
were long, gray and bushy; and his eyes small,
black, and protruded like those of a lobster. His
nose!how can I possibly describe that nose!In
its formation, as little regard had been paid to the
line of beauty as in the growth of a potato. It was
studded with warts, which added to its magnitude,
and the skin covering the whole strongly resembled
a fig turned inside outwards; and yet he exhibited it
to public view with apparent unconsciousness. How
frequently is a man's face the most repulsive part of
him; and yet, in consequence of the custom of the
times, that, and that alone, is he compelled to expose
to public scrutiny.
Beside the man with a nose was seated an old
VOL. II.3
lady with a bandbox, whose face was a mere
caricature
upon that of the gentleman. It was but little
more than half a span from the tip of the chin to the
top of the forehead. Her mouth was toothless, and
her noseif it deserved the namewas unequal, in
point of size, to one of the protuberances that grew
spontaneously upon the proboscis just described. A
pair of spectacles rode astride of this mere apology
for a nasal organ, and were kept in their position by
means of a piece of riband fastened to her cap. An
old lady of this cast of countenance generally proves
to be an annoyance in a stage coach, more especially
if she travels with a bandbox.
Women will talk, at home or abroad, whether
they have any thing to say or not; and I have
observed
that in a stage, an old woman is never at a
loss for a subject. She feels an irresistible desire to
know the business of her fellow travellers, and
propounds
questions as confidently as if she had a right
to interrogate. I was, therefore, not astonished when
I heard the old lady with an apology for a nose,
commence
her battery upon the gentleman with the
unearthly
proboscis.
Where did you come from this morning, Sir?
said she abruptly, at the same time adjusting her
glasses, and, bending forward, peered up into his
face.
From the Boar's Head, in Eastcheap, replied
the tragedian, in a low tone, to the young lady, who
smiled approbation; and even the pursy gentleman
gave a low growl, as if he relished the jest.
From home, madam, said the man with the
nose, bowing graciously. His inquisitive companion,
who took a deliberate survey of the wonderful work
of nature, shook her head knowingly and said, It's
impossible all that can be real flesh and blood!
The stage now stopped at an inn, and the
passengers
alighted for breakfast. Inbred politeness never
leaves a man, no matter in what situation he may be
placed. A gentleman, from the caudle-cup upwards,
maintains the same character at home and abroad;
he neither puts it on with a new coat, nor lays it
down when his coat becomes thin at the elbows. It
is his birth-right, and the world cannot deprive him
of it. But this remark does not hold good with your
gentleman of yesterday. He may be compared with
the poor player who assumes the part of royalty,
struts an hour upon the stage, and feels himself a
king; but is no sooner divested of his pasteboard
crown and mantle, than his dignity leaves him, and
he reverts to the original blackguard again. But
while I am moralizing, I lose the thread of my
story.
As the stage drove up to the door of the inn, the
little tragedian assisted the witty lady to alight, and
escorted her to the breakfast room, leaving her
overgrown
helpmate to get out as he could. One after
another the travellers jumped out and entered the
tavern; and, finally, the gentleman with the
mahogany
face alighted, and stood at the door and assisted
the pursy gentleman and the old lady to come to
a landing. This was the true touch-stone of good
feeling and politeness. Had the lady been young,
handsome and witty, all might have accounted for
his attention; but she was old, toothless and
disagreeable
;
but it was enough for him that she
appeared
invested with petticoats. Had he lived in the age
of chivalry, for that act alone he would have been
knighted, and called the knight of the brazen
proboscis
.
He entered the breakfast room supporting
the pursy gentleman and the old lady with the
bandbox
.
They took seats at the table, and she sat
beside
him.
The man with a nose was a perfect Chesterfield at
table. While the rest of the company ate as though
they were eating for a wager against time, he pressed
them to partake of various dishes, fearing they might
not help themselves without being invited. All was
hurry and bustle; and there was a constant
clattering
of knives and forks, and a whisking of servants
in and out of the room.
The gentleman with the nose had not yet tasted
a mouthful. He had been attending to others instead
of minding his own business. A cup of coffee, Sir,
cried a servant, and thrust it beneath his proboscis.
He raised his head, and turned his face towards the
waiter. The servant startedhis hand shook, and
the cup of coffee was deposited in the lap of the
traveller
.
His face became of a darker mahogany hue.
He made use of such an exclamation as any
gentleman
would have given vent to on such an occasion,
and rose from his seat as nimbly as if Gammer
Gurton's
needle had been sticking in his small clothes.
The servant handed him a towel to rub himself
down, and, after making an awkward apology, left
the room, muttering, Why the devil does he travel
with such a nose?
Now, the gentleman wore white cassimere small
clothes, and, though they were thread bare, and
darned
across the right knee, there was not a speck of
soil upon them when he first stepped into the stage
in the morning. But of what avail was their
primitive
purity? A dish of muddy coffee had been
slushed
over them, and they presented a convincing proof
that even the cleanest unmentionables, like every
other mortal production, are liable to be sullied in
this world. The traveller resumed his seat, after
being rubbed down with a tow towel; the old lady
of the bandbox adjusted her spectacles, and leaned
forward to take a survey of the afflicted premises.
The distressed traveller did the same. His nose had
assumed all the colours of the rainbow, and his face
seemed to have extended to twice its usual
dimensions
.
After a careful examination of the damage
done, the old lady looked her companion in the face,
and shaking her head sorrowfully, said, What a
pity!
A great pity, replied the other, and shook his
head too. There is some comfort in being
commiserated
in our misfortunes.
Tara, tara, tara, tara, went the horn of the stage
driver. The stage is waiting, gentlemen, cried
the landlord, bustling into the room with an air of
importance.
Waiting! let it wait, cried the tragedian, with
his mouth filled after the fashion of Sancho Panza
I have not half finished my breakfast yet. The
man with the nose had not yet began.
Tara, tara, tara, again went the horn.
Silence that dreadful horn, it frightens the inn
from its propriety, exclaimed the little Roscius,
with a tragedy swell.
Waiter, a cup of coffee, exclaimed the
distressed
traveller. The bar maid handed it to him, and
smiled as she did so. But why did she smile? She
was a blooming girl, and perhaps had been told that
a smile added to her beauty. Be this as it may, I
have observed that few pretty girls can look a man
full in the face without smiling. I leave it to
physiologists
to find out the reason.
Gentlemen, the stage is waiting, again cried the
landlord. The man with the nose swallowed his
coffee, and scalded his throat in the hurrythe
tragedian
rose from the table swearing that he had not
made half a meal, though all the dishes were empty
within arm's reach of himand the pursy gentleman,
as he waddled out, grumbled something like an
insinuation
that there was an understanding between
the driver and the landlord to disturb the travellers
as soon as they were comfortably seated, in order to
save the victuals. The reason of this dissatisfaction
was a plain oneThey were now called on to
discharge
their bills, and some folks make it a rule never
to pay money without first getting into a passion.
How different the deportment of the mahogany faced
gentleman. He had had his clean white cassimeres
drenched with muddy coffee, and his throat scalded
with the slops of the pot three times replenished and
concocted, and yet he paid his bill without a
complaint
,
and bowed to the landlord as he deposited his
change in the right hand pocket of his hapless small
clothes. He left the breakfast room escorting the
lady with the bandbox to the stage.
3*
As they left the room, there was a spontaneous
exclamation among the inmates of the inn, What a
nose!
The landlord shook his head mysteriously, and
protested that he had never seen any thing like it
belonging
to either fish, flesh or fowl. The girls came
rushing from all parts of the house tittering; they
gathered together, and had their joke to themselves.
Something tickled them mightilywhat it was I do
not pretend so say. The landlady bounced in in a
fluster, exclaiming, Where is it?which way has
it gone? She would have hurried out to the stage,
but her husband interfered, by saying,
Remember you are not in a situation now, my
dear, to look upon a sight of that nature.
Fiddle de dee, cried the hostess, snapping
her fingersI must have a look at it, if I die by
it.
It may cost you your life, replied mine host,
again shaking his head.
Well, I might as well die that way as from
curiosity
,
said the hostess, and made for the door;
but the landlord was an athletic man, and catching
her in his arms, in spite of her struggles, fairly
carried
her to her chamber and turned the key on her.
The landlord entertained certain old womanish
notions
,
and had a proper regard for the personal
appearance
of his progeny. As the stage drove off,
the landlady was seen at her chamber window,
looking out with all the eyes that nature had given
her. The whole inn was in an uproarthe dogs
barked after us, and, as we passed along, the
teamsters
stood staring vacantly in the middle of the
road.
The passenger who had occasioned all this
consternation
looked out and enjoyed the beauties of
nature, apparently unconscious that nature had been
to him so niggard of her gifts. The lady with the
bandbox was still next to him, for she now
considered
herself as having a kind of legal right to his
protection, having commiserated with him on the fate
of his breeches. It is astonishing upon how slight a
foundation stage coach friendships are built.
Where are you travelling to? asked the old
woman, as the stage turned upon the soft road.
To Gadshill, I'll vouch for him, replied the
tragedian.
Or to the Promontory of Noses, added the
witty lady.
To the end of my journey, replied the
gentleman
,
making a bow that would have served as a
model for Sir Charles Grandison.
Nothing occurred worthy of note until the stage
drove up for dinner. The mysterious gentleman
had scarcely opened his lips during the morning,
but kept his eyes constantly fixed on the passing
scenery. This may be accounted for by his having
a toothless old woman seated at his opposite elbow.
Dinner was on table as we alighted. An
experienced
traveller avoids the post of carver as he would
the seat of famine. It is diverting to see the
company
seated, with their hands before them, and
looking
anxiously for some one possessed of sufficient
courage to attack the eatables and cut them out
employment
.
As I said before, the man with a nose
was Chesterfield revivified. He assumed the post
of honour, and, after whetting his knife, he
commenced
operations on a roasted goose, displaying a
knowledge of the science that would have done
credit to the grand carver of an eastern monarch.
He was skilful, but the goose was obstinate; turning
to the waiter, he said
Had you lived in the days of ancient Rome,
they would have hurled you from the Tarpeian
Rock for this.
Anan? said the servant.
You have roasted one of the sacred geese that
cackled in the capitol, continued the other, gravely.
This was the first attempt at a joke that the man
with the nose had made during the day, and it was so
good that the servant left the room ready to split his
sides with laughter. I do not pretend to say that he
saw clearly through the remark, but he saw the
gentleman's
nose clear enough, and that of itself was
worth the best jest in Joe Miller. The traveller
continued the dissection with renewed vigour, and
finally succeeded in dismembering the goose; but
during this undertaking his fellow travellers had
each despatched a plate full from another dish, and
were now ready to reap the harvest of his labour.
He helped them all round, and consulted the palate
of each in his equitable distribution.
Shall I trouble you for a side bone, grumbled
the pursy gentleman, without raising his chin from
his plate, but kept his gastronomic powers in full
operation until such time as more grist should be
ready for his grinders. The carver complacently
undertook the task, and, bracing every nerve,
laboured
until large beads of perspiration stood on his
forehead, and his nose
Dropp'd tears as fast as the Arabian trees
Their med'cinable gums.
Alcides, it is said, cleansed the Augean stable, but
it is no where to be found on record that he ever
severed the back bone of a goose similar to that
under consideration. The carver was a man of
resolute
spirit; he perseveredand what will not
perseverance
accomplish? His labour done, he wiped
the sweat from his brow with a white linen
handkerchief
,
which still retained the marks of its folds,
and then helped the pursy gentleman to his
favourite
part. The carver had not yet tasted a
mouthful
.
The goose had flown before the incessant fire
kept up by the travellers; not a particle remained
on the dish but the parson's nose, and that was a
favourite mouthful with the patient gentleman. He
understood every branch of the science of carving,
and the least important is by no means that which
teaches the carver how to help the company
satisfactorily
,
and still retain his favourite part upon the
dish. This will account for the parson's nose
having survived the general havoc. The traveller
now rested from his labour, and casting a
complacent
glance upon the dish, stuck a fork into the
delicate
morsel. He raised it, and was about to
translate
it to his own plate, when the lady of the
bandbox
,
who was seated close at his left elbow, watched
his motions like a cat, and thrusting her plate
immediately
beneath the sorry remnant of the goose,
exclaimed, I'll thank you for that. The
gentleman
bowed, the morsel dropped from the point of
his fork, and the next moment it was mumbled
between
the nose and chin of the old woman. The
carver dropped his knife and fork in despair, and
the stage driver's horn now informed him that the
time he had devoted to politeness should have been
devoted to eating. He took a mouthful of bread
and a glass of brandy and water, and returned to
his seat in the stage. The little tragedian was in
an ill humour at being disturbed before he had
emptied
more than half the dishesand the pursy
gentleman
growled something about the extortionate
charges, but his voice stuck by the way, unable to
pass through the quantity of dinner he had
swallowed
.
The lady with the bandbox resumed her seat beside
the man with a nose, and the rest of the company
being packed as before, the driver flourished his
whip, and we left the inn at a brisk pace, which
promised much, but promises are not always
realized
.
Any one who is at all acquainted with the
nature of man, must have remarked that, if there be
any thing like good nature in his composition, it will
be sure to show itself shortly after dinner, provided
the dinner was a good one. If you have a favour
to ask, never ask it of a man while his stomach is
empty. Shakspeare says something about a judge
hanging a prisoner lest his dinner should grow cold;
and Shakspeare, it is acknowledged, understood
something of human nature. Now, though the
mysterious
gentleman had not dined on any other than
the chameleon's dish, his countenance brightened,
either from long habit of being better satisfied with
human affairs at that hour of the day, or from the
aforesaid glass of brandy and water, which he
swallowed
with a mouthful of bread, on the summons
of the stage driver. Be this as it may, he surveyed
the surrounding country, as they rode along, with
increased delight.
When Eve was turned out of Paradise, she still
retained that unquenchable thirst after knowledge
which has entailed such countless woes upon her
progeny; and all her daughters, even to the present
day, are sure to inherit that trait of character, which
may be the reason of the impossibility of regaining
Eden on this side of the grave.
The lady of the bandbox had made some progress
in her second half century, and doubtless had drunk
deep of the fountain of knowledge, but still her
thirst was unallayed. One would naturally suppose
that ladies of her age, who had seen so much, would
rest satisfied with their stock of information; but,
on the contrary, the appetite becomes insatiable with
years; and, while there is any thing to be learnt,
they are on thorns until they get at the bottom of it.
Speaking figuratively, such was the case with the
lady of the bandbox. I do not mean to say that
she was actually seated on thorns in the stage coach.
The old lady was not what may be called a
woman
of few wordsthey are scarce, and she was
not of the numberbut she was a blunt woman, and
came to the point without circumlocution. With
her compressed face, button nose, and projecting
chin, Lavater would not have read her character
without the aid of spectacles.
What trade may you follow for a livelihood?
said she to her companion, adjusting her spectacles,
and looking him full in the face. Not a word had
been spoken during the preceding half hour.
I sometimes make shoes, replied the
gentleman
,
and took a pinch of snuff. It was the first
pinch he had taken; but if every man wore a nose
like his, and took but such a pinch once in a day,
Crses himself would be denied admittance into
the company of our tobacco planters.
Impossible that you should be a shoemaker,
exclaimed the old lady. The gentleman bowed,
smiled, but returned no answer.
That's an odd fish, said the tragedian; I
wonder
who he can be!
The witty lady made a reply, which was intended
to be witty, but as it proved an abortion, I refrain
from putting it on record. Her husband, however,
growled something like a laugh of approbation. I
heard it rumbling its way upwards, like distant
thunder, but it was smothered in the intricate
passage
before it could find its way to his lips.
By this time no small degree of curiosity
prevailed
among the passengers to know who the
mysterious
gentleman actually was, but the old lady was
decidedly the most curious. How to gratify her
thirst after knowledge in the present instance was a
difficult question, for her companion was not
disposed
to be more communicative than an oyster at
ebb tide. Silence again prevailed, but was broken
this time by the strange gentleman. He was not
talkative, as I have just remarked, but when he did
speak it was to the purpose.
Madam! said he, bowing to the old lady; but
as she was rather dull of hearing, he was obliged to
repeat his salutation and bow also. She caught the
sound, and, adjusting her spectacles, thrust her
apology
for a nose within the shade of his proboscis,
that not a word might escape her ear in the rattling
of the stage wheels.
Did you speak, sir?
I did, madam.
And what did you say, sir?
I believe your bandbox has got between my knees,
that's all.
He was right in his conjecture; the bandbox was
actually there. Now, though a bandbox is not only
a necessary but indispensable appendage to a
travelling
lady, yet all must allow that it can very
readily be dispensed with when it gets between a
gentleman's knees in a stage coach, for it does not
at all accord with the fitness of things to have it
there, and this was the opinion entertained by the
man with the nose. The old lady removed the box,
and as she did so, resumed the attack.
Well, really, now I should like to know what
business you follow.
I sometimes make a coat, replied the other,
smiling.
Oh, la! impossible that so polite a gentleman as
you should be a tailor, exclaimed the old lady.
The gentleman bowed, and made no reply.
A mysterious fellow, that, said the tragedian;
and I should not be astonished if he were some
German prince in disguise.
In disguise! In a mask, you mean, said the
witty lady.
No, it is real flesh and blood, every inch of it,
replied the tragedian, looking askance at the
traveller's
nose.
Perhaps so; but then it must be of foreign
growth. Such fruits are not indigenous to our soil.
The stage now approached a village. I believe
I shall get out here, said the gentleman. The old
lady became fidgetty at the prospect of losing her
companion before her curiosity should be gratified.
She repeated her question.
I sometimes make noses, replied the
persecuted
gentleman, with a contortion of muscles that
approximated a smile.
Make noses! exclaimed the old lady, and
involuntarily
applied her hand to her own apology for a
nose, and looked as though she would say, Is this
beyond your skill to remedy?
Make noses! cried the witty lady; and after
casting a suspicious glance at his proboscis, turned
to the tragedian and said, with an air of triumph,
I knew I could not be mistaken.
Make noses! said the tragedian doubtingly.
Make noses! growled the pursy gentleman, in
a tone that seemed to be a distant echo of the
tragedian's
voice.
The mysterious gentleman sat erect, apparently
indifferent to what was passing. The muscles of
his rigid countenance were immovable, and by his
twinkling black eyes alone did he betray that he
enjoyed the consternation into which he had thrown
his fellow travellers.
Yes, repeated he, make noses; and took
another
pinch of snuff. I described the first pinch;
it is unnecessary to describe the second, farther
than to state that it was such a pinch as no other
mortal breathing could have taken. It made him
sneeze, and as he sneezed every passenger started
electrified from his seat.
Angels and ministers of grace defend us!
exclaimed
the tragedian.
What strange noise was that? asked the pursy
gentleman, who was rather dull of hearing.
Every one turned an eye of suspicion towards the
man with the nose, but not a word was uttered, for
they imagined that the devil himself was ensconsed
within that brown coat and white cassimere breeches.
They looked at each other in silent astonishment.
The stage driver blew his horn again, to announce
his approach to the village.
Oh! is that all! they cried simultaneously.
All, I assure you, said the gentleman, bowing.
They laughed heartily at their ridiculous mistake,
but the lady with the bandbox could not even smile,
for they now rapidly approached the village, and her
curiosity had not yet been gratified. The stage
drove up to the inn, and the passengers unpacked
themselves and alighted. The important moment
had arrived, when the old lady's curiosity must be
gratified or never. Why she was so desirous of
ascertaining his pursuit, is a difficult question to
answer. It may have been nothing more than a
natural
impulse, or she may have mistaken his marked
attention for something more than common courtesy.
Women are, at all stages of life, subject to
delusions
VOL. II.4
of this nature. The strange gentleman rose
from his seat, and was about leaving the stage. The
impulse, no matter from what cause it originated,
now became too strong to be controlled. The lady
of the bandbox now laid violent hands upon the tail
of the black coat of the Lord Townly cut mentioned
in an early part of this narrative. The wearer of it
turnedan inconvenience that he would not have
been subject to had nature provided him with an
eye in the back of his head. The old lady assumed
a girlish air, which dowagers of a certain, or rather
uncertain age are in the habit of assuming, though
quite as unseasonable as green peas at Christmas,
and simpering, cried, Really, you shall not stir
until I have gained my point.
What point, madam? inquired the gentleman,
bowing gravely.
You must tell me by what means you make a
livelihood.
By making faces, exclaimed the gentleman.
The lady shrieked, and let go of his coat. The
persecuted traveller still retained his politeness, but
the expression of his countenance was such as I shall
not attempt to describe. There is nothing on record
to be compared with it, unless, indeed, that
mysterious
picture mentioned by Washington Irving in
his story of the young Italian. The gentleman
walked off, like the honourable Dick Dowlass, with
his wardrobe tied up in a pocket handkerchief.
Who can he be! exclaimed the travellers,
looking
after him with astonishment, as he slowly
proceeded
along the street. My curiosity was also
excited
,
and, on examining the way-bill, I discovered
that the man with a nose had adhered to the truth
in his various accounts of his means of making a
living. He was a portrait painter.
AN APOLOGUE.
Upon
a time, Love, Death and Reputation entered
into a compact to traverse the world together. They
came beside a smoothly-flowing river, where they
paused, for Love had already become weary of his
companions, and he discovered a shepherdess
tending
her flocks, on the sunny side of a grassy knoll,
on the opposite bank of the stream.
Here let us part for a time, said Love, and
I will tarry with that simple girl and her sheep, until
you seek me there.
She is a favourite of mine, replied Reputation,
and I shall certainly soon be there.
I mark the spot well, said Death, and trust me,
ere long you shall find me there.
I shall await your coming, said Love to Death,
and leaped into a light skiff on the shore of the
stream, and laughed aloud as he spread his rainbow
wings to the breeze. The shepherdess played
merrily
on her rural pipe, while from the high hills
beyond
the grassy knoll, the shrill notes of a
huntsman's
horn were heard, and suddenly a stag,
pursued
by the full-mouthed pack, broke cover. Close
in the rear, followed the eager huntsman. Love
clapped his little wings and shouted, as he beheld
the wearied stag shape his course towards the spot
where the peaceful sheep were browsing.
Death and Reputation pursued their journey.
They had not proceeded far when they were
overtaken
by a warrior, armed for the fight.He was
clad in royal robes; his turban was over-shadowed
by flowing plumes, and his gallant steed foamed and
champed the bit with impatience.
Ho! ho! cried Death; thou lookest like my
emissary. Whither in such haste?
The Monguls and the Persians are in the field,
replied the warrior, and I must be there.
And what canst thou do without my aid? said
Death, and leaped behind the warrior, and they
dashed madly onward.
I will meet you there, said Reputation, meekly;
but her voice was lost in the clatter of arms, and the
neighing of the steed.
As the sun was descending in the west,
Reputation
arrived weary and dejected at the field of battle.
Every thing denoted that Death had not been idle.
The Monguls and the Persians were strewed in
indiscriminate
masses over the plain; and as she
pursued
her search for the plumed warrior, she touched
scarcely one of the many thousand human carcasses
who had fallen to minister to his ambition. At length
she found him surrounded by heaps of slain. His
white plumes and costly robes were torn and soiled
with blood. The gallant steed and his rider lay a
ghastly spectacle in the pale moonlight, and the
figure of Death bestrode them with his fatal spear
upraised, still dripping with human gore.
Where have you loitered so long? cried Death.
Behold, my work is done, and I am impatient to
be gone.
I am permitted, replied Reputation, to remain
with but few that you have not first visited. This
gallant warrior long courted my favours, but the
clamorous voices of whole nations drove me violently
away. Those voices are now hushed in eternal
silence
,
and I will now fulfil my promise, and linger
with him as long as I may.
The hyenas and the birds of prey will pay little
respect to thy watchfulness, cried Death. But I
must see the simple shepherdess on the grassy knoll,
where Love awaits my coming. When you have
become weary of making a Golgotha your
dwelling-place
,
meet us there.
He arose and departed, and Reputation seated
herself on the breast of the dead warrior. When the
morn came, she was still there, sad and disconsolate,
and she continued throughout the following day;
but as night again approached, she became sickened
at the scenes of horror, and arose and fled, convinced
that she could not long exist in a field of carnage.
She had many thousand times visited similar scenes,
and endeavoured to remain, but her stay had
invariably
been but a few short days, and no more.
How brief is the stay of Reputation with both the
living and the dead!
Death sought the shepherdess, and he found her
alone. Her flock was straying without protection,
and her rural pipe lay by her side, silent and
neglected
.
Where is Reputation? demanded Death.
She promised to meet me here.
The shepherdess hung her head, and replied, I
have not seen her since Love first came, though, till
then, she had been my constant companion from
childhood.
And where is the huntsman whose jocund horn
made the hills speak as if with a voice of life, as we
passed by but a few days since?
He is gone, and I know not whither.
And where is Love, with his rainbow wings? He
has not flown too?He promised to remain in this
peaceful spot until Death should arrive.
He made the same promise to me over and
over.
And where is the truant boy?
I have endeavoured to conceal him, replied the
shepherdess, blushing, ever since the huntsman
deserted
me.
It is well, said Death. Their promises are
lightly made and as lightly broken; but I never
deceive
.
He laid his bony hand upon the pale brow of the
4*
shepherdess, and she faded and shrunk like the
spring-flower, when the night frost touches it, and
with her last sigh she saidWhen Love and
Reputation
have both left me, what can be more welcome
than the touch of Death!
Death now espied on the opposite side of the
stream his two former companions, and immediately
joined them, and found they were reproaching each
other.
How often, said Reputation, have you, in a
moment of levity, driven me with shame from those
who have been my choicest care; and by your
blandishments
and promises, never designed to be fulfilled,
destroyed, in one instant, the labour of my hands for
years?
And how often, replied Love, laughing, have
your prudish precepts imposed on me the labour of
years, when my task, otherwise, would have been
but the sport of an hour?
And I, cried Death, too frequently thwart the
views of both. So forbear your mutual reproaches,
and I will take my leave of you. But before I go,
I would recommend to you, young Love, quit not
Reputation; for if she once leave you, she is so coy
a damsel, no wooing on earth will win her back again;
and rest assured, wherever you visit without her. I
soon shall follow your footsteps. Away, both of
you, he continued, and take up your abode with
the young poet Selim, and the dark-haired Biribi.
Years, many years, shall elapse before I molest your
repose there: and even then, when I call to summon
the virtuous couple to their last repose, Reputation
will have become so enamoured of their society, that
long will she continue to hover with affection over
their graves. For my part, the Sophi of Persia awaits
my coming.Neither of you ever crossed his
palace-gate
,
nor can you reproach me with having deprived
you of a votary in him. Farewell.
Love and Reputation, hand in hand, sought out
the poet Selim, and Death hastened to the palace of
the Persian monarch, where every thing denoted his
arrival was expected. Many years after he sought
out his former companions, and he found them still
in the humble cottage of the happy Selim and
Biribi
.
As they reluctantly led the aged pair to the grim
visitant, he opened his arms to receive them, who
smiled upon each other as he pressed them together
to his bosom. The prediction of Death was verified,
for Reputation for ages hovered around the peaceful
grave of the poet Selim.
THE
APPARITION.
Jubeomanesque exire sepulchris.
Ovid
.
The
question whether the incorporeal essence,
after its departure from this terrestrial sphere, has
in any instance been permitted to resume the shape
of mortality, and appear to the outward senses of
its former associates, has agitated the minds of the
most enlightened for centuries, and we are still as
much in the dark as we were the hour speculation
began. There are, it must be allowed, many well
authenticated circumstances, calculated to fix the
belief of the credulous; nay, more, to stagger the
cooler judgment of the sceptic. Some, it is true,
may be traced to natural causes, while others defy
the subtilty of human reason to elucidatefor
instance
,
the preternatural visitation, which announced
to Roscommon the poet, while yet a boy, the death
of his father, and that which indicated to Miles
Peter
Andrews the sudden dissolution of Lord
Littleton
,
if we admit their authenticity, put all theories
at defiance, and the sceptic must shield himself by
placing them to the account of remarkable
coincidence
.
For the truth of the fact which I am about
to relate. I vouch without hesitation. I knew the
hero of the event, and place the most implicit
reliance
on his statements, though in making the avowal,
I may be charged with superstition, ridiculous in the
enlightened age in which we live. In the autumn
of 1810, returning from the western part of
Pennsylvania
,
I closed my day's journey at Clark's ferry,
on the Susquehanna, at that time one of the most
romantic and picturesque spots that ever delighted
the eye of the lover of nature. Immediately in front
of the tavern rolled the expanded and noble river,
from the surface of which was heard the horn of the
passing boatman, as he bore along the product of
the wealthy country, through which the river and
its tributaries flow. On the opposite side rose a
lofty and extended mountain, frowning in all the
wildness of nature, save that midway appeared a
hut, and a small clearance, though the spot seemed
inaccessible to the foot of man, a place where the
eagle might build his eyry, without fear or
molestation
.
Looking up the river, on the point of an island,
the eye was presented with a building of a better
order of architecture, which proved that refinement
had already made considerable progress, while the
extended view down the river, which pursued its
course through the bosom of the lofty and
uncultivated
mountains, was such as bade defiance to the
art of man to heighten. Considerable innovations
have since been made upon the wildness of the scene.
Turnpike roads and canals are merciless destroyers
of primitive scenery and romantic feelings; but as
it appears they can be converted to more practical
use than the latter, our good citizens of the west
will have but little reason to complain of the
innovation
.
As I alighted from my horse, a group of farmers
and travellers were seated beneath the piazza. I
saluted them, and took a seat among them. Their
conversation had been interrupted by my approach,
but, on my being seated, several voices desired Mr.
Jones to proceed with his story.
Mr. Jones was a portly personage, with a jolly
red countenance, which plainly indicated that he
did not belong to that school of philosophers who
despise the flesh pots of Egypt, or that class of
politicians
who advocate an excise on strong waters.
He was dressed in plain drab apparel, and wore a
slouched hat of the same colour, and from the
meal-dust
about his person, I at once put Mr. Jones down
for a thrifty miller. After a preparatory
hem
, he
commenced his narrative, nearly in the following
words.
Neighbours, most of you remember farmer
Grimes, who lived on Wild-cat Run, and who hung
himself about five years ago, out of spite at having
lost five hundred dollars, that he loaned Job
Worson
on usury?
I knew him bravely, replied one of the
company
.
He sued Worson before the court at
Carlisle
,
and though he had David Watts for his
attorney
,
and where could he have found a better? he
was cast, which took a cool fifty more from his
ill-gotten
gains, to pay the costs, besides another fifty
for his lawyer's fee. If you had seen old Grimes's
face when the jury brought in a verdict against him,
you would have thought it enough to frighten even
an usurer back to honesty. He could not stand this
blow; so he went home, and hung himself in his
orchard the next day. Remember Grimes? bless
you, Mr. Jones, I remember him as well as I do my
own father.
Very well, continued the miller, you may
also remember, if you were ever in Wild-cat creek
settlement, that his farm adjoined mine. This
important
fact being also within the knowledge of the
other, Jones proceeded: After the burial of
neighbour
Grimes, many strange stories were circulated
through the country, as how that he had been seen
walking about his farm at midnight, with a rope
around his neck, and then of a sudden, he would
start towards the orchard, and quick as lightning he
would suspend himself from the bough of an apple
tree, where he would hang until the cocks crew in
the morning, when he would vanish.
I have heard as much, replied the other, and
more too, that Job Worson could not sleep at nights
for months afterwards, for the old man, as soon as
Job would fall into a doze, was heard dancing in
his room, rattling his money-bag. This I heard
straight from the lips of Job's brother's wife's sister,
and may therefore be relied on for truth. It made
a prodigious talk at the time.
These stories, continued the miller, had very
little effect on me, for though I was his next
neighbour
,
and sat on the corner's jury when he was cut
down, yet he had not appeared to me, and I found
that the people of Millerstown, Carlisle, and those
about the ferry here, knew more about his appearing
than we of the Wild-cat settlement. So I put it
down to the account of humbug and gossip. But my
day was to come.
And I'll warrant you it did come.
It did.
I knew it would: you were always a scoffer, Mr.
Jones, but you have learnt that it is a dangerous
thing to scoff at the devil and his doings. This
remark was made by a small personage, whom I
took for a tailor, from the skein of thread around his
neck, and thimble on his finger.
About six months after the death of Grimes,
continued the miller, business called me up to
Shirleysburg
,
and, by the way, it was to settle an account
of long standing with that very Job Worson, who,
you know, while he lived in these parts, had the
name of being slow at wiping off old scores. Well,
he seemed to thrive at Shirley, for weeds, as the
saying is, flourish in a poor soil, and Shirley is poor
enough for that matter, though it is a somewhat noted
place, on account of the old fort that stood there
during the Indian wars. Those were piping times,
neighbours, and bullets may be picked up at this
day in the road as you descend the hill a short
distance
north-west of the village. Worson spoke of
Grimes, and made sport of the old usurer having
hung himself out of vexation. He also told me many
stories that were current about Shirley, as how that
he could not rest in peace in his grave. I had now
heard these tales so often, and from so many
different
sources, that I began to think that there might be
some truth in them, though we of the Wild-cat
settlement
,
who should have known most, knew less of
the matter than other people.
It is not unfrequently the case, observed a
sober looking personage, that a man has to travel
abroad to learn the occurrences of his own fireside.
Mr. Jones nodded assent to the remark, and
proceeded
in his narrative:
Having closed my business with Worson, I left
Shirley to return home, and having a long dreary
ride without company, I turned over in my mind
all the different stories I had heard respecting
neighbour
Grimes. My mind began to waver, and
somehow
,
when I entered the Shades of Death, which
was after night-fall, and you know, even at mid-day
it is a gloomy part of the road, I did not feel
altogether
as bold as a man ought to feel on such an
occasion. I fancied there was an unusual sound in
the wind as it moaned through the old pines, and
more than once my blood crawled chilly through my
veins, at the indistinct view of a projecting rock, or
the moss covered trunk of some tree that the storm
had snapped and riven. Even the tread of my horse
sounded hollow on the earth; his steps were short,
and in quick succession; his ears were raised; he
shyed at every object, and moved more briskly at
every sound. He evidently partook of the fears of
his rider.
I have often heard, said the tailor, that a horse
can see a ghost as soon as a man can, unless as how
the man be born with a caul before his eyes, and
then they say he can see the very air as it blows.
But I should not wonder if he saw
spooks
, or
somewhat
of the kind in the Shades of Death, for it is a
frightful place to pass at the lone hour of night, and
never shall I forget the first time I travelled that
road. It was a stormy night in the month of
November
Don't interrupt Mr. Jones's story, cried one,
whose leather apron and sooty visage proved him to
be the blacksmith, and whose curiosity was already
stretched on tenter hooks.
The miller resumed the account of his adventure:
The alarm which evidently possessed my horse
increased my own. The acuteness of my senses
became more than natural. The moon had not yet
risen, yet I imagined my sight could penetrate the
darkness that surrounded me, and that sounds which
at any other time would have been inaudible, were
now clear and distinct. I was all eye, and all ear;
for every part of my body seemed to be endowed
with the sense of seeing and hearing. I felt lighter
than I had ever felt before, and my horse moved
with unusual freedom, yet the sound of his tread
was heavy and appalling. It was the only mortal
sound to be heard, and that circumstance gave it an
indescribable influence over my imagination. It
proved to me that I was alone, and in such a spot as
superstition and credulity would delight to people
with beings the most fearful and inimical to our
nature
,
and if roused, I alone was responsible to them.
I urged my horse forward, hoping to outstrip my
fears, but the repeated echoes of his hoofs increased
my terror. I had now rode some distance, and
believed
I was about emerging from the Shades, when
a frightful noise, between a groan and a yell, startled
me, and suddenly a white figure darted across my
path and disappeared. My horse stopped; he was
going at full speed, and the sudden shock threw me
to the ground. I was more dead than alive with
fright, and when I regained my horse, I found the
poor animal still standing in the same spot, and
trembling like an aspen leaf.
I'll warrant you, replied the tailor. Did you
not say that the figure that startled him was white?
Nearly white; rather of a drab colour.
I would have sworn to as much, continued the
VOL. II.5
tailor, for old Grimes always dressed in a drab
suit; but what could he have been doing so far from
his orchard, passes my learning.
And I myself was at a loss how to resolve the
difficulty, continued the miller, unless, indeed,
that gloomy and lonely place was selected to
produce
a more lasting impression on my mind.
Having
regained my horse, I leaped into the saddle, and
plied the lash without mercy, until I had passed the
Shades. I then rode more moderately, and
endeavoured
to account for the sound I had heard, and
the object of which I had had but a momentary
glance. Speculation was unsatisfactory. I became
bewildered, and yet neither before nor since that
hour have I ever experienced such a vividness of
imagination, combined with quickness of corporeal
perception. New ties between the body and the
mind appeared to have been created. Still I rode
on, but all idea of time and space had vanished.
The horse was left to his own guidance, for my mind
was wandering; when suddenly I was awakened by
the shrill neigh of the animal. The moon was just
rising. I looked around, and to my no small
satisfaction
,
beheld that I was on the border of Grimes's
farm, which adjoined my own. I checked my horse
a moment to reflect. By crossing my neighbour's
farm, I should save a circuit of nearly a mile. It
was an object at that late hour, for I was weary and
feverish both in body and mind. I pulled down the
fence, and entered the field.
Rather than have done as much, exclaimed the
tailor, I would have crawled ten miles on my hands
and knees, at any hour in the four and twenty. It
was little else than challenging the devil and his
works. What do you say, neighbour Sledge?
For my part, replied the smith, I should have
considered the highway the safest, for, mark you,
the moon was just rising.
And Mr. Jones would have found it the safest
too, I reckon, remarked the tailor, which was
accompanied
by a Lord Burleigh nod.
You are perfectly right, continued Jones, for
after crossing the first field, I found myself in the
very orchard in which the usurer had put an end to
his existence. The whole scene of the coroner's jury
came fresh upon my mind. His pale and distorted
countenance, and stiffened form, were again before
me. I strove to banish the image, but it was
impossible
:
and its appalling power increased as I drew
nigh the spot where he had fulfilled his dreadful
determination
.
The wind was high, and the dark clouds
that were rapidly flying indicated an approaching
storm. The light of the moon was occasionally
obscured
by the passing clouds. I drew nigher to the
fatal spot, and I found it impossible to turn my gaze
in an opposite direction. My eyes searched eagerly
to single that tree out from the rest. At length I
discovered it, and standing beneath it, the outline of
a human figure. I at first doubted my senses, but
as the moon gleamed forth, I was convinced that
there was no delusion. Cold drops of perspiration
drenched my limbs. I shook as if an ague fit had
been on me. Still I could not remove my eyes from
the fearful object. I gazed until it assumed the
appearance
of the suicide. Yes, he stood before me in
shape as palpable to the sight, as either of you at
present. The miller's voice became husky at the
recollection, and his rude auditory listened in
breathless
suspense. He moistened his lips and proceeded.
I ejaculated a prayer for mercy. The figure was
still before me; to remove my eyes from it was
impossible
;
my faculties were paralyzed, and I felt as
if desperation were coming over me. I made one
desperate effort; it was for life or death. I lashed
the horse; he darted off, and speedily bore me
beyond
the dreaded influence of the spectre. When I
arrived at the door of my house, my horse was white
with foam, and I was trembling and pale as ashes.
I was thinking, said the tailor, that it would
have been better to have kept to the highway.
Jones nodded assent, and continued.
The noise I made on entering the yard, awoke
my son. He dressed himself and descended. I had
not yet dismounted. He saw my confusion, and the
state of the horse, and inquired into the cause; but
I had resolved to keep that night's adventure to
myself
,
and accordingly evaded his question. I gave the
horse to his care, and hurried to my bed more dead
than alive. I soon slept, from absolute exhaustion;
but the fearful events of the night assumed a
thousand
different shapes, and were not an instant absent
from my imagination. I arose about noon, faint and
feverish, having been but slightly refreshed by my
sleep. My son was curious to know what had thus
affected me, but I touched not on the subject to any
one of the family, secretly determining to sift the
mystery myself. The day closed, and I went to bed
as usual, but as the hour approached at which the
object
had appeared to me on the preceding night, I
quietly arose, descended, and directed my steps
towards
my neighbour's orchard. The moon was just
rising as I came within a hundred yards of the
well-known
tree. I looked about, but perceived nothing.
I advanced more than half the distance, when I again
beheld the figure. I endeavoured to be as collected
as man could be under such circumstances. My
heart throbbed violently, and my fears increased;
still the desire to satisfy my doubts rooted me to the
spot. Every moment the resemblance of the spectre
to Grimes became stronger. I had fully satisfied
myself of the identity, when it waved a red cloth
extended in its right hand, as if it wished me to
depart
.
I saw the bloody cloth, and heard it flap in
the breeze. It would have been madness longer to
have provoked my fate. I obeyed the warning, and
fled. Would you not all have done the same.
Certainly, if I had not been spell-bound,
replied
the tailor.
I hastened to my bed, and arose as usual the
following
morning, but did not open my lips to my
family concerning the events of the night. My wife
and son perceived that there was something unusual
on my mind, and endeavoured to find it out, but I
evaded their inquiries. I was reserved and
abstracted
during the day. My mind was occupied with one
engrossing subject. I viewed it in all its various
aspects, and reproached myself with weakness and
cowardice, for not speaking to the spectre, and
ascertaining
the cause of this fearful visitation. What
had I to dread from an interview? I had neither
wronged him living, nor cast obloquy on his memory.
On the contrary, I had always conducted myself as
became a good neighbour. These reflections
emboldened
me to sift the matter, and accordingly I
again sallied forth at midnight with my rifle on my
shoulder.
This was the third time! exclaimed the tailor
in a tremulous voice, and I have never heard of a
ghost yet that would not speak after seeing a man
three times.
Unless, indeed, said the blacksmith gravely,
it was the ghost of a dumb person, and such, for
the most part, I take it, continue silent forever.
That admits of an argument, rejoined the
other, and if so be as how you will listen to me for
five minutes, I will clearly prove to you, that by the
laws of nature, the ghost of a dumb man may talk
as glibly as the ghost of a lawyer.
Very well, neighbour, replied the blacksmith,
but as old Grimes was not dumb, we will hear Mr.
Jones out before we settle that there matter.
The miller continued:As I approached the
orchard
,
I breathed with increased difficulty; there
was an unnatural weight about my heart, and my
brain was in a whirl. I trembled in every joint, and
could scarcely drag one limb after the other. Was
the cause of this change within myself, or was I
labouring
under external influence? I dreaded the
latter; still I moved on, for my determination was
fixed. The object at length appeared to me again.
I will not attempt to describe my sensations at that
moment. I stood as if all the functions of vitality
had forsaken me. My eyes were fixed on it, but for
a time I was deprived of the power of vision. When
5*
my sight returned, it was still there. I summoned
resolution to speak to it, but such was my agitation
that my voice died in a whisper; I again exerted
myself
,
and cried, In heaven's name, speakit
waved a red clothif I can be of serviceif there
be any thing you would impart to mortal earthe
cloth still waved me from itMy limbs became
stiffened with desperationmy whole mind was
centred in one objectBy heaven! I cried
You should not have sworn on such an
occasion
,
gravely observed the tailor.
True, I should not, but I did swear that I would
not stir until I learnt the purport of that mysterious
visitation. Speak, I continued, what is it
disturbs
your rest, and calls you back from the eternal
world to the world of time? It still waved me to
depart. I am not to be baffled now.Speak, or a
rifle ball shall quickly end all my doubts.It still
remained silent, and the red cloth was waved in a
more agitated mannerSpeakno answer was
returnedI raised my rifle to my shoulder, took
deliberate
aim;speak or perish, I cried; the bloody
cloth was waved in defianceI fired; the spectre
fell, and my ears were saluted with a demoniac
laugh. I sunk senseless upon the earth.
I would not have been in your place for all old
Grimes died possessed of, said the tailor.
When I revived, continued the miller, the
first object that struck my sight was a figure
bending
over me.`Avaunt! back to your native hell,' I
shrieked. It clasped me in its arms, and raised me;
I shuddered, and every instant expected to be flown
away with.
And did it remain silent all this while?
Yes; but at length it spoke.
And what did it say? inquired the tailor, every
feature of his fox-like countenance indicative of
impatience
.
Father, what the devil ails you?
Ha!
It was my son, who, observing my abstraction
during the day, determined to keep an eye upon
me.
And the ghost?
Was a suit of Grimes's clothes, stuffed with
straw to frighten the crows from the cornfield.
But the object you saw in the Shades of Death?
Was a large hog belonging to a shingle-maker,
who had recently built himself a cabin among the
hemlocks.
You are a wag, Mr. Jones, but, mark me, your
day will come.
Perhaps so. I have seen many similar ghosts
since, but have never been so much frightened as on
this occasion.
THE
EMIGRANT'S DAUGHTER.
On
the margin of Lake Erie, on the Canada side,
stands a neat village, every way calculated to induce
those who are perplexed with the turmoils of a city
life, to believe that there is no paradise on earth to
compare with such a place of retirement. The spire
of the church, which is reflected on the glassy
surface
of the lake, seems to extend a protecting care
over the humble cottages beneath, each of which
stands in a neatly planned and fruitful garden. The
surrounding country presents a number of well
cultivated
farms, some of which are tilled by the
villagers
,
and others by French emigrants and their
descendants
,
who inheriting a portion of the manners
of their ancestors, combined with the primitive
simplicity
and rudeness of their native border, compose
almost an anomaly in the human race.
Among the farms in the vicinity of the village was
one cultivated by Jean Baptiste, a native, whose father
had emigrated from Normandy, and being of a family
once in affluence, he bequeathed to his son a proper
sense of his importance; but, as is too frequently the
case, neglected to bestow the means to support the
dignity. This is an awkward predicament for a
man to be in: to look upon himself and family
through a prism, by which they are decorated in the
gaudiest colours, while their associates view them
with the naked eye, or through glasses that are far
from placing their defects in a pleasing light, or
magnifying
their merits.
Baptiste was finally awakened to a proper sense
of the worth of his inheritance. While beggary was
staring him in the face, he found it impossible to
obtain a single sous upon the credit of his dead
ancestors, and that a man may think of himself as
favourably as he pleases, but unless the world
coincides
in opinion with him, it all amounts to less than
nothing. His pride could not support him, nor would
it suffer him to support himself, so in good time they
parted. Baptiste cast his eyes around him, and they
fell upon the pretty daughter of an emigrant to
whom the little farm then belonged, where our
worthy subsequently resided.
Baptiste was the beau of the village; a ragged one
we admit, but as he led a life of idleness, played
well on the flute, and knew the name of his
great-grandfather
,
no one ventured to dispute his claims
to gentility and family. He lost no time in making
the customary protestations of eternal love, and
considered it as a matter of course, that the
charming
Louise would be highly flattered with the
overtures
of a personage of his distinction; but he was
received with a degree of coolness calculated to
chill even those hardened by a Canadian winter.
Mortified at this discomfiture, he consoled himself
with attributing it to her rustic ideas and want of
discernment.
There was enough of the raw material about our
lover, to make, if properly worked up, a very clever
and useful man. This the father of Louise soon
discovered, and accordingly told Baptiste that the
girl should be his on two conditions, which the
impatient
lover eagerly demanded, confident that in
such a cause he could readily surpass the dangers
encountered in days of old to obtain the Hesperian
fruit.
Louise shall be your wife, said the father, as
soon as you have satisfied me that you can support a
wife, and that she is willing to marry you.
The latter difficulty, thought Baptiste, may be
speedily surmounted, but the former was a stumbling
block, for she could not feed on air, and there was
nothing within his reach of a more substantial nature
to offer her. If lovers could only dispense with
that terrestrial practice of eating, no poet could
present
a more glowing picture of Mahomet's paradise
than this world would be; but many a rapturous
dream of connubial bliss has been put to flight by
the obtrusive spectre of a chine of beef or a shoulder
of mutton. Baptiste, like Othello, was perplexed
in the extreme, and his hopes were daily
approaching
despair, when at length the old farmer again
spoke to him:
You say you love my daughter.
More than life, or even meat in lent time,
exclaimed
the lover.
What proof can you give me of your affection?
I will marry her to-morrow; if that is not
conclusive
,
I will undergo the agony of waiting a month
longer.
Very fine; but what assurance have I of its
continuance
?
Oh, let her alone for that, she will keep me as
true as the needle to the pole, I warrant you.
Keep you! but how will you keep her?
Now that is a pretty question, exclaimed the
single-minded lover; look at me and be satisfied.
Right! she may feast her eyes upon you, but I
am inclined to think that such a feast will not satisfy
her hunger. When poverty stalks in at the door
you know the proverb.
Eh! ejaculated Baptiste, his lower jaw falling
at least an inch from the other.
Remember, she is no angel yet, though you fancy
her such; she must have bread and meat, man.
Oh, curse the realities of life! Bread and meat!
There is nothing of the kind in Cupid's calendar
from the title page to the last chapter.
Still Cupid has no objection to a plentiful larder,
and if you expect to marry my daughter, you must
come over to my way of thinking.
I am not prepared to argue against you, if that is
your manner of reasoning, replied Baptiste. You
have made me a convert already.
Then come to my farm to-morrow by sunrise,
replied the other, and the truth of your conversion
shall be tested.
They parted; the old emigrant to pursue his daily
labour, and Baptiste to dream of future happiness.
Before sunrise the following morning he rose and
dressed himself in his best apparel, which had
descended
like an heir-loom from the
great-grandfather
already mentioned, and which, in our lover's
opinion, would have done credit to the court of Louis
le Debonnair. The suit consisted of a yellow
levantine coat, a sky-blue silk waistcoat, with
enormous
flaps at the pockets, and a pair of scarlet satin
small-clothes, all of which bore conclusive testimony
to the uncommon magnitude of the aforesaid
great-grandfather
,
and the degeneracy of his present
representative
.
They hung around the slender figure of
Baptiste like a surplice on a broomstick; yet it
would have been worse than sacrilege to have made
the slightest alteration; such an act, in his
imagination
,
would have disturbed the endless repose of his
ancestors, for every thread in those scarlet breeches
was more highly treasured, and possessed as much
magic as that fatal handkerchief which was died with
the conserve of maidens' hearts. How wayward
and inexplicable are the affections of the human
heart! Here we see one entrusting his happiness
upon the uncertain existence of another; there we
behold the miser locking up his whole soul with his
gold and jewels; that fashionable fair loves nothing
on earth like a splendid equipage; this sportsman
despises the human race, when compared with his
horses and dogs; that primitive damsel dotes upon
her tabby and lap-dog, and our hero views with
feelings
bordering on veneration, the old scarlet
small-clothes
worn by his progenitors. But enough of
moralizing, and to resume our story.
Baptiste having made his toilet, and buckled a
rusty rapier by his side, which had descended from
the same distinguished personage, took his flute in
his hand, and sallied forth to the place of
appointment
.
He had ruminated for twelve hours on the
foregoing conversation, and could not by any course
of reasoning arrive at any other conclusion, than that
the old man having discovered his merits had
determined
to yield his daughter without further
opposition
.
His heart beat wildly, and hope was on
tiptoe as he drew near the emigrant's romantic
cottage
.
The neatness of all about the house did not
escape his notice. Against the southern side of the
cottage was an arbour overshadowed by the rose
tree, jasmine, and honeysuckle. He drew near to
it, and the fragrance of the flowers seemed to
increase
,
as he reflected by what hand they had been
planted. All was silent, for the family had not yet
risen. He gazed with a wistful eye upon the small
window just above the arbour, and into which the
vines were creeping, for well he knew who
sanctified
that chamber by her presence. He sighed as he
gazed, and envied the jasmine flower that was slyly
peeping through a broken pane of the window.
With throbbing heart he breathed a plaintive air
on his flute, while the birds flitting among the trees
and shrubbery, swelled their little throats to
emulate
the serenade. It was not long before the
casement
opened, and a smiling face peered among the
green foliage, with lips that might have been
mistaken
for buds of the vine, and cheeks for full-blown
flowers. It was too much for a lad of Baptiste's
temperament. His flute was suddenly silenced, and
without loss of time he called in the aid of words, as
being more expressive than music. He poured forth
his feelings with ardour and eloquence, for love
works miracles, and had made even Baptiste
eloquent
,
and as he proceeded in his declaration, the
smiling face among the foliage became brighter; the
change did not escape the quick perception of the
lover: the victory is gained already, thought he,
she can never resist a personage of my family, parts,
and figureon the instant the window closed, the
smiling face disappeared, and Baptiste's ears were
saluted with a sound that too nearly resembled
laughter to be agreeable at that moment. He stood
not thunder-struckfor the morning was perfectly
clear, and there was no thunder; but an electric
shock would not have astonished him more than did
the closing of the window, and the laughter that
succeeded
.
What are you doing there, dressed off like a
new-fledged
popinjay? exclaimed a hoarse voice. He
turned and beheld the old emigrant, who repeated
his question.
Serenading Louise, replied Baptiste.
Serenading! very pretty, by Saint Anthony!
Henceforward, as you value my opinion, never let
me hear a tune from your lips, unless it is whistled
between the ploughshafts. And what is the
meaning
of this tawdry dress? Silks and satins, and of
all the colours in the rainbow! Very well for a
clown in a playhouse, but not altogether the thing if
you intend driving my cart, or digging in my
garden
.
I came to make myself agreeable to Louise,
replied
Baptiste, and therefore put on my best
apparel
.
Agreeable to Louise indeed! Do you think it was
for this I asked you to my cottage! No: it was to
make yourself useful to me. But in doing the one
you may possibly do the other; so begone, strip off
your fool's dress, and come in homespun, and you
will be welcome. Make haste back, or my breakfast
will grow cold.
Baptiste bowed in acquiescence, started off with
unusual alacrity, and the farmer entered his
barnyard
to attend to his stock. In the course of half an
hour Baptiste returned dressed in a more appropriate
suit, the old man met him with a smiling
countenance
,
VOL. II.6
and led him into the cottage, where Louise
had already spread the plain but clean and inviting
breakfast-table.
From that hour the prospects of Baptiste
underwent
an entire revolution. From being the most idle
and worthless young fellow of the village, he became
the most industrious and most respected. After
undergoing
a twelvemonth's probation, the farmer
consented
to his marriage with Louise, who by this time
was nothing loath, and as Baptiste was a wag, the
maddest charevari ever known in Canada, before or
since, took place on this occasion. Baptiste was
notorious
for playing a conspicuous part in frolics of
this kind, and accordingly many a rustic Benedict
came far and near to retaliate. A mad scene ensued,
compared to which, the sufferings of the redoubtable
lieutenant Lismahago on his wedding night were as
paradise to purgatory. Baptiste discountenanced
charevaris from that day, and it is now looked upon
as a custom more honoured in the breach than the
observance. We omitted to remark that on the
wedding night the splendid family dress, which had
lain perdu ever since Baptiste entered the cottage,
was again displayed, and his rusty rapier suspended
by his side. Thus equipped, he imagined the
ancient
glory of the Baptistes regenerate. His flute
was again brought forth, and was often listened to
with delight by the little family circle when the
labours
of the day were over.
Human affairs are but transitory. In the course
of time Baptiste buried his father-in-law, and his
beloved
wife, who had brought him a daughter and a
son, of whom more will be learnt in the subsequent
narrative.
There resided in the village a wealthy advocate,
who valued himself not only upon his fortune, but
that his father before him had lived by his wits, and
not by the labour of his hands. Counsellor Martin,
as the rustics called him, had a son about twenty
years of age, who had early imbibed all the
prejudices
of his father, and entertained an exalted opinion
of his own inherent importance. He made but little
progress at school, for he was too lofty a personage
to be under the control of one who had neither wealth
nor pride of ancestry to boast of. The village
schoolmaster
was a preacher also, and verily Frank
Martin
called into practice during six days of the week,
the precepts of moderation and forbearance duly
delivered
from the pulpit on the sabbath. Frank, as he
approached the state of manhood, was seldom seen
abroad without his rifle on his shoulder, or his angle
in his hand. He was dexterous at hooking a trout,
and seldom failed to put out the eye of a squirel at
the distance of fifty paces.
Frank had from his childhood watched the
growing
beauties of Claudine, the daughter of Baptiste,
as they were gradually developed, and daily became
more sensible of their influence; his pride, however,
shrunk from the suggestion that the best feelings of
his nature had been awakened by a rustic girl: he
called to his aid what casuistry he could command
to define his sentiments; he reasoned like another
Locke to satisfy himself that he was not in love; he
anatomised his mind; new-christened his feelings by
the names of regard, respect, esteem, but even under
their new titles they remained as irresistible as
before
,
and still were as sensibly alive in the presence
of Claudine, as though he had deigned to call them
by the name of love.
Towards the close of a day in autumn, as Frank
was returning home from a ramble through the hills,
with his gun on his shoulder, he chanced to cross a
meadow where Baptiste's little herd of cattle was at
that time grazing. He had not proceeded far before
he met a female approaching the meadow. It was
Claudine. Frank's heart throbbed, and it flew to
his lips as he accosted her
Good evening, pretty Claudine; which way do
you go at this hour?
No farther than the meadow, sir.
And why to the meadow, child?
Victor has gone to the village, and I have come
to drive the cattle to the cottage.
That must not be while I am with you.
You will not prevent me, Mr. Francis, inquired
Claudine, half jest, half earnest.
Certainly; I will do it for you.
You, sir! That indeed would be a strange sight,
she exclaimed, laughing.
Then we will do it together, Claudine, and the
oddity will not appear so glaring.
She rallied him on his gallantry, and as her lovely
features became animated, Frank gazed with
increased
delight, and doubted whether esteem or regard
was a term warm enough to describe his feelings.
Claudine was possessed of much beauty, and
archness
mingled with simplicity, and Frank felt more
forcibly their influence, as he walked by her side
towards
her father's cottage. The succeeding evening,
as the sun was declining, Frank unaccountably found
himself lounging near Baptiste's meadow; the herd
was still grazing there; he felt overjoyed at the
sight, but was at a loss to tell why a few cows
peaceably grazing occasioned such a throbbing at
the heart. He remained quite restless for half an
hour, with his eye constantly bent in the direction
of the farm-house, the smoke from which was seen
curling above a bill at a distance, when a shout was
heard, and winding around the hill, little Victor
appeared
,
running after a huge watch-dog in the
direction
of the meadow. One look was enough for
Frank, for he felt little interest in the gambols of the
boy and the dog. His heart beat twenty pulsations
less in a minute, and as he slowly retraced his steps,
he had time enough to investigate philosophically his
feelings and motives.
Frank's intimacy with Baptiste increased from
that day forward, and his visits at the cottage
became
so frequent, that it was a question with the
curious
whether he resided there or at his father's
mansion
.
His field sports had given place to a love of
agriculture, and few were more active than Frank
in the hay-field or at harvest time, for on these
occasions
the females left their housewifery to assist,
and it was remarked that Frank was always near
Claudine, and preferred doing her share, to his own,
of the labour.
Claudine had now completed her seventeenth year,
and the day that ushered in the eighteenth, was a
day of hilarity beneath her father's humble roof.
The affectionate old man arose in the morning
earlier
than usual, and when Claudine descended, she
beheld his face dressed with smiles, and his person
in the pride of his wardrobe, the legacy of his
great-grandfather
.
To have started any objection to the
antiquated cut of this dress, would have been to
Baptiste conclusive proof of barbarous taste, for it
was the standard by which he tested every modern
fashion, and he looked upon it with reverence, as
the connecting link between the present humble
state of the family and its former consequence. At
times when Baptiste was riding his hobby of family
distinction, in the presence of some incredulous
rustic
,
the scarlet breeches and rusty rapier were
produced
,
and invariably closed the contest
triumphantly
.
The countenance of Claudine as she entered the
room was overshadowed with grief, which in vain she
endeavoured to conceal as her father rose from his
seat to greet her.
How is this, my child, you look sad, but are not
ill, I hope?
I did not rest well, and my head aches in
consequence
.
The truth is you are pale, but cheer up, it will
never do for the pride of the village to be ill on this
day; your birth-day, and that of your happy old
father too, Claudine.
Every nation has some pecular custom, which is
religiously upheld by the people as a birth-right, and
looked upon as a spot of verdure in the waste of life.
In Canada, from the earliest settlement, it has been
the practice on the birth-day of any person, for his
6*
friends to assemble and present a bouquet to the
individual
,
whose birth-day is commemorated. If a
man, the present is usually a pipe decorated with
flowers; and if a female, a cake similarly adorned,
if it is the season for flowers, otherwise artificial
flowers are substituted.
At an early hour the villagers began to assemble
on the lawn in front of Baptiste's cottage. Among
them were gray heads and light hearts; dimpled
faces and elastic feet, for the companions of
Baptiste's
early days were seen among the young and
gay friends of his charming daughter. The farmer
soon espied them from his window, and went out to
meet them, leading Claudine by the hand. It
appeared
as if they had changed the time and
condition
of life, for as they approached the crowd, they
were greeted with strains of enlivening music, to
which Baptiste's heart beat time, and his feet
indicated
the same propensity, but Claudine looked as if
she were in a place of mourning, rather than of
festivity
.
At no time of life had Baptiste felt prouder than
on this occasion. As he approached, he frequently
cast a glance of delight upon his child, and then
raising
his eyes to his old friends, gave them an
inquisitive
look, which seemed to ask, is she not indeed the
pride of the village? Many a hearty greeting passed
between the old man and the villagers, among whom
were some who were conspicuous in the charevari,
on the night of his marriage, thirty years before.
Baptiste recalled that memorable event, and enjoyed
the recollection much more than he had the
circumstance
.
A seat intended as a sylvan throne was speedily
constructed, and Baptiste and his child were
escorted
to it with no little pomp and circumstance.
Frank was officious on this occasion, and, though an
hour of general joy, his countenance was evidently
troubled. Little Victor was delighted, as also was
his favourite watch-dog, and in the fulness of their
joy, the one laughed and the other barked and turned
somersets on the green together. During the
ceremony
a simple air was sung by the villagers. There
was one voice distinguished from the rest by the
richness
and wildness of its melody. It proceeded from
a young woman, who, in spite of both mental and
bodily suffering, still possessed no ordinary share of
beauty. Her tall and slender figure was covered by
a shapeless, black gown, which descended so low
that her feet were concealed, but still the perfect
symmetry of her person was discernible. From her
stately neck was suspended, by a string of large
black beads, a little silver crucifix, with the image
of our Saviour on it. Her dark hair hung in profuse
curls around her neck, and rested in the hood of her
dress, which at that time was thrown from her head.
There was a nervous quickness in her motions; her
eyes were wandering, the expression wild, and on
her lips, which were still beautiful, an unmeaning
smile seemed to be constantly playing.
The ceremony of presenting the pipe and cake
being
over, the assemblage was about to adjourn to the
cottage, when Frank inquired of the female just
alluded
to, who was at the time in a state of mental
abstraction,
Ninon, have you not your usual offering to make
to Claudine? The sound of his voice recalled her
wandering thoughts; she hastened to Claudine, and
presented her with a small cake, and a rich bouquet,
and said
If you have been an apt scholar, Claudine, you
may read my regard in this bunch of flowers; it has
been carefully culled. There is the amaranth, that
crowns all, the emblem of virtue; the budding rose
will stand for constancy, and the sprig of rosemary
that peeps between, bids you remember me. Here
is a cluster of heart's-ease she was going on
to illustrate the flowers, when Claudine interrupted
her
But where is the yellow jonquil?
The emblem of sorrow!
Ninon, my bouquet should have been composed
of the jonquil alone.
She descended; Baptiste invited his friends to
partake of an entertainment, and they moved
towards
the cottage.
Ninon Leclair was the only daughter of a wealthy
merchant of Quebec, and, on arriving at
marriageable
state, her father destined her to become the wife
of his partner in trade, who was at least three times
her age, and whose ruling passion was avarice.
Ninon
was accomplished both in mind and person,
consequently
such an unequal match could not fail to
be revolting to her feelings, even if her affections had
not been pre-engaged. The object of her passion
was well calculated to please a woman's eye, but not
to realize the golden dreams of her father, who soon
discovered the bias her sentiments had received. He
now strenuously urged a speedy marriage, with his
old friend and partner, which she as obstinately
resisted
,
and words losing their effect, Ninon was
finally consigned to the walls of a nunnery.
She bore her seclusion from the world with
resignation
,
for she looked upon herself as a martyr in the
cause of virtuous love, and was consoled with the
hope that the day would arrive when her constancy
would be rewarded. Her swain belonged to that
numerous class, who care not at what shrine they
bend, or in what creed they worship, and Ninon
being
out of sight, she was soon out of mind also, and
he married a friend of the lovely creature he had
forsaken
.
She bitterly mourned his faithlessness, and
as afflictions usually crowd upon the stricken, her
father died shortly after, without forgiving her
disobedience
.
The bulk of his property was bequeathed
to his partner, and a certain sum to his daughter, on
condition she married him, otherwise she was left
destitute. The old man made an offer of his hand,
which was rejected with scorn, and he left the
heart-broken
novice to console himself with his legacy.
Ninon still continued in the nunnery, and as her
earthly affections had been blighted, she devoted her
whole heart to heaven, but doubts constantly arose
whether the offering would be accepted, as she had
not made it until this world had lost all charms for
her. She dwelt upon the fearful trials undergone by
the several saints in her calendar, and felt her own
unworthiness when compared with their purity,
fortitude
,
and resignation. Her doubts increased with
study, and her distempered imagination clothed her
God in terrors. He appeared a jealous God, who
created but to punish, and weighed not the frailties
that his own hand had implanted in the bosom of his
creature. The stability of her mind was shaken,
and as she had not taken the veil, she left the
nunnery
to lead the life of a mendicant, and encounter
suffering, for she felt assured that our joys hereafter
will be in proportion to the severity of our trials
here. Since her arrival at the village, by her
amiability
,
piety, and sorrow, she had acquired the
respect
and compassion of all, and to none was she
dearer than to Claudine, who profited much by her
instruction.
During the entertainment, which Baptiste had
prepared
for the villagers in his garden, Frank, who sat
beside Claudine, urged her to taste of the present of
her favourite, Ninon, as her feelings might be
wounded
by apparent neglect. She replied
Ninon knows that I too highly value the giver to
slight the gift.
Ninon bowed her head in acknowledgment.
Claudine
broke the cake, and added, in a tone which only
reached Frank's ear
And as a proof of the value I set on it, I give one
half to him whom most I value.
Frank slightly recoiled as she presented it, and
replied
in a hurried low tone, accompanied with a
forced smile
True, the evil and good we should share alike,
Claudine, but the good be wholly thine.
She sighed in a voice scarcely above her breath
The evil we have shared indeed, and it is right
we also share this token of unmerited regard.
Frank remained silent; received one half of the
cake, and Claudine ate the other. Frank's
countenance
became distorted; his eyes were kindling with
fierceness, and his mind was evidently racked with
contending passions. Claudine perceived the change
without surprise, for she had of late been accustomed
to these sudden and violent transitions in his moody
disposition, from one extreme to the other.
What is it ails you? she inquired tenderly.
Nothing.
I fear you are ill.
Slightly; but what troubles me will speedily be
removed. He smiled, and Claudine would have
shuddered, had she not been accustomed to his smile.
She again pressed him to partake of Ninon's
present
.
No! he replied, it would but increase my
illness
.
But farewell, Claudine. He rose and left
the table: she followed him.
Do not leave me yet. Remember it is my
birth-day
,
and it rests with you to say whether I should
bless it or curse it.
Bless it, Claudine, bless it; though it has cursed
my earthly prospects, bless it.
That thought is a curse heavy enough to
outweigh
every blessing this world could bestow, she
replied, and wept.
Forgive me, Claudine, I am a selfish wretch,
unworthy
of your love. But the next time we meet
your mind shall be at rest.
You have promised me that so often!
I now swear it: I will place it beyond your power
ever to reproach me again.
And have I ever reproached you! If so, it was
not intended, and I ask your forgiveness. True, I
have troubled you with my griefs, but if I may not
unburthen
my heart to you, in whom else on earth may
I confide?
In none; for if our secret were divulged you
would be cut off from all the world but me.
I acknowledge the dreadful truth, but at times
when you are kind to me, I feel, that great as my
loss is, you are even more than all the world to me.
She fell on Frank's neck, and the plaintive tone
of her voice touched a chord that had seldom been
awakened. Tears stood in his eyes, which he hastily
wiped off, and said in a hurried voice
Farewell, Claudine, for the present, and look
forward
to happier hours.
I do, I doin the grave.
The last words, though scarcely audible, did not
escape Frank's ear, and he echoed them in the same
tone; Yes, in the grave. He pressed her to his
bosom and hurried away. Claudine stood gazing
after him until out of sight, then returned dejectedly
to the company, and resumed her seat at the table.
She had not been long seated before she became as
pale as death, and trembled violently. Ninon
observed
the change in her countenance, and
inquired
Are you ill, Claudine?
Deadly sick, she faintly replied, and supported
herself on the shoulder of the other who sat beside
her.
What has occasioned it?
I know not: something I have eaten, I fear. I
arose with a headache this morning, and now it feels
as if it would burst. My sight fails me, and I
tremble
.
Water, or I shall faint.
She drank, and Ninon bathed her temples.
I fell revived, continued Claudine, but still
deadly sick. While I have strength, pray assist me
to my chamber.
They retired from the table, and the company
dispersed
in consequence of Claudine's sudden illness.
Joy was an inmate in Baptiste's cottage in the
morning
,
but sorrow had driven her thence before the
close of the day. Claudine's illness increased, and
the fears of her doting father were wrought to the
highest pitch. Medical assistance was resorted to.
Days and weeks passed away, still she was confined
to her bed, and her recovery was doubtful. Ninon
seldom left her bedside, and by the most assiduous
attentions proved the affection she entertained for
the invalid. She read to her, and was the most
tender
and watchful nurse. Frank visited the cottage
but twice during the illness of Claudine. Finally,
her constitution surmounted the ravages of disease,
and she again rose from her bed, but was now little
else than the shadow of the beautiful creature, once
admitted to be the pride of the village. She had
not smiled since the commencement of her illness,
or in such sort as indicated more forcibly the utter
hopelessness of her affliction. She became fond of
solitary walks, and seclusion in some rustic bower.
Shortly after her recovery she went on an errand
to the village. Night closed in, and yet she returned
not. As the darkness increased, her father's
impatience
changed to alarm, for he could not assign any
satisfactory cause for her absence. It was not
probable
she was detained at any of the neighbours, for
she had not expressed such an intention, and
knowing
her father's affection, she was too considerate to
occasion him unnecessary anxiety.
The old man went to the village in search of her;
he called at every house she was in the habit of
visiting, but could gain no tidings of the stray one.
Some had seen her the day preceding, others a week
before, and others on that morning. This was all
he learnt, and he hastened towards his cottage with
a heavy heart, trusting, however, that she had
returned
during his absence. He opened the door
with a tremulous hand, entered, and looked anxiously
around the room.
Has she not returned?
Not yet, replied Victor, who was there
awaiting
the result of his father's search. Baptiste sunk
into a chair, and said, in a tone mingled with grief
and despair
Light the lantern, my sonsorrow has overtaken
me in my old days.
The lantern was speedily brought; the boy
whistled
for his dog, who slowly crawled from his kennel,
and they directed their course towards the margin
of the lake, for the fears of Baptiste suggested the
worst. The boy hurried on with the light, and the
father followed in silence, which was only broken
by his sighs. They walked near a mile along the
beach, the boy stopping at intervals, and raising the
lamp above his head to throw a light upon the
surface
of the water. The anxious father looked and
strained his eyeballs, until the intensity of his gaze
gave to every obscure object the outline of the image
that engrossed his mind. He remained for some
moments silent in this attitude, and at length cried
She is not here! and turned away with feelings
partaking of disappointment; for dreadful as even
such a discovery would have been, it could scarcely
have surpassed his agony of suspense. As the
enjoyment
of pleasure seldom equals the anticipation,
so the pang of dreaded sorrow, when endured, is
often found to be less acute than the apprehension.
They again moved on in silence; again paused and
raised the lantern. Baptiste gazed and trembled.
Father of mercies, what is that! Raise the light,
my son; higher yet; my old eyes are dim.
What is it you see, father?
Look there. Your eyes are young. Tell me, is
it my child; my dear Claudine?
Oh! no, father; your eyes deceive you again. It
is but the white surge. Cheer up, I soon will satisfy
you.
He called the dog to his side, at the same time
throwing a stick into the lake. The dog plunged
in and swam through the froth which had there
accumulated
.
Thank God! she is not here, exclaimed
Baptiste
.
We will search the meadow next.
They turned to execute this determination, when
a figure was indistinctly seen receding at a distance.
They hailed it, but no answer was returned.
Baptiste
conjured the person to stay and assist their
search, but he hurried on, and soon disappeared in
the obscurity of the night. The mastiff growled
VOL. II.7
and darted off in pursuit. He seized hold of the
fugitive, who fled with increased speed. The dog
became furious, and as the person fled he in vain
strove to beat the animal from him. He was now
closely beset, and, in his fear, called several times
to the dog by name. The dog then desisted; the
man patted him, made himself known, and hurried
away.
Whose voice is that? inquired Baptiste; I
know that voice as well as the voice of my own
child.
As I live, father, it was Frank Martin.
I thought so. But why should he avoid us, and
what does he out at this time of night?
You know, father, he is abroad at all hours,
trapping
and hunting; which I would not be if I were
rich as he is.
I now remember he was absent when I called at
his father's house in search of my poor Claudine,
said Baptiste. But why did he not answer when I
hailed him? Impossible it could have been he!
I know his voice well, replied Victor, and do
not think I am mistaken now.
Baptiste's heart felt like lead in his bosom; his
fears were increased, but the cause was undefined.
The fact that Frank had not answered them, if it were
he, was inexplicable; it wrought his apprehension
to the most fearful pitch; he knew not why he feared
or what he dreaded, but he knew enough of human
nature, and the course of human events, to
pronounce
the depression of his mind the infallible
precursor
of approaching sorrow. Baptiste implicitly
believed, as many others believe, that there are
times when the mind is permitted slightly to raise
the dark curtain which conceals the future, and
ascertain whether light or shade is to prevail. His
feelings on this occasion, proved truer to him than
the weird sisters to the thane of Cawdor.
The dog, with his nose alternately close to the
earth, and raised in the air, made a wide and rapid
circuit as if he were on the scent of some object.
He frequently gave tongue, and after traversing
the ground for some time, came to Baptiste, howled
piteously, appeared restless and darted off again in
the direction of the meadow.
Father, what ails Rover?he is on some strong
scent.
He scent's blood! exclaimed the father, in an
agony of fear.
The yelping of the dog continued at a distance:
Hark! the scent becomes stronger; he is on the
trail. Come, my son, let us follow him.
Do not give way to your fears, father. A fox or
a rackoon may have occasioned all this.
True, boy, true; but see, the dog is already back
again.
The dog came to his feet, looked up into his face,
howled, made a short and hurried circuit around
them, and darted off again.
He would have us follow him: come on, Victor.
They moved rapidly in the direction of the meadow;
the dog kept far ahead, but at intervals gave a short
bark, which served to guide them. They crossed the
meadow, and paused in their progress; for the dog
had not been heard for some time, and they knew
not which direction to take. A few moments of
doubt elapsed, when several short, hurried yelps
were given by the dog, as if he were close upon a
fresh scent.
Where is he now, my son?
As I judge from the echo, in the cypress hollow,
near the falls of the creek.
A wild and dreary place, sighed the father;
and the obtrusive thought flashed across his mind
a place fit for murder.
A piteous and protracted howl from the dog now
reached them: the sound was in unison with
Baptiste's
feelings.
His search is done, said Baptiste. Whatever
it is, the faithful brute has found it. Listen, Victor.
Do you know the spot?
He cannot be more than a quarter of a mile from
us. Hasten, father, and we will soon be there.
Your limbs are young and light, but mine are
old, and my heart is heavy. But move on, my son,
I will keep pace with you.
They hurried forward; the plaintive moan of the
dog continued, and as they entered the mouth of the
deeply overshadowed ravine, the faithful creature
appeared, and crouching at his master's feet, whined
and licked the hand extended to caress him.
Lead on Rover, and we will follow you, said
Baptiste. The dog continued to whine, but stirred
not. Victor urged him on the scent, but he was
spiritless.
Why Rover, do you not know me, Rover? See,
father, how he looks. What is it ails the dog?
I fear the worst; move on, Victor, this is the
path he came.
A little higher up, father, and we can cross the
stream more easily.
They followed the margin of the creek a short
distance, and having crossed it, entered into the
depths of the ravine. The dog preceded them,
slowly and dejectedly. The aged pines towered
loftily
,
and added their shade to the almost impenetrable
darkness of the night. The lantern carried by
Victor, served to discover the intricate path.
Having
walked some distance in silence, Baptiste
inquired
,
in a voice scarcely articulate, and hollow
with anxiety, Do you know where we now are, my
son?
Oh yes, sir, and Rover knows right well too; we
are on the way to the deer-lick.
Raise the lantern; the path is nearly overgrown
with laurel bushes.
The walking will become better when we pass
this rising, and draw near the basin of the creek.
What a wild and frightful place it is!
Even in day time, for seldom a single ray of the
sun reaches it, and at night it is indeed a fearful
place. They must love venison who venture here
at night to watch the licking.
They proceeded some distance farther, and having
crossed a slightly elevated piece of ground, entered
a dell where the creek had extended into a basin.
This spot was free from the underwood which had
heretofore obstructed the path of Baptiste and his
son. The old man paused: Hark! do I not hear
music, or have my senses already become
distempered
?
I hear nothing but the raven and her young on
the pine tree.
Again! It sounds like a hymn for the rest of
the departed.
Father, you frighten me.
Listen, boy. I hear it yet. What can it mean?
Are there spirits in the air, or does it proceed from
a human voice?
Victor trembled, and drew close to his father; the
dog did the same, and they observed a profound
silence until the voice ceased, when Baptiste hurried
towards the spot whence it proceeded. It came
from the margin of the basin, and as he drew near,
he indistinctly beheld a human figure seated on the
earth; he heard it sob; and when he called to it, a
shriek of terror was returned. The figure stood
erect; the light of the lamp fell upon it, and
discovered
a female form, which glided rapidly forward,
and disappeared in the intricacies of the wilderness.
What does all this mean? exclaimed the father.
I think, said Victor, it was Ninon Leclair.
I think so too, but she vanished from the glare
of the lantern before my old eyes could distinctly
see. The dog has left us.
He has not gone far: I hear his moan.
They were guided by the sound to the spot where
the dog stood, mourning over the object of their
search. The light of the lamp fell full upon the
pale features of the lovely Claudine, prostrate on
the earth.
7*
God of mercy, my child! exclaimed Baptiste,
and sunk beside her.
My sister Claudine dead! Oh, father, who has
done this?
Her cheek is cold as ice; her limbs are stiff.
See how her glossy hair is entangled, and her clothes
are bloody. Oh! my child, my child! He
groaned
as if his heart were breaking, and sunk upon the
corpse and kissed it repeatedly.
Raise her, father, from the cold earth;
something
may yet be done to save her.
Not in this world! From the cold earth! to that
she must soon return, for she is as cold as the earth
upon which she lies.
His voice was lost: his son knelt beside him, and
their tears mingled together on the body. The dog
whined, as if he participated in their affliction.
See here where the murderous wretch has
stabbed
her, exclaimed Baptiste, pointing to a rent in
the left side of her garment, which was stained with
blood as it spouted from the wound. And see, her
right hand is all cut! God! what a fearful struggle
she has had! My child, my child, why was I not
near you in your time of need!
Baptiste raised the body in his arms, Victor
preceded
with the light, and the dog followed
dejectedly
as they retraced their steps to the cottage. The
stricken father did not quit the body for an instant
during the night. The human heart will cling to
the excess of grief with even greater tenacity than
to the excess of joy. The following morning, Ninon
Leclair was arrested on suspicion of having
committed
the murder.
The day of burial having arrived, the mourners
slowly ascended the hill where were deposited the
remains of the first settlers of the village. Their
narrow abodes were designated by rough slate
stones, on which the names of the tenants were
rudely chiseled, while here and there might be
seen a polished marble slab, with a fulsome epitaph
upon it, as if the grave admitted of distinction, and
pride might be gratified even after the portals of
death had closed.
The mourners drew near to the newly-dug grave,
and the bier was placed beside it. The preacher
commenced his functions; the father listened to his
voice, and strove to subdue his feelings, but
consolation
administered at the grave, by those whose
affections have not been equally bruised, rather
aggravates
than allays the poignancy of grief.
At Baptiste's feet stood his dog, a mute but not
unconcerned spectator of what was passing. The
discourse being over, preparations were made to
deposit
the coffin. Baptiste and his son sobbed aloud.
Until the moment when the body is about to be taken
from the sight of the mourner for ever, he is
unconscious
of the full extent of his heart's desolation.
Baptiste bent forward and rested his hand upon
the coffin; Victor did the same, while the severest
pang they had yet experienced rent the heart of each.
A half-subdued groan indicated their deep mental
suffering. It was audibly responded by one of the
crowd, at some distance, who hurried towards the
grave. His looks were pale and haggard; his dress
neglected; his eyes inflamed and rolling wildly, and
the muscles of his face were in motion. He was the
picture of despair. As he approached, Baptiste
shrunk instinctively; the dog gave a warning growl,
and Frank, for it was he, looked at the dog, and
hesitated
whether to proceed or not. He paused but for
a moment; the dog kept his eyes fixed on him, and
continued to growl. Frank was sensible of his
danger
,
yet advanced and stretched out his right hand
to touch the coffin. The dog seized him; a struggle
ensued, and Frank fell to the ground. The dog
continued the attack, and it was with difficulty that
he was torn from the affrighted youth. During the
contest, a wild laugh was heard to proceed from one
of the spectators, which was followed by an
exclamation
Old Rover knows him well, I know him, and the
world shall know him too! The words were
uttered
by Ninon Leclair, who stood near the grave in
the custody of the jailer. She continued to laugh,
and as the dog worried the prostrate youth, she burst
forth in a shout of triumph
Well done, old friend! you are the true and sure
avenger! You wait not on the dull perception of
man, nor the tedious ceremonies of his courts of
justice
,
but act by never-failing instinct, and punish
on the spot. Well done! well done!
She still laughed and pointed at Frank, who
writhed
beneath the wild glare of her eye, more than he
had while under the fangs of the mastiff. Silence
prevailed in the assemblage, and he felt that all eyes
were fixed on him. He heard nothing but the
triumphant
laugh of Ninon, and the silence was
dreadful
;
every moment seemed an age. Ninon called
the dog to her, and patted him; he fondled on her:
she looked him full in the face, laughed, and pointed
at Frank. The dog growled and darted towards him,
but was driven back by those present.
He knows him, and justice will yet be satisfied,
and the guilty punished.
What does the idiot mean? exclaimed Frank.
That Claudine's murderer is known; that he will
be condemned before God and man; be punished in
this world and in the world to come.
The young man trembled like an aspen leaf, as he
said.
True, Claudine's murderer is known; you are
accused of the inhuman deed, and if not guilty,
where is the wretch?
There! exclaimed the other, deliberately
pointing
her finger at Frank, at the same time erecting
her tall and slender form. There, she repeated,
stands the trembling, conscience-stricken,
merciless
murderer!
Frank averted his face, tottered, and his limbs
could scarcely support him.
She raves! exclaimed several voices at the same
time. Frank's love for Claudine was known to all
the village, and his deep affiction, occasioned by her
death, was plainly indicated by his haggard and
woe-worn
countenance.
No, no, I am not mad, continued Ninon,
though I have experienced enough to make me so,
and he and the rest will pronounce me mad, yet I am
not mad.
After a pause, Frank said, in a faltering voice
Who is my accuser?
Ninon Leclair.
The accused the accuser!
He endeavoured to assume a smile of contempt,
but the woman fixed her penetrating eye upon him,
and the conflicting passions which rent his bosom
were partially depicted in his countenance, but
nothing
fully expressed; combined they presented an
object painful to look upon. Frank was conscious
of this, and averted his face. Ninon appealed to the
bystanders, and deliberately said,
Look there and judge; innocent or guilty?
Enough of this, neighbours, exclaimed one of
the villagers; it is not for us to listen to such a
shocking charge against one of the wealthiest, made
by one of the humblest among us.
True, I am the lowliest among ye, yet God
makes no such distinction, though man in his
wisdom
permits it to influence every thought and
action
.
She is crazed, said another, and knows not
what she says.
Those who obstinately close their eyes, and those
who were born blind, replied Ninon, possess
equally the powers of perception.
Jailer, lead her to her prison, said the man who
first spoke.
I return to my prison with a light heart. My
limbs are shackled for a time, but my soul is free;
then casting a look at Frank, she exclaimed, Thy
limbs are free, but thy soul is shackled with bonds
which time cannot eat awaythey last for ever.
She then moved towards the coffin, and bending
over it, murmured,
Unhappy, murdered Claudine! the grateful tears
of her you cherished are shed over you; receive
them, for they will shine more brilliantly than
diamonds
or pearls on your garment, in that world
where we shall soon meet again.
Ninon was taken back to the prison, the coffin
was deposited, the grave was closed, and the
villagers
returned to their homes. How changed was the
home of Baptiste! She who had made it all sunshine,
was shrouded in the gloom of the grave; her gentle
voice was hushed, and the cheering light of her eye
extinguished for ever; but she still retained her
influence
over the little circle of which she was the
centre, though that influence partook of her altered
condition.
At the next assizes Ninon Leclair was arraigned
and tried for the murder of Claudine, it having been
decided that she was of sufficiently sound mind to
be placed on her trial. Old Martin conducted the
prosecution. The evidence against her was strong,
both circumstantial and positive. Frank testified to
frequent evidences of marked dislike betrayed by
the prisoner towards the deceased; recalled to mind
the circumstance that Claudine was taken deadly
sick, and continued so, immediately after eating the
cake presented by Ninon on the birth-day of the
former, and suggested that the effect might have been
occasioned by poison.
Oh! monstrous! exclaimed the prisoner; he
knows that the cake was made at his father's house;
that his mother gave me the ingredients; nay,
assisted
in the making. But I know not she paused;
if poison was in it, he can best tell who placed it
there.
Frank shrunk at the implication, and proceeded in
his testimony with a faltering voice. He stated that
he was out on the night of the murder; that about a
mile from the village he had met the prisoner; that
sometime after he had heard a violent scream, but
sought in vain to ascertain whence it proceeded.
It is false, cried Ninon, you did not meet me,
though I had a faint glimpse of your figure. True,
you heard a scream, but well you knew the cause,
and from whom it proceeded. You heard a second
shriek, which you could not account for, and it
frightened you from your victim. I hastened to the
spot you had left, and found Claudine bleeding; she
was speechless; I raised her; her head reclined upon
my shoulder, and she breathed her last. My
situation
was fearful; my mind became a hurricane; the
rush and vividness of thought were too much for my
brain; a light suddenly flashed upon me, figures
appeared
,
and I instinctively fled from the scene of
horror
.
But mark, he confesses he was out at the hour
the murder was doing, and now let him state what it
was took him from the village at that hour.
I went to the licking, said Frank, to kill a
deer.
To kill a deer! true, and you did so, but one
more innocent than the spotted fawn.
Frank's father arose and asked the protection of
the court for the witness.
Baptiste inquired of Frank why he returned no
answer when called to, the night the dog pursued
him.
The question is irrelevant to the matter before
the court, replied his father, nor do we admit that
the individual pursued by the dog was the witness.
They proceeded in the examination. Baptiste and
his son testified as to their having found the prisoner
alone, with the dead body, and while it was still
bleeding, and that her garments were stained with
blood when apprehended.
The old man's voice against me, and the boy's
too, exclaimed Ninon, and laughed; it was the
unmeaning
laugh of an idiot. She sank upon the bench
in the prisoner's bar; and from that moment took no
note of what was passing. The elder Martin argued
the cause, and gave to the testimony such a
colouring
,
that an immediate conviction was the
consequence
.
The verdict being rendered, Ninon was
called to stand up. She looked about vacantly, and
the command was repeated.
Oh! I had forgot; I crave your pardon. I am in
a court of justice to answer to a charge of murder.
I now remember well.
Ninon Leclair, said the judge, after a patient
and impartial trial, you have been convicted of the
crime of murder.
What, is it all over? I did not think they would
have been so speedy. Murder! I that would not
harm an insect knowingly!
Due weight has been given, continued the judge,
to all advanced in your defence by your learned
counsel; and after mature deliberation your crime is
manifest, and so says the jury.
Then so it needs must be, said the prisoner,
without appearing conscious of what she was saying.
If they insist on it that I am guilty, be it so, for it
will only anger them in me to deny it.
Have you any thing to offer why sentence should
not be passed upon you?
Nothingbut let me think.
Take time to reflect, for after this hour we may
not hear you.
I have nothing. The meekest and the purest
that ever was on earth, suffered by the blindness and
iniquity of man, without complaint and without
resistance
;
and I am ready and willing to suffer too.
Sentence of death was passed upon her, and as the
words coldly fell from the lips of the judge, she
appeared
unconscious of their import. He concluded
with the pious wish, expressed for all criminals, but
frequently in such a manner, as if it were nothing
more than a mere legal form
God have mercy on your sinful soul, for there is
no hope for you in this world.
Amen! responded the stricken woman. God
have mercy on me, for there is none among men.
Her countenance was placid and she was resigned
to her fate. The court broke up, and as the prisoner
was led from the bar, she passed near Frank
Martin
.
He was absorbed in thought. She touched
him, and he shrunk as if he had been stung by a
viper.
Fear not, young man, she said, I have not the
power to harm you. You have triumphed before this
tribunal, where wealth is conclusive evidence of
innocence
and poverty of guilt: but remember, we shall
again be heard before a court, where the dross of
this world may not enter, and every thought is read
by the searching eye of the Eternal Judge.
Remember
!
She was led away, and Frank leaned on his father
for support, as they retired from the court-house.
The day fixed for the public execution of Ninon
at length arrived. The crowd assembled early to
witness the fearful exhibition. Ninon was conducted
to the gallows, and while beneath it she asserted her
innocence, but expressed no regret at leaving a
world, which for years had been one unbroken scene
of sorrow, and entertained but little fear as to her
future destiny. There was not an eye to shed a tear
for her, though there was not a more deserving and
less harmless being in the whole concourse present.
The executioner was about to perform his last office,
and the crowd was in breathless suspense, when a
horseman at a distance was seen riding at full speed
towards the spot. He shouted, and the executioner
paused. The horseman rode up to the gallows, and
cried aloud
She is pardoned, she is innocent, and here is the
governor's warrant to set her at liberty.
Ninon fainted at the shock occasioned by this
sudden change. Her mind was prepared to meet
death, but not to encounter again the ills of a life of
hopelessness. She was removed to Baptiste's cottage,
amidst the fruitless conjectures of the crowd, at the
manner in which the fact of her innocence came to
his knowledge who had never heard of her existence
until he signed her death warrant. The mystery
increased on returning to the village, and seeing
placards offering a reward for the apprehension of
VOL. II.8
Frank Martin, as the murderer of Claudine. Search
was made for him, but he had fled the country, and
no trace could be found of the course he had taken.
Baptiste lived to see his son Victor arrive at
manhood
,
but seldom smiled after the death of his
daughter. Among the best and purest feelings which
nature has implanted in the human breast, there is
not one so sublimated, partaking so exclusively of
heaven, as that which a fond father entertains for a
lovely and deserving daughter. He looks upon her
as the very essence of all that is good in him; even
more lovely than her who won his early affections,
when romance threw the richest colouring upon the
things of this world.
Ninon continued an inmate of Baptiste's cottage
until her death, which occurred about two years
after the events just related. The pride of the
Martin family was humbled by the public disgrace
of Frank, for like a baneful disease, disgrace, if it
touch but one member, extends to the whole body.
They removed to a remote part of the province,
where it was not probable the name of the fugitive
would ever be heard.
Thirty years after these events, on a fine summer
evening, while the village boys were playing among
the tombs in the grave yard, an old man suddenly
appeared, and approached the spot where Claudine
was buried. His figure was covered with a black
cloak, and his beard was gray and fell over his
bosom. He supported himself with a staff, and
trembled and wept as he bent over the grave. The
boys suspended their sports and timidly drew nigh
to him. One bolder than the rest, approached and
accosted him.
You appear tired, old man, and in sorrow.
Indeed I am both, my son, for I have travelled
far to-day.
Then come with me to my father's house, where
you may rest for the night and be comforted.
Bless you, my child, the poor man's blessing be
on you. Where is your father's house?
Not far from this. At the foot of yon hill on
which the cattle are grazing.
Ah!the old man trembled. Your name?
Victor Baptiste.
God of heaven! His agitation increased as he
asked, Know you whose grave this is?
Who in the village does not know! It is the
grave of my aunt Claudine, who was murdered by
Frank Martin, many years ago, in the cypress
hollow
;
and this beside it is the grave of my
grandfather
,
who, I am told, never smiled after her
death.
Generations may pass away, sighed the old
man, but crime is never forgotten. It is
perpetuated
from father to son, and tradition proves as
immutable
as recorded history. He turned to the
boyYour father is still alive?
Oh, yes: come with me and you shall see him in
a few minutes.
Not for the wealth of the world!Look at me;
describe me to him as I am; feeble, broken down in
body and in spirittell him where you found me
mourning, then give him this. He extended a
paper to the boy. God bless you, my child!I
leave you in a state of things where a pebble may
turn the whole current of your life awry, but as for
myself, old as I am, I return to the wilderness to
find my grave.
After a mental struggle which agitated his feeble
frame, he tottered from the yard and struck into the
most unfrequented path that led to the forest. In a
few moments he disappeared, and the boys returned
to the village. The paper on being opened, was to
this effect:
Providence has implanted in the human breast
passions which the weakness of our nature cannot
subdue, and which it is eternal death to the soul to
indulge; and as if our earthly career had not been
sufficiently prescribed and straitened by the divine
law, society has created distinctions, which, if
observed
,
literally verify the poet's dream, and render
the path to heaven through purgatory, even before
we have passed the confines of this world.
Why should man make distinctions which God
will not acknowledge! If intrinsic worth alone
were the standard of the human race, what a
multitude
of evils should we escape, since all would study
to become more worthy; but as it is, the best
feelings
of our nature are debased to acquire that which
alone elevates man in the estimation of the world.
But it is not for the guilty to arraign the decrees
of Providence, or call in question the justice of
human laws.
I was the victim of false pride. Having inflicted
a lasting injury on one of the best of God's
creatures
,
I feared to redress it, for the eyes of the world
were on me, and rather than encounter the judgment
of man, and be humbled in his sight, I trampled on
the laws of God, and became a devil.Oh,
Claudine
!I
attempted to poison her who loved me
most, and failing in this, inhumanly murdered her.
To screen my guilt, another was convicted through
my instrumentality. I calculated much on the
prejudice
created by the absurd distinctions among
men, and matters terminated as I foresaw. I had
the mind to plot and the hand to execute, but my
load of guilt already weighed like a mountain on
my soul. I dreaded an increase of the weight.
My brain became wild, and as the day appointed
for the death of my second victim approached, the
fever of my mind increased. I had already
sacrificed
every hope of happiness in this world, and
every hope in the next. The thought pursued me
night and day. The suffering and injured Ninon
was constantly before my sight. I resolved to save
her, but wavered, and when the time had nearly
elapsed, I wrote to the governor, confessing my
crime, and fled from justicebut let it not be
supposed
from punishment;an outcast on the face of
the earth, the never-dying worm was in my bosom:
death on the instant had been mercy, for cut off
from communion with my race, I held it with my
offended God alone in the wilderness. What
punishment
so appalling could be inflicted on a wretch so
guilty as I had been! But I trust a life of sincere
contrition may have atoned for an act, the
recollection
of which, even at this distant day, sinks my
soul in despair. Thus much I have written that you
may know I am still in existence, and to beseech
that your curse may be recalled before I die. Let
me quit the world reconciled, at least, with those
who are still living. I shall visit Claudine's grave
once more, that my slumbering feelings may be
roused to agony, and then in the wilderness await
the fearful day, which I feel is not far distant.
8*
THE DAUGHTER.
A PLAY, IN THREE ACTS.
DRAMATIS PERSON.
Count Rosenberg
,
Husband of Euphemia
.
Valmore
,
French Ambassador
.
Montalban
,
supposed father of Clara
.
Peter
,
Marcelle's Son
.
Euphemia
,
sister of the Grand Duke of Lithuania
.
Clara
,
under the name of Olympia
.
Marcelle
,
a Cottager
.
Peasants, Servants, Guards
.
ACT I.
Scene
I.
Rural ProspectFront of Marcelle's
cottage
View
of a chateau in the distance
.
Enter Clara, followed by Marcelle
.
Marcelle
.
Dear Olympia, do you still persist in
quitting the farm? Can you abandon without regret
those who so cordially received you?
Clara
.
No, good Marcelle, never shall I forget
your kindness in protecting a stranger to you; a
wretch without parentsdestitute and friendless.
Marcelle
.
Say not soyou have two sincere
friendsin the first place, there's myself.
Clara
.
Generous woman.
Marcelle
.
And in the next, the princess
Euphemia
.
Heaven bless her!No station in life is
exempt
from sorrows, and she has had her share.
Though the sister of our sovereign, the grand duke
of Lithuania, for fifteen years was she secluded in
a convent; but since the death of her father, she has
returned to the world, and at present inhabits
yonder
chateau. She visits her vassals more frequently
of late; and it is to you, my child, that we are
indebted
for this honour, for I plainly see she has
serious
views in relation to your welfare.
Clara
.
Ah! if you love me, frustrate a project so
contrary to my wishes.What shall I do?
Marcelle
.
You will not reject her friendship?
Clara
.
Not thatO! not that! But I shall resist
with firmness all attempts to draw me back to a
world where I again may never appear.
Marcelle
.
Always the same language! Is it
natural
at your age to entertain such aversion to society?
Clara
.
Society has cast me from its bosom!
Marcelle
.
So young, and yet so wretched! What
has occurred to call forth so severe a destiny?
Clara
.
O! cease!My soul sickens at the bare
recollection.
Marcelle
.
Speak to me, Olympia.Look upon me
as a mother, and do not reject the consolation my
love may afford you.
Clara
.
Yes, yesI will confide in you. Your
attachment merits my confidence. Hear, then, a
secret that should perish with us in the eternal
darkness
of the grave. Olympia, whom you treat so
affectionatelywhom you love as your own child
is no other than the wretched Clara, whose supposed
crime is known to all Europe, and who may yet be
condemned to a death of infamy, to save a wretch
whom her conscience will not permit her to
denounce
.
Marcelle
.
What is it I hear?
Clara
.
Spurn me,cast me from youimitate the
rest of the world!
Marcelle
.
Never! Poor unfortunate, proceed.
Clara
.
I was on the eve of being married to the
most worthy of men,the Count de Valmore. He
had a child, called Julian, by a former wife. I loved
them bothGod knows how truly I did love them!
My father was apprised that the whole of the
count's fortune was entailed upon his son, which
induced him to withhold his consent to our union.
Marcelle
.
'Twas ever the way with the calculating
world.
Clara
.
I was at that time at de Valmore's chateau
with his sister. My father was at Paris, and,
profiting
by circumstances that detained de Valmore at
court, he wrote, directing me to hold myself in
readiness to quit the chateau, and fixed the day and
hour when he would himself come for me. I
resolved
to submit, though obedience drove me to
despair
.
At length the fatal day arrived. Amidst
my preparations to depart, I had given the governess
of Julian a commission, that required her absence.
The dear child slept in a pavilion apart from the
chateau. I arose with the dawn, wishing to caress
him for the last time. The governess had already
departed. As I approached the pavilion, I
perceived
a man entering the door. I recognised him,
in spite of his disguise, and followed, but he was
too intent upon the crime he meditated, to observe
any thing else than his victim. I trembled, and,
fearing to be seen, concealed myself beneath a table
covered with a cloth; but was scarcely there, when
he returned from the chamber, his manner wild, and
his eyes darting fire. He fled, without perceiving
that any one was near him, and as he passed,
mechanically
threw a bloody poniard under the table,
and left the pavilion.
Marcelle
.
Gracious heavens! he did not kill the
child!
Clara
.
The bloody weapon fell upon my
garments
at
that sight my heart recoiled with horror.
I rushed to aid the poor boy, but my strength failed
me, and I fell senseless in the middle of the
apartment
.
Marcelle
.
Unhappy Clara!
Clara
.
The governess returned, and her shrieks
soon attracted the domestics to the spot. They
discovered
Julian assassinatedthe poniard by my
side,and my garments stained with blood. I was
recalled to life by their maledictions, and the
injuries
they heaped upon me. I was accused; and, O,
God! even Valmore himself, deceived by
appearances
,
was among my accusers. I was arraigned,
tried, and condemned, and should have suffered by
the hand of the public executioner, had not
powerful
friends, who did not deign to recognise me in my
shame, succeeded in changing my sentence to
perpetual
imprisonment.
Marcelle
.
And how did you escape from prison?
Clara
.
I know not. The unseen hand that had
my sentence commuted removed me to my father's
chateau of Rosmal on the Rhone, where I was kept
in close confinement.
Marcelle
.
You have said that you recognised the
assassin of Julian. Why not denounce him, and
save yourself?
Clara
.
Never!They may tear me piecemeal on
the rack, but never shall his name escape my lips.
Never!
Marcelle
.
You say your father was not at the
chateau
.
Clara
.
He did not appear at the day and hour
appointed.
Marcelle
.
I see it all. You are the victim of filial
piety, for it is not in nature to undergo such
sufferings
but in a parent's cause.
Clara
.
Marcelle, what a thought!be careful not
to divulge a suspicion so terrible.
Marcelle
.
I know enough to sympathise with you,
but too little to hazard an accusation. Depend on
my prudence. Your heroism, dear Olympia, towards
a father whom I believe guilty, endears you to me
more than ever. The only request I have to make
is, if you persist in rejecting the protection of the
princess Euphemia, that you will still remain with me.
Clara
.
Can you ask it, in spite of the prejudice
against me?
Marcelle
.
Where the heart is concerned prejudice
loses its influence.You will remain?
Clara
.
I will remain.
Enter a Peasant
.
Peasant
.
News, Marcelle, news. The Count
Rosenberg is hourly expected at the chateau, from
Paris.
Marcelle
.
And my son Peter?
Peasant
.
Has already arrived, and brings the
news.
Marcelle
.
Is it possible!How is it I have not
seen him yet?I flattered myself I should have been
the first.
Peasant
.
Here he comes, as gay and lively as
ever.
Enter Peter, followed by peasants
.
Peter
.
What a stupid pump you are. I would
have finished my travels with theatrical effect; taken
them by surprise, and all that. But by your
confounded
hurry, you have made my arrival as flat as
my old mother's stale beer, and be dd to you.
Marcelle
.
Do I see you at last, my dear Peter?
Come to my arms.
[
embraces him
.
Peter
.
That's right. Another hug, old lady.
Here I am, fresh from Paris, and with a budget of
stories that will amaze you for the rest of your days,
I promise you. Another hug. Bless your old heart.
Marcelle
.
I am glad to see you so happy; and no
doubt you have many fine things to tell us about
Paris.
Peasants
.
O! let us hear all about Paris.
Peter
.
To the girls who crowd around him
.]
Be quiet, girls, don't pester me. Paris! bless your
ignorance, I have been at Madrid, Naples, Venice,
Rome,saw the pope's holy toe,in a word, have
run over Europe and Asia.
Marcelle
.
And Africa and America.
Peter
.
Not exactlyI was satisfied with seeing
those places on a map. But of all places, France
is the place for spirit, fun, and folly. Ah! there are
fine fellows in France! They do nothing all day
long but laugh, dance, and chatter like the devil.
In Paris you may see men of all complexions
costumes
of all nations. It's a menagerie of strange
animals. There are honest men dressed as ragged
as knaves, and pickpockets as gay as princes; beaux
as proud as peacocks, and damsels as tender as
turtle-doves
;
husbands devoid of curiosity, and wives
who have a vast deal. But the cooks! God bless
the cooks! They will dress you a dish fit for an
emperor's palate out of a pair of postilion's boots,
and no epicure could tell a rat from a rabbit when it
has passed through their hands. O! delicious! God
bless the cooks!that's my maxim.
Marcelle
.
The count's departure was sudden.
What occasioned it?
Peter
.
A terrible business! Don't exactly know
what; but it relates to the daughter of a certain
Montalban. Shocking affair!
Clara,
(apart.)
My father!
Peter
.
She was in love with a young gentleman,
who had an infant child by a former wife. She
liked the young man well enough; but the child was
not altogether to her fancy, and so to get rid of it
she killed it. That was her maxim.
Marcelle
.
Seriously!
Peter
.
To be sure! Zounds! you don't think she
would stick a dagger in its heart merely by way of
a joke? No joke in that.
Clara,
(apart.)
I must retire. My grief will betray
me.
[
Going
.
Marcelle
.
Stay, dear Olympia.
Clara
.
I am unwell. Permit me to withdraw.
Marcelle.
(to Clara.)
Imprudent girl, conceal
your agitation. Sit down.
[Clara sitspeasants range around her.
Peter
.
Faith, mother, that's a confounded pretty
creature. Eh! but what ails her?
Marcelle
.
Your recital has made her ill; she is
so sensitive.
Peter
.
Well, well, I'll say no more about it. I
wouldn't distress so sweet a girl for the best dinner
in Paris. Now, mother, I would bet my life that
she could never be guilty of the crime of that
wretched
Clara.
Marcelle
.
Hold your tongue, babbler.
(To
Clara
.)
Be calm.
Peter
.
And do you know, they say she was as
beautiful asasa haunch of venison, or a roasted
pig with apple sauce.
Marcelle
.
Beautiful, I believe; but culpable,
impossible
!
(To peasants.)
Am I not right, my friends?
Is it in nature that one so lovely should be so
wicked
?
What say you, Olympia?
(Apart to Clara.)
Courage, courage.
Clara
.
I thinkas you do.
Marcelle
.
Then I am certain. And I must say
to you Peter, if you have no other news to tell us,
you have travelled to little purpose, and had better
hold your tongue.
Peter
.
Why how you fly out, mother!Hold my
tongue! I will until dinner time. But what's the
matter?
Marcelle
.
I defend the truth and honour of my sex.
Peasant
.
Make way for the Princess.
Marcelle
.
Go, and render to her the honours which
her benevolence and protection merit.
[Exeunt Peasants and Peter.
Stay, dear Olympia.
Clara
.
Permit me to retire.
Marcelle
.
Nay, nay remain, and assume an air
more calm and collected in the presence of the
princess
.
Enter Euphemia and attendants, followed by Peter and
Peasants
.
Euphemia
.
Thanks my friends. I am flattered
by the reception you give me.You repay with
usury the benefits I have conferred upon you.Still
you are under no obligation to me for this visit. It
was intended less for you than for the amiable
Olympia
.
I wish the pleasure of being alone with her.
Peter
.
[
Wishing to speak and Marcelle
preventing
him
.]
Mother be quiet.If my lady the
princess
would permit a faithful servant of her husband
to present his respectful homage before he retires,
there would not be a happier dog unhung in
Lithuania
.
Euphemia
.
And where is this faithful servant?
Peter
.
[
to his mother
.]
Can't you be quiet, old
woman.I am the man, your highness.The
count's confidential groom in chief, and principal
postilion in particular.
Euphemia
.
And above all son of Marcelle.It is
well; I shall not forget you.
Peter
.
My business is settled. True, I may live
a poor devil, but I shall die a great man at last.
Girls, you see how it is.Permit me to honour you.
[Exit Peter, strutting; peasants following.
Marcelle
.
[
to Clara
.]
Suppress your feelings.
Euphemia
.
Leave us, good Marcelle, and see that
no one approaches to interrupt us.
[Exit Marcelle, regarding Clara.
Euphemia
.
I am at a loss, dear Olympia, to define
the sentiments I entertain for you. The first
moment
I beheld you, you inspired me with the most
lively interest, and every succeeding interview has
tended to increase my attachment for you. We
must not part.
Clara
.
Ah! madam, I am sensible how much I
am honoured by your kindness, but I would avoid
the brilliant sphere to which you would remove me.
A court is no place for one so humble as I am.
Euphemia
.
You were formed to adorn any sphere
in which fate may place you. But you would
sojourn
at court but a short time: it is with me I would
have you pass your days, at the chateau, devoted to
retirement and friendship.
Clara
.
What generosity! But madam you do not
perceive all the difficultiesall the dangers!
VOL. II.9
Euphemia
.
Listen, while I make known to you
my source of grief, after which mark of confidence
you may be induced to accept my offer. It is now
twenty years since I was secretly married to Count
Rosenberg.Six months had passed in a delirium of
joy, when a prince demanded my hand of my father.
The Count despairing of ever obtaining the
consent
of my family, proposed a secret marriage. I
hesitatedtrembledbut finally consented. His
chaplain, one of my maids, and a friend of the
Count's were the only witnesses to our union.I
refused
the prince who solicited my hand, and my
father became indignant at my refusal.An infant
daughter, the fruits of my alliance with the Count,
betrayed my secret.My father, exasperated, issued
orders that my husband should be arrested, my child
taken from me, and that I should be immured in a
cloister for the rest of my days.
Clara
.
And had they the inhumanity to separate
you from your babe.
Euphemia
.
They had. My husband disguised
himself for a long time, less for the purpose of
evading
his pursuers, than to discover where our infant
was concealed. He was successful, and escaped
with our little treasure into France. I remained
alone to encounter the resentment of an irritated
father. My prayers, my tears availed nothing; he
would never approve of my marriage, and until his
death, I continued ignorant of the fate of my
husband
and my child.
Clara
.
My heart bleeds for you.
Euphemia
.
The Count then went to Paris. Alas!
what bitter disappointment awaited him there! He
apprised me by a letter, blotted with his tears and
dictated by despair, that he had arrived just in time
to receive the dying breath of our child.I had
beheld
her but once, and but once had embraced this
precious pledge of an attachment so ardent yet so
cruelly tried.
Clara
.
You indeed have cause to mourn.
Euphemia
.
The first act of my brother, on being
invested with my deceased father's power, was to
approve of my marriage, and at the same time he
appointed the Count to terminate certain differences
with the court of France. This negotiation
detained
him six months, which has at length been
crowned
with success, and I now await his returnbut he
comes without my child. This is the source of my
sorrow; this is the reason why I indulge in
solitude
.
Enter Marcelle
.
Marcelle
.
A stranger who appears fatigued by a
long journey, hearing at the chateau that you were
here, begs permission to approach you.
Euphemia
.
A stranger! Did he tell you his name?
Marcelle
.
No madam. His figure is enveloped in
a cloak; and his hat is drawn over his eyes, so that
I could not perceive his countenance, but he assures
me that you know him.
Euphemia
.
I cannot receive him here, at this
time.
Clara
.
He is a stranger, worn down with fatigue.
Perhaps some unfortunate who stands in need of
immediate succour.Let me not for an instant delay
your charity.Permit me to retire.
Euphemia
.
Marcelle, bid him approach.
[
Exit
Marcelle
.]
Always kind and compassionate,
Olympia
,
our interview has redoubled the interest I feel
for you.Reflect upon the propositions I have made.
I would share with you what felicity is left me, and
henceforth let me possess your entire confidence.
Clara
.
I can refuse you nothing.
Enter Marcelle and Montalban at the back of the stage.
Clara takes Euphemia's hand and kisses it.
Euphemia
kisses her on the forehead.Marcelle
approaches
Clara.Montalban recognises her, makes
a gesture of surprise, and exclaims apart
Montalban
.
Good heavens, Clara here!
[
Clara makes an obeisance to Euphemia: Montalban
menaces her with gestures
.]
Marcelle
.
Come, my dear Olympia.
Montalban
.
[
apart
.]
Olympia! I breathe again.
She has disguised her name, and the Princess knows
nothing.
[
Exit Clara with Marcelle. Euphemia makes a sign
to Montalban to approach. He takes off his hat and
throws his cloak on a bench
.
Euphemia
.
Is it possible! Montalban!
Montalban
.
Yes, madam; that wretched father,
known to a scoffing world by his shame and his
misfortunes
.
Euphemia
.
What service can I render you.
Montalban
.
Learning that Count Rosenberg has
returned from Paris, I would ask of his humanity
assistance to enable me to pass over into England,
as a last refuge from the opprobrium that pursues me
here.
Euphemia
.
Your claim upon my kindness is not
forgotten. You were the friend of my husband and
the witness to our marriage, and I hear that the
vengeance
that Heaven poured upon us has not escaped
you.
Montalban
.
Ah! madam, if it was a crime to have
assisted at your nuptials, Heaven has indeed
punished
me severely for it.More so than yourselves.
Your daughter was cut off in the flower of her youth;
she lived beloved and died deplored; but mine, by
her crimes, has brought ceaseless agony to my heart,
eternal shame upon my head.No resting place is
left to me.I mourn her, living, blackened with
opprobrium
never to be effaced;I would that it had
been granted to me to weep for her in the tomb
where her virtues were recorded.
Euphemia
.
Yes, Montalban, I have learnt your
griefs from my husband, and acknowledge that they
are far greater than my own.
Montalban
.
[
apart
.]
So, the Count has kept his
word.
Euphemia
.
You were acquainted with my
daughter
:
Do you not know to whom her father entrusted
her during his absence?
Montalban
.
[
apart
.]
Invention aid me.He
placed her in one of those religious asylums where
infants are protected.
Euphemia
.
And did you see her at times?
Montalban
.
But seldom. The war occasioned my
absence from Paris for years.
Euphemia
.
Did she ever learn the name of her
mother?
Montalban
.
Never.Neither that of her father
nor her mother.It would not have been prudent to
have entrusted a secret of such importance to one so
young.
Euphemia
.
Poor child! Poor child!
Montalban
.
Her father saw her only in her tender
infancy, and were she now alive, it is more than
possible
he would not recognise his own child.
Euphemia
.
What a destiny!Return to the
chateau
,
and you will there see the Count. Explain to
him the motives of your voyage, and we will devise
means to serve you. I have some orders to leave in
this cottage and must part from you for the present.
Montalban depend upon my friendship.
[Exit into the cottage.
Montalban
.
How embarrassing is my situation!
Clara here! and I behold her receiving a kiss from
the lips of her mother! Fortunately I possessed
sufficient
presence of mind to conceal my confusion at
this unexpected interview.But how is it that I find
her here, and whence arises this affection that
Euphemia
entertains for her?When the Count, the
better to conceal the mystery of her birth required
that she should pass for my child, he exacted an oath
that I should never hint, even to her, that she was
otherwise.Still Clara is with her mother; and if
Rosenberg, surprised by the weakness of his nature,
should betray the secret, I am irretrievably lost.
She saw me commit the crime for which she suffers.
My fate hangs by a single hair.They come.I
must find some pretext to speak to her.
[Draws his cloak around him.
9*
Enter Marcelle from the cottage, and Peter by the back
entrance
.
Peter
.
Mother, I feel the elements of a great man
strong within me. I shall magnify the family yet.
If you desire a place at court, say so, and a word
from me will do the business. Speak quick.
Marcelle
.
Peter, you're a fool.
Peter
.
I know it, and have heard so daily for these
twenty years; but that's no stumbling block to a
man's preferment. A fool for luck you know,
mother
.That's
my maxim.But who have we here?
Marcelle
.
[
to Mont.
]
I hope sir you were satisfied
with the reception the princess gave you.
Peter
.
Ha! a petitioner to the princess!I am
your man in that quarter.We are all going to the
chateau with the lovely Olympia, and we shall have
rare sport there, I tell you.You had better make
one of the party.Consider yourself invited.
Montalban
.
[
abstracted
.]
True, true, I should
return there.
Peter
.
To be sure you should.There will be a
grand fete in honour of my arrival and the Count's.
And such eating and drinking!You must come
along if it is for the pleasure of seeing what sleight of
hand I have in playing with a knife and fork.
Marcelle
.
Hold your tongue, blockhead! I
believe
you only live to eat.
Peter
.
I am a Lithuanian to the very gizzard,
mother, and love good living. It is natural. A man,
you know, must eat to live, and when he finds good
sauce to his food, it is as well to reverse the order
of things and live to eat.That's my maxim.
Marcelle
.
[
to Mont.
]
If you are so disposed, join
the villagers, and they will conduct you to the
chateau
.
In the meantime I must assist Olympia in
arranging
the handsome dresses with which the
princess
presented her.
Montalban
.
It appears that she entertains a lively
friendship for that young woman.
Marcelle
.
And deservedly.
Montalban
.
She is apparently an orphan, and yet
you treat her with the affection due to a child.
Peter
.
My old mother has a heart of pure gold
a real jewel!but 'tis n't every one has the key to
it.
Marcelle
.
Olympia has gained the affection of all.
She is goodness personified.
Montalban
.
[
with joy
.]
Providence then has
conducted
me to this spot.
Marcelle
.
How! Explain.
Montalban
.
I have made a long journey to solicit
a favour from the princess. She has neither granted
it, nor denied; but if my petition were seconded by
one so young and innocent as Olympia, I might
succeed.
Peter
.
You are right; but if she fails, apply to
me, and the business is settled.
Montalban
.
Might I with confidence entrust a
secret of importance to her?
Marcelle
.
I can answer for her. She has given me
proofs of her discretion.
Montalban
.
Will you afford me an opportunity of
speaking a few moments with her, alone.
Marcelle
.
Alone! And why alone!
Peter
.
Curse his impudence! As independent as
a turnspit in the kitchen.
Montalban
.
I have secrets to impart that I would
be loath to make known in the presence of a third
person. What has she to fear? You will be near us.
Marcelle
.
Your wishes shall be complied with.
Come along, Peter.
Montalban
.
[
apart
.]
So far success attends me!
Peter
.
But, mother, what are you about? No man
should ever be left alone with a pretty woman.
That's my maxim.
Marcelle
.
Come along. I will call Olympia, and
in a moment she will be with you. Come Peter.
Peter
.
I don't half like that black muzzled fellow.
[Exeunt Marcelle and Peter into cottage.
Montalban
.
This interview is of vital importance
to me. She comes, and alone! Let me guard against
too sudden a surprise.
Enter Clara
.
Clara
.
Is it true, sir, that you require my interest
with the princess? Speak without restrant. She
has honoured me with her friendship, and I shall
esteem it a happiness if the first favour I ask shall
prove to the advantage of the unfortunate.
Montalban
.
Her presence troubles me, in spite of
myself!
[
aside
.]
Clara
.
Say, in what manner can I serve you?
Montalban
.
They have given me so touching a
picture of your sensibility
Clara
.
That voice!
Montalban
.
That I could not resist the desire of
being known to you.
[
discovers himself
.]
Clara
.
My father! O! heavens, I am lost!
Montalban
.
Collect yourself, my child, and think
of the fatal consequences that must follow this
interview, if they suspect the cause that leads to
it.
Clara
.
Open earth, and bury me!
Montalban
.
Collect yourself, I say, and answer
my questions. When I obtained from the French
government the favour to remove you from the prison
to which you were condemned for the rest of your
days, and transfer you to my chateau at Rosmal,
under a pledge to keep you in close confinement,
wherefore did you escape from those who had you
in custody, and by what means?
Clara
.
By the assistance of a man whose heavenly
example is my greatest consolation in the midst of
my sorrows.
Montalban
.
And that man was Father Anselmo?
Clara
.
It was.
Montalban
.
Do you know to what your flight has
exposed you, and me also? You cannot be ignorant
that even here you are liable to be dragged again
before the dreadful tribunal of justice.
Clara
.
Again! O! not again, great God!
Montalban
.
But there is still a way to escape
their severity. The means are in my power.
Clara
.
Name it. O, name it.
Montalban
.
Consent to follow me.
Clara
.
[
shrinking
.]
Ah! follow you!
Montalban
.
Your safety depends upon it.
Clara
.
Never! Death sooner!
Montalban
.
What! in a loathsome prison!
Clara
.
Aye, in a prison, or on the rack; in any
shape, still I say death sooner!
Montalban
.
Misguided girl, do you forget the
duty that you owe me?
Clara
.
Duty! It is for that, and that only.
Respect
for a father's name has compelled me to endure
with patience this dreadful weight of opprobrium
and wrong. But thanks to your barbarity, you heap
no more upon me. Rest satisfied. You have
sacrificed
me yourself, and I know it. I am degraded
enough to ensure your safety; but urge me no
farther, for the ties by which nature bound us
together
at length are broken forever.
Montalban
.
I sacrificed you! What can you
mean?
Clara
.
Ask your own heart, and it will answer
you.
Montalban
.
And can you suppose me guilty of
the frightful crime for which you suffer?
Clara
.
Had I ever doubted it, that question would
have convinced me.
Montalban
.
Horrible! a child to accuse a father!
Clara
.
Had you not been conscious of the danger
of such an accusation, you would never have taken
so much care to prevent my escape. Alas! I had
the weakness to attempt to awaken your sympathies,
believing that overwhelmed with remorse, and
humiliated
by your crime, you would at least have
given those tears to my misfortunes, that even a
stranger would not refuse to suffering humanity.
But no; you were as insensible as stone, and in
spite of the sacrifice I had made, you are fearful
that my courage at length may fail, and now
meditate
my total ruin.
Montalban
.
Have I merited this!
Clara
.
True, you obtained my enlargement from
the prison where I was doomed to perish; but not
out of compassion for my sufferings, but that you
might the more readily secure your own safety
by poison, which was prepared for my lips at the
chateau of Rosmal.
Montalban
.
O, my child! What monster has made
you credit a tale so horrible!
Clara
.
The confidant whom you selected to fulfil
your purpose. Fortunately that wretch, still
retaining
some feeling of pity, not wholly extinguished by
your bribes and promises, acquainted me with your
design. I contrived to acquaint Father Anselmo,
and by the means of money, so potent in the hands
of villains, that good man succeeded in saving the
innocent.
Montalban
.
And have you suffered yourself to be
duped by an artifice so gross! It is plain that this
mercenary wretch excited your terrors in order to
make you pay dearly for a service that he would not
render gratuitously.
Clara
.
I admit that his motives were mercenary,
still fatal experience satisfies me of the probability
of his story, shocking as it appears.
Montalban
.
I pity your sufferings, and pardon a
suspicion that your fears have created. Have you
decided what course to take?
Clara
.
I have told you my resolution, and shall
persist in it till death.
Montalban
.
Your character is changed.
Clara
.
Not changed, but strengthened by
adversity
.
Montalban
.
Father Anselmo is in his grave; on
what do you depend?
Clara
.
My innocence and the princess.
Montalban
.
The princess! But when she hears
your story
Clara
.
And how will she hear it? Will you betray
me?
Montalban
.
Never! But how can it be concealed
when every passing breeze is tainted with it.
Clara
.
Then, sir, it will become your duty to do
me justice. But, alas! that is an act too noble for
such a heart as thine.
Montalban
.
Do you forget to whom you speak?
Clara
.
No, sir; nor do I forget the advantage that
my knowledge gives me over you. Be advised in
time, lest you weary out my patience by your
persecutions
,
and, driven to madness, I point out the
proper victim for the axe of justice.
Montalban
.
Clara!My child!
Clara
.
That word, which should not escape a
father's lips but with tenderness, can only awaken
in your bosom recollections the most terrible. Man,
what a frightful picture have you created, and yet
appear insensible to the magnitude of its horror!
A guilty father, who, by the blackness of his crimes,
has poisoned the holy fountain of affection, and filled
the bosom of his child with bitter hate!A father,
aware that his dreadful secret's known, and that he
is dependent on the forbearance of a persecuted
child to save him from a death of infamy; and yet
you have the boldness to confront me even here.
Again I caution you; be advised in time.
Montalban
.
And dare you thus brave my
authority
!
Clara
.
I owe you no obediencenothing but a
life of wretchedness and shame; and, in saving you
from a death of shame, I have heavily repaid the
debt. Hear me, and reflect well upon what I say,
before you adopt any course in relation to me. A
woman who has the courage to suffer herself to be
conducted even to a scaffold to save a guilty father,
may summon sufficient fortitude to resist oppression.
In immolating myself for you, I have fearfully
exercised
the deplorable right of disposing of my fate; I
shall continue to exercise it to the last,it depends
on you whether I crush others in my ruin, or fall
alone. Farewell. Live happily if you can, and
forget
a wretched being who has renounced all on earth
to save her father.
[
exit
.
Montalban
.
Do I dream!so changed!There's
nothing more to hope from her submission!I tread
upon an earthquake!Something must be done, and
quickly. The count!They must be separated as
far as this world will admit.I'll seek the count
seas, seas must flow between them!
[
exit
.
ACT II.
Scene
I.
A gallery at the chateau
.
Enter Euphemia and Count Rosenberg
.
Rosenberg
.
My dear Euphemia, how sensibly am
I touched by these marks of your affection! Every
thing breathes new life at my appearance, and seems
to be animated by your sentiments for me.
Euphemia
.
Yes, my lord, even the humblest
villager
participates in the happiness I find in your
return
after so long an absence.
Rosenberg
.
I revel in delights. But if you would
indulge me, postpone your preparations for a fete
until the arrival of the Marquis de Valmore. He
is on his way to France, with a treaty recently
ratified
by our sovereign, and is unwilling to quit
Lithuania
without first paying his respects to you. He
may be hourly expected.
Euphemia
.
Alas! if our child were still living,
that I might have the joy of dividing between you
the tenderness that fills my heart at this moment.
Rosenberg
.
O! harrowing thought! Banish a
reflection
so distressing. Your child is no more.
Look upon her death as the last punishment that
Heaven will inflict upon us.
Euphemia
.
The severest, though it may not be
the last. That blow has prepared me for whatever
else may follow.
Rosenberg
.
Your grief is natural, but your tears
awaken in my heart thoughts that time can never
obliterate, and such as I have not the courage to lay
open to your eyes. Spare my feelings, cease to
cherish
your own sorrows, and thank Heaven that you
were distant from the wretched scene of which I
was a witness.
Euphemia
.
Were her last moments then so awful.
Rosenberg
.
For heaven's sake change the
discourse
.
Tell me who is that young person whom
you have mentioned to me so frequently in your
letters
?
Do you know any thing respecting her birth?
Euphemia
.
Nothing more than that she is of
French origin. She has been three months at
Marcelle's
cottage, where, by accident, I first met her.
Her noble and modest demeanour interested me,
and every succeeding interview tended to deepen
the impression. Her image is constantly in my
mind; her virtues have penetrated my heart; and,
with the exception of the love I bear you, there is
no feeling more powerful than my attachment for
this lovely orphan.
Rosenberg
.
I trust she may prove worthy of your
good opinion.
Euphemia
.
I do not doubt that you will approve
of my predilection. I wish a friend, who can
reciprocate
my regard, and in some measure supply
the place of the unfortunate we have lost.
Rosenberg
.
Your wishes shall always be a law to
me.
Enter a Page
.
Page
.
A stranger desires to speak to the count.
Euphemia
.
Ah! show him in. It is Montalban
your old friend.
Rosenberg
.
Montalban!
Euphemia
.
I recommend this unfortunate father
to your sympathy.
VOL. II.10
Rosenberg
.
He has it. I feel for himO! God,
how exquisitely!
Euphemia
.
The fte shall be delayed until the
arrival of de Valmore, and I will give orders that
he may be received in a manner worthy of his rank.
As soon as Olympia arrives, I shall take occasion
to present her to you.
[
Going out meets Montalban, and makes a sign to him
to approach her husband
.]
exit
.
Rosenberg
.
You here!
Montalban
.
I came to tax your friendship for the
last time, and was far from thinking that my
presence
here would be so essential to your peace.
Rosenberg
.
What have you done with that
wretched
being who has occasioned me so many tears?
Montalban
.
Should I not rather ask you that
question, when I find her here.
Rosenberg
.
Here! Explain.
Montalban
.
Concealed under the name of
Olympia
,
she has practised on the feelings of the
princess
,
until she has gained her affections.
Rosenberg
.
Ah! Is it possible!
Montalban
.
Have you not seen her yet?
Rosenberg
.
I see her!Could I, without
overwhelming
her with reproaches; without treating her
as one who merits any thing but pity.
Montalban
.
Be prudent, or you will yourself
divulge
the shame you dread to encounter.
Rosenberg
.
Ah! Montalban!Nature is
struggling
in her behalf in my bosom, but in vain. Her
crime will admit of no extenuation; she is unworthy
even of compassion. I cannot see her. Frame some
pretext to bear her from this place, and free me from
her sight for ever.
Montalban
.
That may be readily done. I intend
to pass the seas to some distant land where
prejudice
may not reach me. Condescend to aid me in
the execution of this project, and I shall soon
remove
from your presence that guilty one, whose
existence only tends to your dishonour.
Rosenberg
.
Be it so. I approve your plan, and
will forward it to the extent of my power.
Montalban
.
[
Apart
.]
Success is mine!
Rosenberg
.
You must above all things be cautious
to keep the secret of her parentage concealed from her.
Montalban
.
Depend on my discretion. You see,
count, how highly I prize your esteem! By
disavowing
Clara as my child, I might return with
honour
to society; but gratitude for the services you
have rendered me, seals my lips. Self-interest has
never been the motive of my actions. I gave
convincing
proof of that when Clara's marriage with the
Count de Valmore was projected. In the zeal of
the moment, you wrote me that if I succeeded in
effecting the union, you would pay my debts, and
bestow a pension of six thousand florins upon me
for my services. Another, less scrupulous, to have
enjoyed your bounty, would have concealed the
situation
of de Valmore; but I preferred your esteem to
wealth acquired by deception, and informed you of
all. The result was, you changed your opinion, and
directed me to break off the overtures. I did not
hesitate to obey, and, renouncing the brilliant
fortune
you had promised me, required Clara to quit
the chateau of her lover. Then came the fatal
resolution
that destroyed her.
Rosenberg
.
Be calm. Your services are not
forgotten
,
and you shall soon have substantial proof
that there is no need to excite my gratitude. Count
de Valmore is momentarily expected here.
Montalban
.
De Valmore! If they should meet!
Rosenberg
.
I dread it. It is necessary to
accelerate
your departure, to avoid the fatal results of such
an interview.
Montalban
.
It is doubtful whether she will
consent
to follow me. She regards me as a severe judge,
whose presence is a constant and painful reproach;
and I fear that the friendship with which the
princess
honours her may encourage her to resist my
authority.
Rosenberg
.
Will she have the audacity?
Montalban
.
She is capable of any thing.
Rosenberg
.
True; we have bitter proof of that
but still she looks upon you as her father.
Montalban
.
Doubtless. But if the princess
oppose
her departure, it may lead to explanations that
it would be prudent to avoid.
Rosenberg
.
Should she compel us to that, we must
make known her crime.
Montalban
.
Fatal expedient! Is there no one
here upon whose prudence you can depend?
Rosenberg
.
Explain.
Montalban
.
If reason fail to have influence over
Clara, we must have recourse to stratagem. She
may be secretly abducted.
Rosenberg
.
And must be, rather than be
permitted
to remain here.
Montalban
.
Some one approaches. Dismiss this
intruder, and let us hasten to form a plan that will
relieve you from all your anxiety.
Enter Marcelle and Peter
.
Peter
.
My lord, I have come to report myself.
You see I have arrived safe and sound after all.
Slow and sure. That's my maxim.
Rosenberg
.
It is well, Peter; you come in good
time.
[
To Montalban
.]
This simpleton will
answer
your purpose.
Peter
.
Allow me to offer a continuation of my
services, my lord. I am very well satisfied with
both you and your cook, and if you are equally so
with me, there needs but two words to the bargain.
Rosenberg
.
I will still retain you.
Marcelle
.
This kindness, my lord, to my poor
boy
Rosenberg
.
Yes, Marcelle, he shall enter upon his
duties from this hour; and, to commence, I enjoin
upon him to obey whatever orders he may receive
from this gentleman.
Peter
.
Obey orders if you break owners; that's
my maxim.
Rosenberg
.
Have you, Marcelle, brought with you
the young woman to whom you gave an asylum at
your cottage?
Marcelle
.
She is with the princess, who loves her
so fondly that, previous to presenting her to you,
she wished her to appear in a manner worthy of
herself
.
Rosenberg
.
Go, and tell the princess to send
Olympia to me, as I would speak to her a few
moments
alone. Mark you, alone.
[
Marcelle hesitates
.
Peter
.
Devilish strange! Every body wishes to
have a tte-a-tte with pretty Olympia. Shouldn't
object myself.
Rosenberg
.
You have heard me. You may add
that I ask it as a favour, and await her compliance.
Marcelle
.
But, sir, if the princess
Rosenberg
.
No remarks, but obey.
Peter
.
Shut your fly trap, mother, when the big
bugs are abroad. That's my maxim.
[
exit Marcelle
.
Rosenberg
.
[
To Peter
.]
Follow this gentleman,
and obey without hesitation whatever he may
command
.
[
To Montalban
.]
See that the horses are
ready, and depart the first favourable moment. I
shall see you within an hour, and give you
unequivocal
proofs of my gratitude.
Montalban
.
I go to afford additional evidence of
the value I set on your friendship. Come along,
Peter. Courage, Montalban!
[
exit
.
Peter
.
What the devil does he want with me!
If his heart now should be as black as his muzzle!
I begin to feel rather uncomfortable.
Rosenberg
.
Well, what are you doing there.
Begone
.
Be obedient and discreet, and trust to me
for your reward.
Peter
.
O! I smell a galley business here.
Pardon
,
my lord, I obey. Here I go, neck or nothing;
that's my maxim.
[
exit Peter
.
Rosenberg
.
Dreadful duty! To tear the
daughter
from the mother's arms, and break the hearts of
both. But tyrant honour rules the lofty mind with
whips and scourges, and I must triumph over my
own feelings, lest her opprobrium fall upon my head
10*
and crush me. Ah! they come! Euphemia with her!
This I feared, and foresee that it will be a difficult
task to separate them.
Enter Euphemia and Clara, splendidly dressed
.
Euphemia
.
Is it true, my lord, that you would
have deprived me of the pleasure of presenting my
Olympia to you?
Rosenberg
.
Her presence agitates me, and I am
interested in spite of myself.
[
aside
.
Euphemia
.
I could not believe it, and imagined
that Marcelle had misunderstood your words.
Rosenberg
.
She faithfully communicated my
wishes. I would interrogate the young stranger,
and discover whether she is deserving of the favour
you have bestowed upon her.
Clara
.
If firm attachment and profound respect
for that virtue of which the princess is so bright a
model, are sufficient title to the bounties her
kindness
proposes, I will be bold to say, there is no one
more worthy than myself of her regard and
confidence
.
But, my lord, though I am young, and
destitute
of experience, vanity has not yet assumed
such an ascendancy over reason as to induce me to
accept so rashly an honour for which I was never
destined.
Rosenberg
.
[
To Peter
.]
She does herself justice.
Euphemia
.
[
To Peter
.]
I have not deceived
you. She is as diffident as she is lovely.
[
to Clara
.]
You fear the court and its deceitful splendour.
That salutary fear will save you from danger. Your
indifference to grandeur will excite no jealousy, and
all hearts will be ready to pay you homage.
Rosenberg
.
[
To Peter
.]
I feel for her.
Clara
.
I only aspire to your friendship, and
instead
of the many proffered favours, I would ask
you to grant but one.Did I not fear to displease
the Count I would beseech him to use his influence
in obtaining it.
Rosenberg
.
A favour; name it.
Euphemia
.
An extravagant idea. She would
retire
from the world.Why deprive society of one
of its most lovely ornaments! What has the world
done to one so young and innocent that you should
manifest such an aversion?You are distant from
your parents; the court and myself will supply their
places, and we shall love you as our child.
Rosenberg
.
[
aside
.]
Love her as our child!
Euphemia
.
You will recall to our hearts feelings
that have been rudely crushed, and console us for
the heavy loss we have sustained.
Rosenberg
.
No, madam, that idea can never be
effaced from my memory. The image of my
expiring
child will pursue me to the grave.I see her
I hear her still.Her voice clings to my soul.She
is overwhelmed with trouble and despair, and in vain
I strive to cast a veil over the fearful catastrophe!
Urge this no farther, but permit Olympia to follow
her own inclinations. She wishes to renounce the
world and I approve of her decision.
Euphemia
.
You fill me with surprise.
Rosenberg
.
One of her youth and beauty,
destitute
of parents and fortune, cannot better escape the
snares of a corrupt world, than by flying to a place
of refuge where sin may not enter.
Euphemia
.
Strange reasons! Have I not said that
I would be as a mother to her.
Rosenberg
.
Persist Olympia in your resolution.
I will aid you to the extent of my power.Make
choice of your asylum, and this hour, if you desire
it, I will see that you are conducted there, and that
you receive all the comforts becoming your new
condition
.
Clara
.
This kindness overwhelms me.
Euphemia
.
Can it be possible, that you, my lord,
who possess a heart so noble and compassionate
Rosenberg
.
Still does it sympathise in the
afflictions
of others, though in itself it is but a gloomy
record of a life of sorrows. But let us break off this
interview; it distresses me. She doubtless has not
adopted this course without imperative reason, to
10*
explain which might embarrass her. Let us respect
her motives and applaud her resolution.
Clara
.
[
aside
.]
Ah! whither does this tend?
Rosenberg
.
Retire, Olympia. They wait to
conduct
you to Marcelle's cottage, and to-morrow all
your wishes shall be realized.
Euphemia
.
What haste! Do you think Count,
that I can so readily renounce the happy illusion
that my imagination had formed. We cannot be
separated, at all events not so abruptly.Whether
my partiality is the result of an excited imagination,
or of a sentiment that I am unable to define, I have
not sought to discover, but the source is a pure one
and my project merits your approbation.
Clara
.
Ah! madam, my griefs have been
sufficient
;
do not let me reproach myself with being the
cause of misunderstanding between yourself and
husband.
Enter Montalban
.
Montalban
.
Count, the Marquis de Valmore has
this moment arrived.
Clara
.
[
aside
.]
Valmore!
[
Shouts without
.
Montalban
.
The shouts of your vassals announce
his presence.
Rosenberg
.
My love, let us go and bid him
welcome
.
[
apart to Clara
.]
Olympia, I prohibit you
from appearing in his presence.
Clara
.
[
aside
.] What means that injunction?
Euphemia
.
Olympia, I trust you will not leave
the chateau without first seeing me.
[
embraces her
.]
You promise.Why do you tremble child?
Clara
.
I promise.
Montalban
.
[
apart to Rosenberg
.]
All is ready.
Rosenberg
.
[
to Montalban
.]
Conduct her to
Marcelle's
dwelling; to night I will meet you there.
Olympia, remain not here.Montalban, conduct
her into the adjoining apartment, and keep a
vigilant
eye upon her.
[
Euphemia expresses surprise, Clara horror.
Euphemia
takes Rosenberg's hand with impatience, and
appears
to quit Clara with regret
.]
[Exeunt Rosenberg and Euphemia.
Montalban
.
You have heard the orders of the
Count.
Clara
.
[
too much agitated to hear him
.]
Valmore
beneath the same roof with me!I have not seen
him since that day of ceaseless agony.Chance has
conducted him to this spot; another opportunity may
never occur on earth, and I will seize the occasion
to justify myself.That thought inspires my heart
with renewed energy.
Montalban
.
What madness do you contemplate?
Can you imagine that de Valmore will remain for an
instant in your presence.
Clara
.
He shall remain. During the course of my
fatal trial I in vain endeavoured to see him. He
refused
.But
since the hand of fate has at length
brought us together, he shall hear me, until his heart
confesses how deeply I've been injured.
Montalban
.
I will not consent to so distressing an
interview.
Clara
.
He believes me criminal. Doubtless
detests
me!and I sink beneath the burthen of his
hate.Alas! I do not aspire to his love. I renounce
that hope forever; but still I may regain his esteem,
and when he knows how cruelly I have suffered he
may accord to me a tear of pity.Convinced of my
innocence, he will cease to curse a name once so
dear to him, and perhaps, strive to soothe a lacerated
heart where his image is indelibly engraved.
Montalban
.
[
aside
.]
Dangers are gathering fast.
Retire my child.
Clara
.
No. I will not retire.
Montalban
.
Do not oblige me to step beyond the
character of a father to enforce obedience.
Clara
.
Nor me, beyond the duty of a child to
vindicate
myself.Here I remain.
Montalban
.
Audacious girl!
Clara
.
Banish your fears. I shall justify myself
in his eyes without accusing you. Your secret is
buried in my bosom, and I have already given
sufficient
proof, that even the rack cannot extort it from
me.Rest satisfied.
a
Montalban
.
You count too much upon your
resolution
.They
come.This way; follow me.
Resistance
is useless.Clara, I beseech you leave this
place, ere you encounter a man whose presence
excites
so much apprehension.
Clara
.
Go, and leave me. I am resolved to meet
him.
Montalban
.
For the last time I bid you withdraw.
[
seizes her
.]
I will not hear you.Nay, then,
if persuasion fail force must be resorted to.
Clara
.
Monster! Is this then the reward for all
my sacrifices.
[
She breaks from him and runs to the door. Montalban
follows and closes it. She returns and shrieks in
despair
.]
Help, help, for the love of Heaven!
[
Montalban seizes her by the arm and forces her off by a
door in the side wing
.]
Montalban
.
You struggle in vain. And thus I
avert the fearful destiny that you would madly call
down upon us both.
[
exeunt
.
[
Enter in procession, pages and guards preceding
Euphemia
.
Then Rosenberg and de Valmore, to whom
Euphemia gives her hand. They are followed by
vassals
of both sexes, with Marcelle at their head
.]
Euphemia to Valmore
.
Illustrious cavalier, in
whom loyalty and valour so happily conjoin, behold
in the homage of my people, the esteem of the
Lithuanians
for the powerful nation you represent.
Valmore
.
These voluntary tributes are grateful to
the receiver, and eulogy is doubly flattering from
the lips of a princess such as you are.
[
Euphemia gives signal, and the fete commences.
During
the prelude she perceives Marcelle, and whispers
to her. Marcelle manifests joy and goes out. Valmore
and Rosenberg conduct Euphemia to her place.
Dance.After the ballet, Marcelle enters in haste and
says
Marcelle
.
Madam, hasten to the aid of Olympia.
They have borne her away, and her resistance proves
that it is contrary to your wishes and her own.
Euphemia
.
Borne her away! Quick, fly my friends
and restore her to me.
[
Exeunt vassals
.
Marcelle
.
Luckily, madam, my son Peter drives
the carriage, and when he heard my voice he refused
to go on.
Euphemia
.
What audacious wretch has committed
this outrage within the very precincts of my palace.
Rosenberg
.
Nothing has been done without my
orders.
Euphemia
.
Your orders! Count, you amaze me.
Rosenberg
.
I cannot longer conceal from you that
Olympia is unworthy of your bounty. She is here
under an assumed name, and the person who has
borne her away has claims upon her of a more
sacred
nature than yours.
Vassals
.
[
behind
.]
She is here, she is here.
Enter Clara, Montalban, and Vassals
.
Marcelle
.
[
goes to Clara
.]
My dear Olympia, let
me conduct you to the arms of your benefactress.
There no danger can approach you.
Clara
,
[
apart
.]
Valmore! I tremble in his
presence
.
[
Throws herself into the arms of Euphemia, who
receives
her with transports
.
Valmore
.
O! heavens! Do my eyes deceive me,
or is it Clara that I behold!
Montalban
.
Yes, signor, it is my wretched
daughter
,
whom I in vain endeavoured to keep from your
presence.
Euphemia
.
Your daughter!
[Looks with horror upon her.
Clara
.
[
to Valmore, throwing herself at his feet
.]
Ah! signor, stay, stay I beseech you. Moderate the
indignation with which you behold me. Hear the
appeal of persecuted innocence, for it is perhaps
the last time you will be allowed to hear it.
Valmore
.
Innocence! Wretched girl, withdraw
the sight of you is horror!
Clara
.
No, no, I will cling to your knees until
you deign to hear me. I have more than life at
stake. You may spurn and trample on me, but you
shall hear me.
Valmore
.
Too many proofs attest your crime. In
return for love the most devoted, you assassinated
my child. You, whom he adoredcalled by the
tender name of mother, and clung to as his support
and guide. Is it for a father to pardon an outrage
so horrible!
Clara
.
[
rising
.]
I answer, no! But the more
atrocious the crime the less reason you have to
impute
it to me.
Valmore
.
Who else had an interest in doing it?
Sole possessor of the wealth of my ancestors, his life
defeated the ambition that inflamed your soul, and
you wished to open to your children a source of
fortune, of which his existence would have
effectually
deprived them.
Clara
.
God, what a thought! Where is there
safety on earth, when the pure in heart can impute
the blackest motives to the innocent, and upon their
bare knowledge of human frailty convict the accused
of crimes too horrible even for fiends to
contemplate
.
Valmore
.
What other motive could exist?
Clara
.
Again! Say then it did existthat idea
alone should draw the veil from your eyes;still
think me capable of a crime so atrocious; believe
me the calculating fiend you have pictured, in spite
of all that has passed between us, and then answer
me whether it would have been in character to have
selected the time we were about to be united, for the
performance of such a deed. No. Once your wife,
and the step-mother of Julian, would I not have had
a thousand occasions to have destroyed him without
leaving the slightest vestige of my crime.
Valmore
.
These thoughts are the result of after
reflection.
Marcelle
.
[
regarding Mont. with indignation
.]
He hears it all, and is silent. Not even a frown.
Defend her, sir.
Montalban
.
[
manifests rage
]
Away!
a
Euphemia
.
What means this, Marcelle?
Marcelle
.
Is he not her father?
Valmore
.
What can he urge in her defence? She
was condemned before her judges. It was there he
should have spoken.
Marcelle
.
And did he not speaknot even there?
Valmore
.
What could he allege against truth
which overwhelmed her with shame and dismay.
Marcelle
.
What could
not
a parent allege in
defence
of a child! O! if he had been a father, nature
would have furnished him with voice and
argument
,
though truth had flashed like a stream of light
from heaven.
Rosenberg
.
[
aside
.]
That thought!
Clara
.
You speak of my judges. They were but
mortals, liable to be deceived, and took appearances
for reality.
Rosenberg
.
It was for you to enlighten their
consciences
.
Why did you not do it? The situation
in which you were surprised admitted of but two
constructions. You were either the author or the
witness of the assassination.
Valmore
.
Reply to that.
Marcelle
.
[
apart
.]
O! that
I
dare.
Clara
.
Fatal duty!
Euphemia
.
Answer, Clara. We all desire that
you should appear innocent.
Clara
.
I am innocent. I asserted it before my
judgesI proclaim it to the whole worldI repeat
it with the accents of despairI swear it in the
presence of Him who reads the inmost thoughts of
all heartsI am innocent! But such is the horror
of my destiny that I dare not cite the guilty wretch
before a human tribunal to meet the heavy
punishment
imposed on me.
Valmore
.
I have listened to you too long. Hence,
from my sight forever.
Clara
.
What! you still refuse to credit me? Ah!
Valmore do not turn from medo not crush the last
hope I have on earth.
[
approaches him
.
Valmore
.
[
recoiling
.]
Approach me not. I still
VOL. II.11
see your hands stained with the innocent blood of
my child; and his death remains unavenged. Fly,
fly from my presence. Hate and disdain have taken
the place of love in this wounded heart. Away
lest in my agony I curse you.
Clara
.
Curse me!
Valmore
.
If there is justice in heaven it will yet
inflict all the anguish on your heart that you have
heaped on mine.
Clara
.
[
wildly
.]
What!wherefore do you
pursue
me? Is there no hiding place on earth?no
safety this side the grave!
Valmore
.
Montalban, free me from her odious
presence.
Clara
.
Still, still they follow me! That voice!
Men are changed to fiends, and hunt me down. Still
I care not though all on earth were open-mouthed
against me, if that voice were not in the fearful cry,
urging them on. O! that voice!
Montalban
.
Come, come, my child.
Clara
.
[
in despair
.]
O! God, if it is your will to
try me, I will bear all. Give me but strength, but
strength!
Montalban
.
Clara, we must begone.
Clara
.
Not yet, it is not time. Hark! they
follow
,
and I am too feeble to move. Hide me! Ha!
darkness surrounds me. That is well. Hist!my
heart throbs with painmy head is burstingmy
eyes grow dim! All's darkdarkdark
[She places her hands on her forhead, and stands
stupified
.
Rosenberg
.
Painful sight.
Euphemia
.
My heart bleeds for her.
Clara
.
[
Looks wildly around, and beholds
Montalban
.
She fixes her eyes steadfastly on him, then
recoils
with horror
.]
Where am I! You here!
Wherefore
are you here? Speak, where am I?
Montalban
.
With your heart-broken father.
Clara
.
My father! You my father! O, mockery!
[Gesture as if she would repulse him.
Montalban
.
Is it possible that in her frenzy she
can spurn even me!
[
approaches her
.
Clara
.
Go, go, goI ask but that.
Euphemia
.
What means this terror at the sight of
her father?
[Clara again casts her eyes over the scene. She
approaches
Rosenberg, who points out Montalban to her.
She recoils.]
Clara
.
O! no, no, no! Not even a tear bedims his
eyes, although he is my father! You would not have
me follow him? You cannot mean it!
[Rosenberg turns from her; she tremblingly approaches
de Valmore, who points to Montalban. She exclaims
in a tone of despair
Send me to the grave. I will meet death
cheerfully
,
if it is your will, but save me from that man.
Rosenberg
.
Montalban, do your duty.
Clara
.
I have said I would die. Will not that
content ye? Ye can but have my life, and I will
yield it.
Rosenberg
.
Montalban, I say!
Clara
.
They are not human!
[
Turns to
Euphemia
.]
I appeal to you. Angel of light! do not
abandon me! They are not human! How have
they treated me! They charge me with the worst
of crimesyet I am innocent! Pursue me as a
wretch unfit to liveyet will not let me die!
[Euphemia averts her face.
Do not turn from me! Not one look!one word!
abandoned at last by youeven you! 'Tis well,
'tis well! I now can die!
[Faints, supported by Marcelle.
Euphemia
.
This trial has been too severe. I will
protect her until the truth's discovered!
Tableau
.
[Curtain falls.
ACT III.
Scene I
.
An apartment in the chateau
.
Enter Marcelle and Peter
.
Peter
.
Well mother, what think you of all these
strange doings?
Marcelle
.
I am enraged that I dare not speak my
mind.
Peter
.
That's enough to enrage any woman.
Marcelle
.
[
to herself
.]
But what good will come
out of accusing Montalban? They will punish him,
but his daughter will not be less unhappy! There is
nothing but grief and despair on all sides.
Peter
.
Very true, mother. Our fete's knocked
on the head.Olympia is in affliction, every body's
in the dumps; no more dancingand to crown our
misfortunes, I fear the dinner will be overdone
before
they have an appetite to eat it.But grin and
bear it, that's my maxim.
Marcelle
.
Poor Clara!
Peter
.
How refreshing it smells.Delicious
perfume
!
They may talk of their Arabian gums, but to
my taste there is no odour half as fragrant as the
steam of a kitchen.
Marcelle
.
Have you observed how thoughtful
Montalban appears?
Peter
.
Good Lord, not I. I have been talking with
the cook on the philosophy of roasting venison.
He's a magnificent creature; formed when nature
was in one of her most bountiful moods! They may
talk of Alexander the Great and Julius Car, but I
would wager my appetite to a mess of porridge, he
would beat them all hollow in basting a turkey.If
I were not Peter, I would be that cook.
Marcelle
.
[
abstractedly
.]
I must see him, for I
have a great desire to speak to him.
Peter
.
You shall see him, mother,and you shall
speak to him; but have a care how you interrupt
him while he is roasting the wild boar, for then he is
hot and peppery, and snaps one up as short as a
griskin
.
All great men are irritable; passionate myself
at times.
Marcelle
.
Of whom are you speaking?
Peter
.
Of whom?My friend the cook!
Marcelle
.
[
impatiently
.]
Insatiable glutton, you
should blush to think of nothing but eating, at a time
we are all overwhelmed with grief.
Peter
.
Am I the cause? Am I exempt from
disappointment
?
Was not I to be the cock of the walk
in the amusements; and is not the whole affair
knocked on the head, and my comb cut as smooth
as your chin?Answer me that, mother, and then
handle me with gloves on, I beseech you.
Disappointments
indeed!There's my speech!What
use can I make of it now!And such a speech!
Listen, mother.Illustrious Princess
Marcelle
.
I have no time to listen to your fiddle
faddle.
Peter
.
Don't interrupt me.Illustrious
princess
,
on this momentous occasion
Marcelle
.
Po, po, hold your tongue, you silly
fellow
.
Peter
.
Zounds! I say, mother, you shall hear my
speech. Sit down; I am charged to the muzzle,
and you may expect to hear a pretty loud report.
Illustrious
[
forcing her into a chair
.
Marcelle
.
Come, it is time for us to be going home.
Peter
.
Home!what!without dinner?are you
mad?
Marcelle
.
What should we do here?
Peter
.
Eat the dinner if we die by it.Victory
or death,that's my maxim.
Marcelle
.
Grief is depicted in every countenance.
Clara is so distressed that no one can speak to her.
The princess is disconsolate.Valmore pensive
and taciturn, and the count, which most astonishes
me, is still more affected than the others.
Montalban
is sullen, and appears more like one who
meditates
11*
a crime, than one oppressed by sorrow. He
comes. Observe him. Has he not the step of a
criminal?
Peter
.
Yes, mother, on the way to the gallows.
Enter Montalban
.
Montalban
.
How does my daughter find herself?
Marcelle
.
Ill at ease.
Montalban
.
Can I see her?
Marcelle
.
For what purpose?
Montalban
.
Am I not her father?
Marcelle
.
Her father! True, to her sorrow she has
a father.
Peter
.
[
apart to Marcelle
.]
Softly, you tread
upon his kibes.
Montalban
.
What mean you by that remark?
Marcelle
.
Ask your own heart.
[Montalban betrays passion, but suddenly checks
himself
.]
Peter
.
[
apart to Marcelle
.]
You'll have all the fat
in the fire presently, mother.
Marcelle
.
Your presence makes a strange
impression
on her.
Montalban
.
With reason, since she is so highly
culpable.
Marcelle
.
Culpable! And do you accuse her?
Montalban
.
Is it in my power to defend her?
Marcelle
.
Who has it more in his power than
yourself
?
Montalban
.
[
regarding her sternlyapart
.]
O!
rage!
Marcelle
.
She has related her misfortunes to me;
and though she appears to the world in the light of
a criminal, if I were but allowed to express my
suspicions
,
I would wager my life that you know better
than any other that Clara is innocent.
Peter
.
[
apart
.]
Softly.You tickle him till he
grins.
Montalban
.
Are you aware of what you say!
What an absurd idea!Can you suppose a father
could be so debased as to see his child perish if he
had it in his power to save her? You are a parent,
Marcelle.
Marcelle
.
We sometimes see a child more worthy
than his father, and who would encounter even a
death of ignominy, for his sake.
Peter
.
True, mother, that is my maxim. I would
even forego tasting the wild boar to gratify you.
Montalban
.
Unworthy woman, are you aware of
the barbarity of your calumnious imputations, and
the punishment that you may invoke upon yourself.
But hear and mark my words. If you breathe a
syllable by which another may entertain the most
distant idea of your odious suspicion, I swear I shall
call down vengeance on your head equally just and
terrible.
Peter
.
O that tongue of yours, mother! I knew
how it would be. Out of the frying-pan into the
fire, that's my maxim.
Marcelle
.
Bah! bah! I don't fear his menaces.
Peter
.
Ha! the count is coming.I'll go take a
turn in the kitchen and meditate on the vanity of
human wishes.
[
exit
.
Marcelle
.
I leave you to go and confer with your
daughter. She is happy in the midst of her
misfortunes
in finding hearts more capable of feeling than
your own.
[
exit
.
Montalban
.
[
looking after her
.]
What a woman!
Is it possible she has become acquainted with
Clara's secret!If I supposed so.But the Count
is here.Now to ascertain whether his suspicions
have also been awakened.
Enter Rosenberg
.
Well, Count.
Rosenberg
.
I am in despair. Clara persists in
disclosing nothing. Until this day I was disposed
to believe her guilty, but now my soul is divided
between
hope and fear.Ah! Montalban, what a
dreadful
state for a father!
Montalban
.
Calm your feelings. Think of the
honour of your family, and do not in a moment of
weakness expose yourself to the scorn of the world.
Rosenberg
.
Barbarous prejudice!
Montalban
.
It is unjust, still it exists, and the
high-born have as much to fear from it as the lowly.
Rosenberg
.
I admit it.But since she has
returned
to her country, even to our presence, should
she not find an asylum, where without fear of the
future she may await her justification.An event
difficult to imagine, but perhaps not impossible.
Montalban
.
What a project!This hope appears
chimerical. Certainly I should be the last to instil
doubt in your mind, but since she has constantly
refused
to make a confession even to me, which I have
solicited with tears and prayers, to what other cause
can we attribute her silence, than to a full
conviction
of the impossibility of affecting the solemn
judgment
that condemned her.
Rosenberg
.
True, true, but still she is my child.
Montalban
.
Remember that one accused
trembling
between life and death, has little regard for the
safety or feelings of others. If he had the power he
would overturn nature itself to put aside the sword
of justice, and create suspicions, which of
themselves
should condemn him to breathe his last sigh
upon the scaffold.
Rosenberg
.
Still we have had examples of the
innocent
perishing in the place of the guilty.
Montalban
.
Granted. But when one is connected
by blood even with the throne itself, he should rise
superior to the weakness of nature, rather than run
the chance of an experiment so uncertain and
dangerous
.
The wounds of the heart heal of themselves,
but honour once lost is never to be recovered.
Rosenberg
.
But where is the danger in permitting
Clara to remain in her country?
Montalban
.
Should she be recognised
Rosenberg
.
I will conceal her from the eyes of
all.
Montalban
.
Impossible!Your vassals already
know that she is here. This news passes from
mouth to mouth, and we may expect the French
tribunals
will soon despatch their agents in pursuit of
her.That they will reclaim her is certain; what
then will be your feelings! You will be reduced to
the cruel necessity of delivering her to her
executioners
,
or of declaring yourself to be her father, and
it is still doubtful whether even such a declaration
would be sufficient to save her.
Rosenberg
.
Your conjectures are frightful, but
cannot destroy in my heart the sentiment that speaks
in her favour. The presumption of her innocence
presents an image so seductive, and creates so
exalted
an idea of her courage and virtue, that I
reproach
myself for the rigour of my proceedings
against her. Judge of my despair should my
desertion
be the cause of her death, and her innocence
be one day made manifest! Ah! Montalban, save
me from the remorse that would follow!
Montalban
.
[
aside
.]
He is not to be shaken.
Rosenberg
.
Place yourself in my situation. Since
your heart is so deeply affected even by friendship,
you can readily judge what it must cost me to
renounce the sacred title by which nature has bound
me to her.
Montalban
.
[
aside
.]
I must try what fear will do.
No, count, I will not place myself in your situation.
I have felt too long the curse that attaches to it, and
now I am resolved to return to my own humble but
honourable station in society.
Rosenberg
.
What mean you?
Montalban
.
Friendship has blinded me, but reason
at length awakens me to honour. Protect in your
bosom a daughter whose crime will stamp upon your
name a blot never to be effaced. Cover her with
caresses, though nature recoils while caressing her;
but for me, I prefer the esteem of my fellow men,
to your fruitless and dangerous benefactions.
Rosenberg
.
You would not divulge the secret of
her birth?
Montalban
.
Should it be divulged without my
participation
,
in what light would I stand before the
public? Malignity would calumniate my intentions.
They shun me for having a daughter so guilty, but
if another's lips were to publish that she is your
child, I should be execrated as a mercenary wretch,
willing to traffic his sacred honour for gold. The
pity I inspire would be converted to scorn, and I
should forfeit all claims to the protection of
mankind
.
Rosenberg
.
What proofs would you have from
me? Express your wishes, and I will accomplish
them on the instant.
Montalban
.
I have done. Follow your own
resolution
,
and I will accomplish mine. But should
Clara perish in disgrace, her mother become
distracted
in despair, you may, perhaps, when too late,
reproach yourself with the tragic result of your
hasty determination. After having been disgraced
by your prince for a marriage that he condemned,
should you now encounter the hate of his successor,
from the monstrous results produced by that alliance,
you can reproach yourself alone for all your
disasters
.
When abandoned by your friends, and
humbled
by malignity, you will have reason to regret not
having followed the councils of a man who has
given you so many fruitless proofs of his devotion.
Rosenberg
.
Ah! cease to wound a heart already
tormented by its own sorrows. Still let us await
until the close of the day. We will again see Clara,
and make a last effort to draw the truth from her,
and should it not prove successful, I promise to
abandon her to your guidance.
Montalban
.
I dare not trust your courage.
Rosenberg
.
Your presence will sustain me.
Montalban
.
It would be more prudent to renounce
this interview.
Rosenberg
.
I have promised it at the solicitation
of the princess.
Montalban
.
You can evade the promise. Ha!
they come! No, 'tis de Valmore alone. Collect
yourself, lest your agitation awaken his suspicions.
Enter Valmore
.
Valmore
.
Clara is more composed. The
princess
,
who is unwilling to leave her for an instant, is
about to conduct her to us.
Montalban
.
What can you hope from another
interview
?
Why annoy her with useless questions?
If she has discoveries to make, would she have
waited until this time to justify herself?
Valmore
.
This language is extraordinary from
your lips. Instead of being grateful for the interest
we manifest, you seem disposed to throw obstacles
in our way.
Montalban
.
I, signor! Such an intention is
distant
from my thoughts. Still I would spare her
feelings, knowing that no good can arise from the
torture to which you would subject her.
Valmore
.
[
fixedly
.]
Do you assist in the
examination
about to take place?
Montalban
.
Who should interrogate her, if not
her father?
Valmore
.
[
observing him
.]
The princess has
remarked
that your presencenay, the bare mention
of your name, agitates her in a manner beyond her
control.
Montalban
.
Ought not a daughter who has
entailed
deathless shame upon her family to shrink at the
sight of the father she has dishonoured?
Valmore
.
So we imagined. But that woman,
Marcelle, who appears so fondly attached to Clara,
and with whom she has lived for three months on
terms of the closest intimacy, attributes these
sentiments
to another cause.
Rosenberg
.
Then there is still hope, thank heaven!
Montalban
.
[
apart to Rosenberg
.]
Count, you
will betray yourself. And this cause; pray has she
explained it to you?
Valmore
.
No; but in spite of all, she believes
Clara's heart to be spotless, and her courage beyond
all praise.
Montalban
.
[
observing Rosenberg
.]
Count, be
prudent. The prejudice of a weak mind in favour
of the unfortunate. Address and hypocrisy have
secured her friendship.
Valmore
.
Is it not possible that in a moment of
confidence Clara has made her the depository of her
secret?
Montalban
.
You suppose then that a secret exists?
Valmore
.
Should you be displeased if it were so?
Montalban
.
Be careful how you credit it; though
heaven is my witness I would abandon all earthly
hopes to know it.
Valmore
.
Why then have you all along rejected
the idea?
Montalban
.
I fear to indulge in it. The
disappointment
would be as severe as the first dreadful
blow. But I am not astonished at your credulity.
You love Clara. Your fatal passion has perhaps
been rekindled by her presence, and it is painful to
hate when the heart is burning with love. So far
from blaming your efforts, I will second them with
all my power. Endeavour to discover that
innocence
in my daughter that I have so frequently
sought for in vain, and with transports I will bless
the hand that restores me to honour and happiness.
Valmore
.
The attempt shall be made.
Montalban
.
She comes. Interrogate her. I will
hear all without interfering; but this is the last time,
I trust, that you will compel her to appear before
you.
Enter Euphemia, Clara, Marcelle
.
[
Clara advances slowly, supported by Marcelle.
Euphemia
precedes them, and should have time to speak
before Clara descends
.]
Euphemia
.
Gentlemen, in order to obtain her
consent to appear again before you, I have promised
that she shall be treated with that delicacy which
her situation is entitled to. Inspire her with
confidence
by the mildness of your proceedings, for it is
the only way to obtain her confession.
Montalban
.
[
apart
.]
This, I hope, is my last
trial.
Clara
.
O! temper with mercy the power that my
misfortune has given you, and without renewing
those questions that I am resolved never to answer,
deign to point out an asylum to me where I may
terminate in peace a life, the morning of which
promised
a close less fatal.
Valmore
.
Listen to me, Clara. We wish to
behold
you receiving that homage and respect due to
beauty and virtue. If possible, restore you to the
world.
Clara
.
I ask not that. Rather draw a veil as
inky as midnight between me and this world. That
would be an act of mercy; the other, punishment.
Valmore
.
Nay, nay. Allow me but one question.
From all that you have said, we presume that you
beheld the murderer.
Clara
.
Not againO, not again!
Valmore
.
Clara, pardon me. If you have not
denounced
him, is it from motives of fear or affection,
or that you could not at the time mark him
sufficiently
to establish an accusation precise and positive?
Clara
.
[
Her eyes wander from one to another, and
finally fixing on Montalban, she says with effort
.]
That's itI
could
not. The last motive has kept
me silent.
Valmore
.
You are not now before inflexible judges,
who will tax as artifice the assertions of one accused
should he be unable to establish their truth. Name
the person you suspect. Measures shall be taken to
verify this important fact, and every circumspection
used that the delicacy of the case requires.
Nothing
shall be divulged, unless we obtain sufficient
proof, and then with what ardour shall I not enter
upon your defence, if we have the good fortune to
unmask the wretch who has thrown upon you the
burthen of his crime.
Clara
.
Vain hope.A rampart, impassable,
protects
him from the blow.
Rosenberg
.
The greater reason that he should not
be spared.If he has nothing to fear from our
resentment
,
whence arises this concern that you have
for him?
VOL. II.12
Euphemia
.
Reflect upon the happy change that
this confession would make in your own situation.
In seeing another denounced, your friends would
examine the actions of his life, and the circumstances
of the crime; and though the veil of mystery in which
it is enveloped should prove too dark for truth to
appear, still a doubt will be created that must
result
in your favour.
Clara
.
Ah! cease to assail me with arguments so
powerful.
Montalban
.
Courage my child. All our hearts
are open to you. If there is a criminal, deliver him
without remorse to our vengeance.Surrender him,
I say, to the scaffold, and return him torment for
torment.Triumph, my child, whilst he expires
amidst tortures that justice reserves for the guilty,
and bears to his felon grave the public execrations
he would have entailed upon you.
Clara
.
Ah! horrible thought!
Marcelle
.
[
apart
.]
His heartlessness shocks me.
O! that I were allowed to ask her a question.
Valmore
.
What would you ask?
Euphemia
.
Speak, Marcelle.
Rosenberg
.
Go on. I allow you.
Montalban
.
What!Count!
Rosenberg
.
Let her explain herself.
Clara
.
Marcelle be careful that you commit no
imprudence.
Marcelle
.
The wretch, then, has in your eyes a
title so sacred that you prefer your own death to his
degradation?
Clara
.
[
troubled
.]
Marcelle!I will speak no
more.
Marcelle
.
The thing is plain. You are innocent;
you have said so, and your tears attest it. Still the
crime was committed,you beheld the assassin, and
rather than name him, heroically submit to the worst
conjectures. So fearful a sacrifice could only be
prompted by the strong feelings which nature or
profound love implants in a magnanimous heart, and
I see here but two persons upon whom that
suspicion
could rest.
Valmore
.
What a strange supposition.
Montalban
.
Urge no farther this audacity and
imprudence
.
Marcelle
.
Why this passion.Be cautious.
True, I have been guilty of presumption, but I have
not accused you.
Clara
.
Marcelle, excess of friendship carries you
too far.Imitate my reserve, and cease to bring in
question those who have suffered already too much
by my misfortune.
Marcelle
.
Yes, doubtless, here is one who has
suffered
,
and has reason to grieve.
[
pointing at
Valmore
.]
But the other is a monster who deserves
to be strangled.
Euphemia
.
What language!
Montalban
.
Count, will you not impose silence
on that slanderous woman.
Marcelle
.
Do you wish it?But the count has
allowed me to speak, and I will speak in spite of
you.
Clara
.
You can affirm nothing.Your conjectures
are false, fearfully false!It is useless to propagate
the error by which you are deluded.I protest
against all that you have saidall you have
conjectured
.
Marcelle
.
Holy nature! and yet his lips were sealed
in the midst of your fiery trial!I cannot bear the
idea of crime triumphing over persecuted virtue.
You beheld the criminalyou recognised him, and
though nature may prevent you from breathing his
name, there is nothing to compel me to that
generous
silence.
Rosenberg
.
Well.
Euphemia
.
Go on.
Valmore
.
Do you know the wretch?
Marcelle
.
[
Pointing at Montalban
.]
Behold him
there!
Euphemia
.
Her father!
Montalban
.
What madness!
Valmore
.
Have you any proofs!
Clara
.
Proofs!O! no, she has no proofs!And
you would not credit such a charge as this without
the clearest proof.
Marcelle
.
She herself told me that she was going
to embrace your child when she recognised the
monster
who preceded her into the apartment.
Surprised
and trembling, she concealed herself, and
was not apprised of his crime, until she beheld the
bloody dagger which he threw upon her without
being
aware of her presence.
Rosenberg
.
What new light is this that breaks
upon me!
Clara
.
[
with energy
.]
I deny it all.These are
mere suspicions, vague, unsubstantiated, and before
you all I deny the guilty imputation.
Rosenberg
.
Courageous girl! I now divine the
motive that influences your magnanimous conduct.
Clara
.
[
With increased energy
.]
No,I say to
you, they accuse him wrongfully.He is innocent.
Come my father.Let us quit this place, and seek
an asylum where calumny cannot reach us.Come,
come! You have a daughter still.
[
Leads
Montalban
away
.]
Rosenberg
.
Hold!Guards arrest him.
Enter Guards, Peter and Vassals
.
Montalban
.
What! Count, are you aware what
you are about to do?Arrested!
Rosenberg
.
Think how to defend yourself.Clara,
approach.
Clara
.
I remain with my father. His fate is
mine.
Rosenberg
.
I see it all.It is to the sacred title
Montalban bears, that you would immolate yourself
so generously. Satisfy me of your innocence, and
I will instantly prove to you that he is not your
father.
Clara
.
Gracious heavens! not my father!
Valmore
.
What do I hear!
Montalban
.
[
apart
.]
I am lost!
a
Rosenberg
.
[
takes Clara's hand
.]
O! Clara, cease
to appear criminal from excess of virtue. Behold
the contending feelings by which my bosom is
agitated
.Witness
these tears.Their fountain is both
joy and grief.Still if you doubt my transports are
sincere, turn to your fond mother's arms, and there
fully enjoy the blessing that has so long been
withheld
from you.
Clara
.
My mother! Do I dream! My mother!
Euphemia
.
Count, what fabrication is this?
Rosenberg
.
No, madam. Behold your child,
whom I was about to sacrifice to the miserable pride
that tyrannizes over man. But, innocent or guilty,
she is ours, and as such must be acknowledged to
the world.
Euphemia
.
[
embracing Clara
.]
Unlooked for
happiness
!
Montalban
.
[
apart
.]
The thunderbolt has fallen!
Clara
.
[
embraces Rosenberg
.]
O, my father!
And he, for whom I have endured so much! O!
away!
Valmore
.
Wretched villain!
Clara
.
Yes, Valmore, behold the murderer of
Julian!
Valmore
.
Hell has not sufficient tortures to punish
you for your wicked deeds.
Montalban
.
Spare me your fruitless reproaches.
I might, by a positive denial, prolong my life, and
perhaps escape the punishment that awaits me.
But what is existence in a world like this! Death
is preferable, and I approach his reeking altar
without
fear. The heroic conduct of that virtuous girl
has awakened feelings that have long been buried,
and fiendlike as I have been, I will yet make one
sacrifice to virtue. I am the criminal!
Valmore
.
What motive could impel you to such a
deed?
Montalban
.
A motive, capable of rending every
human tie asunder, and for which man will forfeit
even his inheritance in heavenavarice! Is it
astonishing that the lowly and the oppressed should
12*
yield to its allurements, when we behold the
high-born
and the prosperous its votaries and its victims?
Clara's father had promised me a liberal recompense
if I should effect a union between you and his
daughter. One obstacle interposed,a fatal one to
his views,and I removed it, believing that by one
blow I should become disenthralled from the heavy
load an oppressive world had heaped upon me. I
have donelead me to my prison.
[Led off by guards.
Euphemia
.
O, my child! The mystery is at last
unveiled that so long deprived us of each other's
love.
Valmore
.
Noble minded Clara! What mortal
could believe himself worthy of possessing a heart
such as yours!
Rosenberg
.
We have found him, Valmore, and
when we have restored this courageous victim of
error, we promise not to dispose of her without first
consulting you. Good Marcelle, you shall never
quit my daughter; her happiness and mine are
owing to your friendship.
[
To vassals
.]
And you,
my friends, recognise in Clara the child of your
benefactress
,
and participate in the happiness of a
father, who offers you in this virtuous pledge of his
love, a heart to solace you in your misfortunes.
[The Curtain falls.
A TALE OF HARD SCRABBLE.
Believe it, there's ne'er a mistress in the world
Can mislike it.
Cynthia's Revels
.
The
attorney and the apothecary, by prescriptive
right, belong to the aristocracy of every village;
by aristocracy is meant that class of the community
who live by doing nothinga laborious kind of life,
certainly, and by no means profitable, still many
adopt it of choice, and believe it conclusive evidence
of their gentility, in spite of a seedy coat and
pockets
to let.
There is a little village called Hard Scrabble,
somewhere in New Jerseytrue, several places in
that state are justly entitled to the same cognomen,
but, in order to prevent all geographical mistakes, the
Hard Scrabble referred to fronts upon the Atlantic,
while behind extends the deserts of Arabia in little,
and is justly celebrated for blue-fish and oysters,
white sand and black mosquitoes; all of which are
considered staple commodities, except the last.
There is scarcely a spear of grass growing for
many miles around Hard Scrabble. It is so barren
that a whip-poor-will would not fly over it, and it is
on record that a flock of crows, in making the
attempt, fell dead when they spied out the nakedness
of the land. Notwithstanding all this, it is a place of
resort in the summer season, by such as imagine that
they can find pleasure in any other place than their
own homes. It is astonishing how much privation
and annoyance some people can undergo, if it be
only christened by the name of pleasure.
Our village, like every other village, could boast
of an attorney and apothecary, and if the fact of
doing nothing be a legitimate claim to aristocracy,
their caste was an elevated one, for Capias, the
attorney
,
had not issued a writ for a twelve-month, and
the same length of time had elapsed since death had
released the last patient of little Tapioca by writ of
habeas corpusstill our worthies did not despond.
Hope feeds her votaries on the chamelion's dish; a
rattle is sufficient to amuse us through life, and if
we unfortunately break the toy, and discover the
tinsel of which it is composed, we sit down and weep
like children.
It would have been a handsome speculation to
have purchased our village worthies at their real
value, and to have sold them again for what they
imagined they were worth. They were on excellent
terms with themselves, were both bachelors, and
looked forward to the day when Hymen and
Fortune
would combine to make them happy. The
non-productives, whenever abandoned by the latter,
have implicit faith in Hymen working miracles in
their favour. Every prudent man should have two
strings to his bow, and the ladies say it is not amiss
to have two beaux to your string.
Hard Scrabble, as already observed, was resorted
to in the summer season, by those who fancied that
mosquito phlebotomy would benefit their health, and
while the other watering places were as crowded
and uncomfortable as the Black Hole of Calcutta,
the few who visited here had ample room to battle
with the swarms of insects that every breeze from
the sea brought upon them. This is no small
advantage
to those who object to being bitten, and do
not consider the monotonous hum of his little
trumpet
,
as one of the pleasures of a watering place.
The sting of a mosquito may be compared to olives,
tomatoes, and the condiments used in French
cookery
we
must be accustomed to them before they
become palatable, and a man must be stung very
often by a mosquito before he likes it.
Miss Deborah Nightshade visited Hard Scrabble
for the benefit of her health. It was so retired, and
there was such a delightful view of gray sand all
around, particularly when the sun was beating on it,
and it was so charmingly romantic to see the
fishermen
and the wreckers at their labour, and the
sea-breeze
was so bracing even in the dog-days, that
Miss Nightshade felt convinced that her health
would be speedily reinstated and her beauty
renovated
.
The latter is seldom the work of time.
Miss Nightshade belonged to that much-injured
class of society, in vulgar parlance styled old maids.
Having refused, according to her own account, six
advantageous offers, in the bloom of youth and
beauty, she ultimately found herself on the wrong
side of matrimony, and reluctantly despaired of
ever warming her chilled bosom at the torch of
Hymen. For a few years it was her sole delight to
relate to her friends her former conquests; and a
glow, something of a brickdust hue, would return to
her withered cheeks, when she dwelt upon the entire
control she at one time had over her heart-stricken
admirersHoc est vivere bis, says Martial, but as
this, by continual repetition, gradually ceased to
afford
gratification, Miss Deborah sought for amusement
in censuring the imprudence and immodesty of the
belles of the present age. By this time she had
purchased a pair of spectacles, and consequently
very few follies of this nature passed under her
nose without the closest observation. When a cynic,
in spite of his satire and reproof, observes all around
him enjoying their pleasures, without showing any
disposition to mend their follies, he soon becomes
weary of growling, and though his disgust is
heightened
by having been treated with indifference, he
swallows his spleen, and suffers the world to work
its own salvation. After Miss Deborah had ceased
to take any amusement in censuring the foibles of
the rising generation, finding she had but little
gratification
in society, she fancied that there would be
a pleasure still remaining, if she could only appear
the most miserable member of it. She was not
peculiar in this particular.
The arrival of Miss Nightshade created quite a
sensation in Hard Scrabble. True there was no
military parade, discharge of ordnance, nor was she
invited to a public dinner by the functionaries of the
village, in conformity with the fashion of the day on
great occasions; still there was neither man, woman,
nor child in Hard Scrabble who was not full of the
important arrival, within ten minutes after its taking
place. It is astonishing how rapidly news circulates
in a village.
Among those who felt most deeply interested in
the new comer were Counsellor Capias and Dr.
Tapioca. The former was moved thereunto as he
prided himself upon being a man of gallantry, the
cock of the village, and the lady would naturally
expect numberless little attentions which he alone
was calculated to perform; while on the other hand
the apothecary looked forward to having a profitable
patient, for he already heard that the lady was an
invalid, and had visited that distinguished watering
place, Hard Scrabble, for the benefit of her health.
Miss Nightshade imagined herself afflicted with
more complaints than physiologists have touched
upon, and she protested that her feelings were, at
times, such as were not to be paralleled by those of
any case on record. Her physicians were amazingly
puzzled. They avoided naming any disease in her
presence, as she was sure to have it the next day,
though she was systematic in appropriating a day to
each disorder, and was careful not to have two
complaints
at the same time, lest the shock should be
too violent for her constitution. Mondays she
appropriated
to the rheumatism, Tuesdays to
palpitation
of the heart, Wednesdays to the ague,
Thursdays
to dyspepsia, and so on throughout the week,
by which prudent arrangement she greatly facilitated
the practice of her medical advisers, who usually
prescribed, in all cases,
R. Panis micar. 3ss.
Aq. fontan. mx.
M. ft. pil. x.
Sumat. 1, pro re nat.
Which hieroglyphics Champollion, after intense
study
,
has deciphered to mean neither more nor less
than ten pills made up of bread and pure water, a
medicine fully as efficacious as Dr. Last's chalk and
vinegar, which if it could do no good, could do no
harm. Strange it is that the science of medicine
should be so mystified as to give a frightful aspect
even to the staff of life.
Such being the constitution of Miss Nightshade,
she was no sooner warm in her chamber at Hard
Scrabble than she made inquiry for the physician of
the village. But our watering place, in one respect,
resembled Gilead, there was no physician there,
and accordingly little Tapioca was summoned to
her bedside as the most available succedaneum in
the emergency. His heart dilated with hope as he
seized his ivory-headed cane to visit his new patient,
and he felt satisfied that there was no place that held
out such encouragement to a young practitioner as
Hard Scrabble. He had only been ten years in
practice, and already had had ten patients, without
including the parson's cow.
He paid his first visit on Monday, and accordingly
found his patient labouring under a violent attack
of fancied rheumatism, in hourly expectation of her
approaching dissolution. A short time before his
arrival, as her nurse was assisting her to rise, the old
lady, groaning most piteously, exclaimed, Gently,
gently, I beseech you;do you think I am made of
iron!be careful how you touch that arm,Oh! it
will certainly drop off with paindear me, unless I
obtain relief very soon, I cannot last much longer,
with a hundred similar exclamations; but they
succeeded
in supporting her to a sofa, into which she
fell, exhausted with pain and weakness. Her
temples
were immediately bathed, smelling bottles
applied
,
and the house was in a bustle from the garret
down to the cellar. The cockles of Miss
Nightshade's
heart warmed as she beheld the anxiety of
all around her. She had not remained long in this
happy situation, before Tapioca was announced as
ascending the staircase. What was to be done in
this emergency? Scarcely half drest,her clothes
had been opened during her fainting fit,and too
weak to reach the bed, if they had time to support
her to itmust she be detected in this dishabille?
Maiden modesty forbid. She rose from the sofa,
made but one spring, and swift as Camilla over the
bending corn, she regained the bed, huddled
herself
beneath the covering, and overturned the old
nurse in her rapid passage. When Tapioca entered,
the fainting scene was again enacted with
considerable
effect, and after applying every remedy,
apparently
to little purpose, he left her, with a doleful
countenance and an ominous shake of the head.
Our disciple of Galen had no sooner departed than
his patient recovered sufficiently to give instructions
to her nurse. To-morrow she said, I feel that I
shall be deprived of the use of speech, and you must
relate particularly the different stages of my
sickness
to the Doctor, that he may be enabled to treat
my case correctly. Here followed a long and
minute
statementat such an hour she was taken with
a violent chill, which was succeeded by a raging
feverafter lying in a delirious state for three hours,
she fell into a short and restless sleep, and awoke
with the most excruciating head-acheand much
more, of a similar nature, which occupied the old
nurse the whole afternoon to commit to memory.
The first person that Tapioca met when he
emerged into the street was his friend Capias, to
whom he related all that had transpired, and was
full of golden dreams as to the future. He looked
upon his patient as the true Eldorado, and he
assumed
an air of superiority over the briefless
attorney
,
which did not escape his notice, and it mortified
his pride. How strangely constituted is the mind
of man!The one was elated at the prospect of
physicking an old woman to death, and had already
reached the zenith of his ambition, while the other
was sunk to the nadir of despondency for the lack
of an opportunity of prosecuting some poor devil for
robbing a hen-roost.A cause like that, ye Gods!
would have enabled him to eclipse the reputation of
Cicero and Demosthenes, and though the jury might
sleep and the judges snore, still fame, with her
brazen trump would blow a blast that would be
heard even to the four corners of Hard Scrabble.
And what is life without fame?
Poor Capias was in the slough of despond as he
contemplated the air of importance assumed by his
friend the apothecary; for as long as they continued
upon the same footing, he considered himself at the
head of the village; true, he maintained but a divided
empire, but now his rival had fearfully outstripped
him in the race for glory, and the consequences
were to be deprecated. Moreover Tapioca himself
had undergone an alarming metamorphosis. He
was no longer the slouchy, quiescent creature,
willing
to yield his opinions to the dogmatisms of his
friend Capias. On the contrary, he felt his
importance
and was determined that others should feel it
also; he accordingly pulled up his frill, drew his hat
over his forehead, applied the ivory head of his cane
to his nose, and paraded the main street of Hard
Scrabble for two hours, knee deep in sand, and over
head and ears in a brown study.The dogs barked
at him, the ragged urchins followed in his wake,
and the old women threw up their arms in
amazement
,
still the apothecary stalked on, and felt
himself
like Selkirk, the monarch of all he surveyed.
VOL. II.13
Capias watched his movement, for one hour, and
finally, overpowered by his feelings, shut himself up
in his office, and dropped into his arm chair the
picture
of incurable despair.
It is said that the night is darkest as the morn
approaches, and so it proved to the desponding
attorney
,
for just as he had concluded to pull up stakes
and abandon Hard Scrabble for ever to the
victorious
Tapioca, he was awakened from his gloomy
reflections
by a violent knock at the door, and on
opening it a messenger from Miss Nightshade stood
before him, with a summons to appear in her
presence
without delay.It was sometime before the
attorney recovered sufficiently from his
astonishment
to demand the nature of the lady's business
with him.
She wishes to employ you professionally, said
the messenger.
Ha! What! How!ejaculated the attorney.
It had been so long since the poor fellow had been
employed professionally that he had almost forgot
the meaning of the phrase.
She wants you to draw up her will, continued
the other, for she thinks she is agoing to die.
Make her will!Going to die!I knew how it
would be when she called in that dd cow doctor
Tapioca.He's not fit to physic a pig with the
measles.
Tapioca was still wading through the sand, with
his cane applied to his nose, unconscious of the
illiberal
remarks of his friend the attorney.The
messenger
proposed informing him of the desperate state
of his patient, but Capias objected, protesting that a
second visit from the apothecary would effectually
supercede the necessity of his own services, for he
looked upon him as Death's catch-pole, that in every
pill and potion was a
Capias ad respondendum
, from
which there was not even a temporary escape by any
species of bail or mainprize. How a single drop of
envy will curdle a whole pail full of the milk of
human kindness!
The attorney took from his shelf a book of forms,
and a quire of paper, then cocking his hat fiercely,
and assuming an air of gravity, becoming a man of
business, he proceeded to the dwelling of his client,
and as he passed his triumphant rival, he did not
even condescend to bestow a look of recognition
upon him.Tapioca checked his perambulation, and
with amazement beheld the attorney enter the
residence
of his patient, and though he had been
pluming
himself for the last two hours, it was now a
difficult
matter for him to conceal the white feather.
Capias was solemnly ushered into the chamber of
the invalid, and introduced to her, bolstered up in
an easy chair, an old nurse refreshing her olfactories
with a bottle of hartshorn.Preliminaries being
settled
,
the attorney seated himself at a table, spread
his papers, and commenced taking down the heads
of the instrument.
This is a solemn business, Mr. Capias,
observed
Miss Nightshade, in a faint voice.
Very, madam, but one which it is the duty of us
all to perform sooner or later. Now for my part I
regularly make my will on the 31st day of
December
.I
settle up my affairs, and am always prepared
at a moment's warning. Life is uncertain.
Then you do not think, Mr. Capias, that making
one's will, is likely to hasten one's death?
A vulgar error, madam.On the contrary, it is
calculated to renew our leaseI may call it our
lease for life, for we are all nothing more than mere
tenants for life, here; no fee simple;an estate tail
with remainder to the worms. Making one's will is
calculated to tranquillize the mind, and there is
nothing so conducive to long life as a tranquil mind.
Mens conscia rectias the poet saysyou
understand
,
madam.
Well the thoughts of making my will always
shattered my nerves to that degree!Nurse, that
bottle of salts.But since it must be doneand you
are sure it will not hasten my end, Mr. Capias?
Positive. Ten years ago, old squire Polywog
was considered
in articulo mortis
, and I was sent
for post-haste to make his will. Now the squire
was a bachelor, and when he came to look over the
large estate he was about to bequeath to a parcel of
thankless relatives, who wished him out of the way,
he protested that it would be very disagreeable to
die under such circumstances, so he plucked up
courage, pulled off his night cap, got out of bed, got
married, lived like an emperor, spent his estate, and
inundated Hard Scrabble with a shoal of little
Polywogs
.
O, shocking! exclaimed Miss Nightshade, you
do not mean to recommend the same course of
conduct
to me, Mr. Capias?
Much better than dying, madam, responded the
attorney, bowing, and a safer remedy than taking
Tapioca's physic.
Dear, dear, I should never live to go through
with it!Some hartshorn, nurse.The bare idea
shocks my nervous system to that degree!You
can't think, Mr. Capias!
The nurse bathed her temples, applied the salts
to her nostrils, and the invalid finally recovered
sufficiently
to give Capias the heads of the manner in
which she wished to dispose of her worldly
possessions
,
as follows:
To my brother Jeroboam, and his heirs, Mr.
Capias, I give all my farm in Crane Neck Valley.
It was the family homestead, and it is but right
that brother Jerry should have it, as he is my elder
brother.
Perfectly rightresponded Capias, making a
memorandum. We do not pay sufficient regard
to the continuance of old families among us. Few
are so fortunate as to survive two generations.
What shall Crane Neck farm be rated at, madam?
Ten thousand dollars, replied Miss Deborah,
refreshing her drooping spirits with the hartshorn.
It has been valued at twelve thousand, but as
Jerry
is a favourite brother, put it at ten.
Very well, madam, pray proceed.
His little son Joktan, I should like to provide
for, dear little cherub!the hartshorn nurseso I
will give him the grazing meadows in Muck Slush
Swamp; they may be a handsome estate by the time
he comes of age.
Sufficient, no doubt, madam, to keep him from
being swamped in this dirty world, responded
Capias
,
noting little Joktan's legacy.
Women, you know, Mr. Capias, are always
imposed
upon in the management of real estate, so I
will give all my stock in the five per cents. to my
dear sister Lucretia.
All the stock in the five per cents.muttered
Capias, writingHow much, madam!
Only eight thousand dollars, replied the other,
with a sigh of regret that it was not more.
Only eight thousand! what an eternity of
practice
in Hard Scrabble! ejaculated the attorney.
The invalid proceeded to make handsome bequests
to uncles and aunts, nephews and nieces, and
concluded
by nominating the favourite little Joktan as
residuary legatee, by which time she was completely
exhausted by the exertion, and Capias withdrew to
put the instrument in form, but not before he had
received instructions to have it ready to be executed
the following day.
Capias on the way to his office encountered his
friend Tapioca still standing in the same position as
when they last parted. His curiosity was wrought
to the pitch of agony to ascertain what business the
attorney could possibly have had with his patient.
But that he had business was evident, for he waded
through the sand with an unusual swell, his law
book in one hand, and ostentatiously displaying the
roll of paper in the other.The children ran away,
abashed, and even the whiffets were afraid to bark
at him. Tapioca followed in his wake, as crest fallen
and dejected as Rolla when kneeling to the haughty
Spaniard. Capias entered his office and the
apothecary
followed.
Adversity is said to be the school of virtue; but
13*
this is questionable; for in some minds the worst
feelings take deepest root when fortune frowns, like
poisonous weeds that become more rank in the shade,
while in the sunshine of prosperity flowers alone
would bud and blossom in the same soil.When a
man is on good terms with himself he usually looks
with an eye of complacency upon the whole world,
and so it was with Capias. Finding himself in the
ascendent, the bitter feelings that had annoyed him
a few hours before were no longer remembered, and
he looked upon his rival with a smile of complacency,
at the same time assuming a sort of patronizing air.
This constant aiming at superiority is happily
illustrated
in one of Sheridan's comedies, where an
errand boy having been cuffed by the footman,
exclaims
Master kicks Tag, Tag kicks me, and I'll
go kick the dog.He is a poor devil indeed who
has not even a dog to kick.
Tapioca encouraged by the smile aforesaid,
ventured
to ask in a faltering voice, what it was had
called him to Miss Nightshade's lodgings.
Professional business, replied Capias,
pompously
.
I rejoice to hear itthat was a white lie.Of
what nature, pray?
To make the old lady's will.She already
smokes that you are not a regular practitioner and
she thinks it well to be prepared for the worst.
Bless my soul! You did not hint at such a
thing?
Dr. Tapioca you must be aware that I am
superior
to such a pitiful act of treachery.You are my
friend, and to prove that I think you so, I will let
you into a secret.
A secret! I am all impatience.
You have read of the mines of Peru? said
Capias
,
with an air of mystery.
I have.
You have also heard of the golden fleece of
Jason?
Certainly.
And of Sinbad's cavern of diamonds?
I have read of that also.
Then, my dear fellow, you will be astonished,
continued Capias, tapping him gently on the
shoulder
,
when I inform you that the wealth of all these
is united in that old woman. Zounds, man, she's
the only true philosopher's stone.
I am amazed! But how do you know all this?
How do I know? I am her legal adviser, and
we gentlemen of the law are entrusted with
important
secrets at times. See here, he continued,
spreading
open the sheet of memoranda he had taken, as
deliberately as if he had been opening Pandora's
boxSee here is a brief outline of her possessions.
Tapioca cast his eye over the several bequests,
and ejaculated, with uplifted hands, Bless my
soul!
Now answer me one question, upon the honour
of a medical man, continued CapiasIs she
seriously
ill?
Very.
What is her complaint?
Can't sayall sortsa complication of
disorders
;
sometimes one, sometimes another.
You are of opinion she can't last long?
A month at farthest.
You are her physician, and no doubt will see
your prediction verified. Now, my friend, I have
another secret to impart. I have been a long time
at the bar, and wish to retire from practice.
That would be repaying practice in its own
coin, replied the apothecary, with a sardonic grin.
You may laugh, sir, but there's no joke in that,
continued the other, gravely. Business is becoming
too fatiguing, and it is time that I should think of
settling myself comfortably for life. I have an idea
of making the old lady Mrs. Capias.
And at the same time making yourself
comfortable
with the golden fleece?
Precisely so. I shall then, my dear friend, leave
to you the undivided throne of Hard Scrabble, and
retire to my plantation in Crane Neck Valley; and
while I sink into the obscurity of private life, I
must endeavour to console myself with the ten
thousand in the five per cents., brother Jerry's
consternation
,
and little Joktan's residuary legacy.
What think you of my plan?
Admirable! nothing could be better.
Do what you can to forward it, and we shall
have rare sport, snipe shooting in Muck Slush
meadows
.
I know you are fond of snipe shooting.
Always was.
I am to see her to-morrow, at four o'clock, with
the will, and I shall change her thoughts from death,
or my tongue has lost the power of persuasion.
Now go, and let me finish the will. Business, you
know, is paramount to all other considerations.
Certainly. To-morrow at four?
At four precisely, I shall make an opening into
the mines of Peru.
And bear off the Hesperian fruit, in spite of the
dragon, said Tapioca.
Dragon and all, added Capias, as Tapioca left
the office, and the attorney commenced the last will
and testament of Miss Nightshade.
The following day, about two o'clock, Tapioca
was seen slowly walking along the street of Hard
Scrabble towards the lodgings of his patient, in deep
thought, with his ivory-headed cane applied to his
thin proboscis. The reader is already aware that
Miss Deborah had foretold that at this time she
would be speechless, and accordingly she lay in
state, as mute as an oyster awaiting the tide, at the
same time enjoying the commiseration of the village
gossips, who had assembled on the momentous
occasion
.
This is a custom which regular practitioners
protest against, as the incessant clatter which half a
dozen old women necessarily must occasion, is
considered
even more injurious to the patient than the
physic which the established routine of science
compels
him to swallow.
The windows were all darkened, and not a word
was spoken above a whisper, although the conclave
was composed of the most loquacious gossips of
Hard Scrabble. But then the whisper was as
unbroken
as the hum in a bee-hive, when its inmates
are preparing to swarm. The invalid overheard
their whispering with inward satisfaction, and slily
watched their motions without the apprehension of
being seen, as the bed curtains were carefully closed
to prevent the light from incommoding her.
At length Tapioca arrived. On passing the
thresh-hold
,
his under jaw suddenly fell, his cadaverous
countenance became distended, and he assumed the
mock solemnity of a verger at the head of a funeral
procession. He approached the bed, felt the patient's
pulse, and after a few significant interjections, such
as, hum! ha! delightful pulse! moist skin! changes
for the better, &c. he seated himself and inquired
of the nurse the progress of the complaint since his
last visit, as he found it impossible to elicit an
answer from Miss Deborah. The old nurse began
her story:
She was taken with a fever, sir, shortly after
you left her.
A chill, a chill you mean, exclaimed Miss
Deborah
,
petulantly.
True, true, I remember now. She was taken
with a violent chill, which was succeeded by a raging
fever.
That's right, interrupted the speechless patient,
at the same time raising herself upon her elbow, to
attend to the interesting relation.
She then fell into a restless sleep, continued
the nurse.
Not so, cried the old maid, your memory is
very treacherous. After lying in a delirious state
Oh! yes, that's it. After lying in a delirious
state for three hours, she awoke with the most
excruciating
head-ache.
No, noyou stupid old  what's to become
of the restless sleep? Get out of the room, and I
will relate it to the doctor myself, although the
exertion
may occasion a relapse;which she
accordingly
did, in a narration interspersed with a few
intersting episodes, which occupied a full hour.
Tapioca listened like a lineal descendant of Job,
occasionally throwing in a hum, or a ha! by
way of keeping up the dialogue, or enlivening the
conversation.
When the invalid had finished, the gossips began
to deplore the state of the sick woman, and to
express
their doubts as to the propriety of the course
of treatment the apothecary had adopted. One
contended
that the medicine he had prescribed was too
active for her feeble system, and that a second dose
would be the death of her. Another was positive
that there was
marcury
in the pills, and there was
nothing worse in cases like the present than
marcury
pills. A third had lost her husband in two hours
after taking a dose of pills, and she could never
abide the sight of a pill since, for they were all rank
pisen
. She put on her spectacles, opened the box,
and protested that they were the same
pisenous
things
that her husband had taken, for they looked as much
alike as two peas. Miss Nightshade herself, besought
Tapioca not to prescribe any more of those pills, for
they had occasioned such violent spasms that she
was certain she could not survive a return of her
sufferings. Tapioca was astounded; for in
compounding
the pills he had most scrupulously
followed
the mystical recipe already adverted to, with the
addition of a little liquorice powder, in order to give
his boluses of bread a legitimate aspect.
Seeing the practitioner confounded, the gossips
benevolently undertook to prescribe for the patient
themselves. One was certain she could cure her,
and was for drenching her with
yarb
tea, for her
complaint lay on her
innards
and should be brought
out by
presperation
through the pores. Another
thought the complaint was
narvous
, and that the
patient should have nourishing food, so she
recommended
clam soup, for every body knows there's
nothing so strengthening as clam soup; and the old
lady with the spectacles, who had peeped into the
pill box, was positive it was a fit of the
agy
, and
there was nothing better for the
agy
than brandy and
black pepper. She had cured even the dumb
agy
with six doses, when the patient had become too
lazy even to shake. Another old woman contended
that it was the cholera, and she was for applying
bags of hot sand to the patient's stomach, and
injecting
her veins with boiling sea water. This, she
contended
,
was the most approved and speedy method
of relieving the patient, and that the experiment
might be made without expense, as Hard Scrabble
abounded with both the remedies.
When doctors disagree, then comes the tug of
war. We occasionally see whole colleges of
physicians
going to loggerheads about matters of as little
importance as herb tea, clam soup, brandy and
pepper, and hot sand and salt water, and then we
behold
Corruption boil and bubble
Till it o'errun the stew,
and peace is not to be restored until the advocate of
herb tea is dethroned, and he of the clam soup party
elevated to his place; and as the lights of true
science become more effulgent, we behold the clam
soup champion, in his turn, whistled down the
wind, to bray at fortune, while the triumphant
champion of hot sand and salt water mounts the
throne, and, flushed with victory, cries havoc, and
let's slip the dogs of war. All things in this
mundane
sphere are subject to the mutations of fashion,
and he is indeed a skilful licentiate, and beyond
reproach, who makes it his business to dispose of
all his patients in the most recent and fashionable
manner, without distinction of parties. It would
be exceedingly mortifying to the humblest and
best-tempered
man in the world, to be slovenly
despatched
by phlebotomy, at a season when blistering is all
the rage.
The practitioners of Hard Scrabble, after voting,
nem. con., that Tapioca would kill his patient, if he
continued to administer the active remedies he had
resorted to, commenced dissertations on the virtues
of herb tea, clam soup, &c. each advocating her
favourite panacea, with that zeal peculiar to village
matrons who have brooded over one cherished idea,
until it stands as prominent and fixed in the waste
of mind as Chimborazo in the map of South
America
.
As they were all talkers and no listeners, the
jargon soon became as deafening as was the
confusion
of tongues at the building of Babel. Tapioca
looked on in silent amazement, while his patient
peeped from behind the curtains and evidently
enjoyed
the commotion her case had occasioned. The
disputants, finding words to be weak weapons, having
thoroughly rung the changes upon
yarb
tea, clam
soup, and salt water, finally fell to pulling each
other's caps, when Tapioca thought it high time to
interfere, and endeavour to dislodge the invaders,
which he succeeded in doing, but not until the skirt
of his coat, and his enormous frill, had received
tristful tokens of the fierceness of the struggle.
Disciples of the healing art in a village have much
to encounter from rivals of this description.
Our hero, having possession of the field, adjusted
his discomfitted apparel, then seated himself beside
the bed to tranquillize the agitated nerves of his
patient, and in order to produce this result, took her
hand and gave it a gentle squeeze, at the same time
looking as tenderly as the Macedonian upon Statira,
or Antony upon the crocodile of the Nile. True,
this was a strange prescription for excited nerves,
but we all know that country apothecaries
occasionally
administer a wrong medicine, still as the present
did not appear to be disagreeable, and was perfectly
harmless, the mistake was excusable. Like a
cautious
practitioner, he closely watched the effects,
and finding the symptoms favourable, he repeated
the dose, which acted as a charm, and like Othello,
upon that hint he spake.
I understand your system, madam, thoroughly,
and take my word for it, there is but one remedy
can restore you.
And what is that, doctor?
Matrimony, madam, he replied, in a tone of
decision that would have become Esculapius
himself
Matrimony
is a radical cure.
Do not mention it. The bare idea shocks my
nerves to that degree you cannot think! She
covered
her face, to conceal her confusion, or rather
that she might appear to be confused.
It is the only prescription that will avail, I assure
you, he continued, gravelyYou might swallow
my whole shop, madam, and still not recover. There
is more virtue in matrimony than in antimony,
though at times they operate in the same mannera
little nausea, which tends to keep up a wholesome
excitement, and renews the energies of life.
Mr. Capias hinted at something of the kind,
replied Miss Nightshade, in a bashful tone.
He did! And what does that pettifogger know
about the healing art? An impudent fortune-hunter,
and so poverty-stricken that even Lazarus himself
would blush to claim kindred with him.
A fortune-hunter! You shock me!
A desperate fortune-hunter, madam, and I assure
you, on the honour of a medical man, that he has
already fixed his eye upon the farm in Crane Neck
Valley, and little Joktan's legacy.
Dear little Joktan!And could he be so cruel
as to deprive the poor child of its inheritance?
Fortune-hunters have no more bowels than a
chameleon; moreover he's an attorney, `a dull and
muddy mettled rascal,' who manages to keep body
and soul together by shooting snipe and catching
oysters, which he calls practising law.You know
him now, madam, so be on your guard.
It is to be deplored that such are suffered to
go at large and prey upon the credulous and
unsuspecting
,
said Miss Deborah, with a sigh.
Greatly to be deplored, responded Tapioca
VOL. II.14
gravely, for if there is any thing I heartily despise,
it is your idle, worthless fortune-hunter.
They are the bane of society, said Miss
Deborah
.
Destroyers of the peace and happiness of
families
,
responded Tapioca.
Should be shunned as a pestilence, added Miss
Nightshade.
Hunted as beasts of prey, continued the
apothecary
,and
should be doomed to drink of the bitter
waters of disappointment.
I am delighted to hear such correct sentiments,
said the lady.
A man without sentiment, may be compared to
toa bitter shaddock; tempting without, gall
within, added Tapioca.But may I ask what it
was Mr. Capias presumed to say to you?
He incidentally referred to the case of a certain
Squire Polywog, who was restored to health by
matrimony, and though he did not speak plainly,
the conclusion was irresistible.
Sly dog!Well I must say the case of the old
squire was miraculous;he was under my hands
for six months; went through the whole
pharmacopoeia
,
and was beginning anew, when to the
astonishment
of all, he insisted on the parson saying the
marriage ceremony instead of the funeral service,
and is now the merriest man in Hard Scrabble.
I should like to see him, exclaimed the invalid,
her eye sparkling like a pewter button.
It would do your heart good, continued the
man of drugs, and then the dear little Polywogs
paddling in the puddles!
O, don't name it!Shocking! I can't think of
such a thing!
Think of what, madam? asked the apothecary
in a tone as insinuating as a seton.
I can never consent to be restored to health on
those conditions, replied the patient with a
languishing
air.
Self preservation is the first law of nature,
replied
the apothecary, gravely.
True, very true. I have heard as much from
brother Jerry.
No one should wantonly abandon the post
assigned
him, continued Tapioca, applying his ivory
headed cane to his nose.
O dear! you shock my nerves to that degree!
Desperate means are resorted to by bold
practitioners
in desperate cases.
And do you really think my case so desperate,
doctor?
Very. He felt her pulse, which was attended
with a great squeeze of the hand, as he added, and
unless you follow my prescriptions implicitly, I will
not answer for the consequences.
It's a shocking thing to die, doctor.
Terrible.It is a step, that once taken cannot
be recalled.`To die, to sleep no more,' as
Shakspeare
has it.
To sleep no more!Nay, doctor, one does
nothing
but sleep.
True; you are right; Shakespeare's wrong. To
sleep! perchance to dream! ay, there's the rub.
And such frightful dreams, doctor!
Worse than the nightmare, no doubt.
Do you think so?
Upon the veracity of a medical man, replied
Tapioca, spreading his broad hand upon his bosom.
True, I never died myself, but my patients have,
and I have consequently a right to know something
about it.
Dear, dear, it is shocking to that degree, that I
must submit to your prescription. But I should like
to see Squire Polywog and his interesting progeny
before I venture.
She desired Tapioca to withdraw, and await her
appearance in the parlour. He bowed profoundly
and obeyed, and before a quarter of an hour had
elapsed, he was gratified in finding that his prescrip
tion had operated like the wand of Marquino,
[2]
[2]
A necromancer in Cervantes' tragedy of Numantia, who
possessed the power of raising the dead.
for
his patient came tripping in and smiling as the month
of May after a hard winter, a smart bunch of
ribands
sticking in her cap, like the red flag of a
pirate, indicating slaughter to all who might fall in
her way. A bunch of pink riband should operate
as a caution to all old bachelors, for when it is hung
out on the maintop, they may rest assured that no
quarter will be shown, when they come to boarding.
The delighted couple sallied forth through the
sand to visit the Nestor of the village, Squire
Polywog
.
What were the topics of their conversation
on the way history has failed to record, and never
having attempted the character of Pyramus to a
Thisbe in her grand climacteric, even imagination
affords no clue to supply the interesting hiatus.
What was said can never be known, but doubtless
all that could be said on such a trying occasion, was
said by the little apothecary, for Miss Nightshade
appeared at the squire's office, with a blush on her
cheek and a smile in her eye, while her whole
face was dimpled like a basin of cream. The man
who can suddenly produce such astonishing results,
must be intimately acquainted with all the secret
avenues to the human heart.
The portly squire was seated in his curule chair,
looking out with a placid and benign countenance
upon a swarm of little breechless Polywogs playing
in the hot sand before the door. He was in one of
those happy moods when a man thinks he thinks,
and the looker-on might labour under the same
delusion
,
and place him on the list of philosophers,
when in fact he was only sleeping, and lacked
sufficient
energy even to close his eye-lids. Village
justices
are subject to this disease, especially after
dinner in the dog days.
The entrance of Tapioca and the lady recalled
the wandering senses of the squire from the land of
dreams. He rubbed his eyes, grunted out
something
like an apology for being caught dozing in the
seat of justice, as if an occurrence of that nature
required an apology, when Tapioca interrupted him,
by introducing Miss Nightshade, who was delighted,
for there was such an air of comfort, and the sweet
pretty little Polywogs, looked so healthy and happy,
and ragged and dirty, and the old justice gave such
a hearty paternal chuckle, as they boxed each other
heels over head in the sand, that the spinster could
not restrain her feelings, and she ejaculated, Well,
this is indeed a rural felicity!
Them ere chaps, ma'am, are the
rale
bone and
sinner
of the nation, exclaimed the delighted father.
Tough twigs from the
genwine
tree of democracy;
and if they live long enough they'll all be
congressmen
or militia colonels, I warrant 'em. The
Polywogs
were never born to stick in the mud.
The old squire had a proper share of that family
pride and ambition, inseparable from your true
republican
,
who is disposed to look upon all mankind
as free and equal, though he inwardly feels
himself
a
leetle
superior to the general batch, and
accordingly
our justice had twice dreamed that he was
President of the United States, but unfortunately
for the destinies of the nation, he could not dream
it the third time. Others have had a similar dream,
but did not come as near the mark as Squire
Polywog
,
for he dreamt twice.
Tapioca desired the squire to show them into a
more private apartment, when the retailer of law in
the small way, cried to his progeny in front of the
door,
Washington, tell Lafayette, to call Napoleon,
to run round the house, and open the back window
of the little parlour.
The mandate was passed from one to the other,
and the little bareheaded Napoleon was promptly
seen turning the corner to obey orders, as ragged as
a colt, and with his right hand twitching up a pair
of razeed galligaskins, which had descended like an
14*
heir-loom from his worthy progenitor, to
Washington
,
from Washington to Lafayette, and from
Lafayette
to the present possessor. Such is the state
of man!
You perceive there is discipline in my family,
doctor, remarked the squire, with a significant nod.
A word is sufficient. Obedient children are a
great blessing.
Dear little pets, they must be a great source of
comfort to you, said the spinster, as they entered
the parlour together, and closed the door.
A few minutes after they had disappeared,
Capias
entered the office, giving evidence of the
excitement
of the moment, by wiping the perspiration
from his forehead. He had been at Miss
Nightshade's
lodgings agreeably to appointment, and
learning from the nurse that she had gone to take a
walk with her physician, he started in pursuit, and
succeeded in tracing them to justice Polywog's
office. He was allowed sufficient time to cool
himself
before the parties returned from the parlour,
and on their entrance, he said, addressing the
spinster
,
I am amazed, madam, at your speedy restoration
to health.
A skilful practitioner, can at times work
miracles
,
Mr. Capias, responded the lady.
Especially when he understands the constitution
of his patient, added Tapioca.
I have drawn up your will, madam, agreeably to
your instructions, continued the attorney.
I am sorry to have given you so much
unnecessary
trouble, replied the lady, as I shall now be
under the necessity of altering my will in favour of
another.
Another!Jerry and Joktan cut off with a
shilling
!
And who is the favourite now?
My husband, sir.
Your husband! I am all amazement!
Allow me, Mr. Capias, to introduce you to Mrs.
Tapioca, said the apothecary, with a pompous air.
Squire Polywog had made them flesh of one flesh.
Ha! Mrs. Tapioca! Unheard of treachery!
exclaimed the attorney.
Practice is becoming too burdensome, and I
thought it time to settle for life, whispered the
apothecary.
To be outwitted by a quack!
You shall go snipe shooting on Muck Slush
meadows, continued TapiocaYou are fond of
snipe shooting?
Blood and thunder!
Never mind; I will leave you the undivided
throne of Hard Scrabble, while I lie snug in the
golden fleece.
This is beyond endurance. Madam, there is the
will, and though you have thought proper to change
your mind, I expect to be paid for my service. Dr.
Tapioca, I shall find a time to punish this breach of
friendship.
You will find me delving in the mines of Peru,
exclaimed the apothecary, laughing, as Capias quit
the office in a rage. The happy couple bent their
way towards the dwelling place of the man of
drugs.
Before the honey moon had elapsed, Tapioca was
desirous of seeing his farm in Crane Neck Valley,
Muck Slush meadows, and the ten thousand in the
five per cents., but he might as well have searched
for the elixir of life, for they were all in
terra
incognita
.
He asked his helpmate for information, but
she could afford him none. He reproached her with
having deceived him, and she charged him with
having deceived himself, as she never told him she
possessed any thing.
And after all it appears, my dear, you married
me for my fortune.
Damn your fortune, exclaimed poor pilgarlic,
in a rage.
Remember, love, a fortune-hunter should be
shunned
as a pestilence.
Ha!
The destroyer of the peace and happiness of
families.
Ha! His lower jaw fell, and he stared
vacantly
.
Hunted as a beast of prey.
You hunted me, he sighed, dolefully.
Should be doomed to drink of the bitter waters
of disappointment. Those, I think, lovey, were
your very words.
Doomed to drink opium! he exclaimed, as he
left the room to escape from her irony.
Tapioca's mortification did not terminate here.
As Capias could not get paid for his trouble in
making the will which had seduced our worthy into
all his difficulties, he sued him before Justice
Polywog
,
for services done his wife, and judgment,
according
to custom, went for the plaintiff. Tapioca
never paid money with so ill a grace. It is scarcely
necessary to add that he could never get out of Hard
Scrabble, and that all he gained by his matrimonial
speculation, was a constant patient, who imagined
herself afflicted with more complaints than may be
found in an hospital, and who afforded our disciple of
Galen regular practicea decided advantage to a
young beginner. This veracious narrative will tend
to illustrate the proverbs which tell you to look
before you leap, and never to buy a pig in a
poke.
THE
PAUPER AND HIS DOG.
The short and simple annals of the poor.
No funeral rights, nor man in mournful weeds,
Nor mournful bell shall ring
his
burial.
Shakspeare
.
There
is something peculiarly sweet of a summer
evening, in a country village, when the heat and
bustle of the day are over, and smiling clusters are
assembled before each door to enjoy the gossip of
the day, or hear the news that the post has lately
brought. There is certainly witchery in this hour,
for no heart, however rugged, can resist its
influence
the
tender wife clings with increased fondness
to her husband, and though her tongue had sounded
its fearful alarm, through the house since breakfast
time, she is now prepared to greet his return with
smiles and caresses. Every glance of the young
lover, seems to make an impression, and the
delighted
heart of his mistress most religiously believes
all the soft nonsense that he whispers to her. The
children have changed their rough amusements for
those of a softer nature. The tongue is licensed.
Every faint attempt at wit or humour, is greeted
with a hearty welcome, and the rude jest that at any
other time might have provoked a frown, is treated
as innocent, and turned off with a hearty burst of
laughter; and even the rough house dog slowly wags
his tail, as if he participated in the good humour.
One evening, as I was taking my accustomed
walk, I directed my steps, by chance, towards the
grave-yard, which is a lonely and romantic spot,
somewhat more than a quarter of a mile distant from
the village. The last rays of the sun were just seen
above the horizon. The universal calm that
prevailed
,
was broken alone by the tinkling of the bells,
and the occasional lowing of the herd that was
slowly winding home, intermingled with the shout
and whistle of the cow-boy as he gambolled with his
watch-dog. A few stray birds were flying low, and
hastily to their nests, while one or two remained to
twitter their vespers of gratitude, before they
retired
.
I approached the yard, and in the most remote
part of it, discovered the old sexton preparing a
grave, whilst his little son, seated on a tomb stone,
was conning aloud, the fulsome epitaph that was
chiselled on it; the old man interrupted him at every
line, to comment on the virtues and errors of the
departed. A tender husband`tis very strange'
said the old man, leaning on his spade, that I never
found it out soonerhe beat his wife once a week
to my certain knowledge, and she, poor soul, is
weeping for him now.But go on boy.' An
affectionate
father and brother. `Stop therehe
suffered his only son to wander a vagabond, without
a cent in his pocket, and he cheated his brother.'
His heart was ever alive to charity. `Humph!
just as much so as it is nowit was as hard as the
stone that my pick strikes against.' A zealous
Christian. `True, he attended meeting regularly,
I cannot blame him there.' And an honest man.
`Right, I believe he never stole. We must remove
that stone, boy, and place it at the head of this
grave; the poor fellow that is to rot here, is much
more deserving of the epitaph, though he died too
miserably poor to purchase onewell, at all events,
that stone should be removed, and not replaced,
until the being who now moulders beneath it lives
in the memory of no one.' I interrupted them, and
discovered that this eulogium was bestowed upon
the remains of a wealthy villager, whose funeral I
attended a few weeks before. The old sexton was
somewhat abashed at my having overheard his
remarks
;
but a life of the strictest virtue is no
protection
against calumny of this kindevery little
error rises in judgment against us here, while each
good action remains buried in the grave, or is
remembered
alone where it can never be forgotten.
The shallow grave was soon finishedthe setting
sun had now quite disappeared, and the old man
expressed some displeasure that the corpse had not
yet arrived. I mentioned that the grave was scarcely
deep enoughhe coolly replied, It is deep enough
for Davy. For whom? For old Davy, the
village
pauper. My lips began to quiver, and I felt
a sudden tug at the heart; a tear was stealing from
itI turned away, ashamed to discover my
weakness
,
and suffered the foolish drop to be congealed
on the lid of compassion, by the cold indifference of
the person near methe first perhaps to follow
him!What smote my heart, I know notwas it
the death of the poor old soldier, or
'tis deep enough
for Davy?
But this is of little momentthere are
many avenues to the human heart, that the most
skilful anatomists have been unable to discover
many that are never travelled a second time, and I
envy not that man his feelings, who has not shed
full many a tear, without being able to assign a
reason.
Scarcely ten days before this, I had seen poor
Davy, wandering about in perfect health, and though
destitute of both home and kindred, he had the grace
not to murmur, but strived to appear satisfied with
his condition. At length he has found a home, and
is now upon a par with the wealthiest monarch since
the world began! On inquiring of the sexton about
his death, I learnt that in consequence of frequently
lodging in the open air, he had contracted a violent
fever that deprived him of life in the short space of
three days. He had died that morning at the hut of
an old woman, who has the reputation of being a
witch throughout the village; but what degree of
belief should be attached to these reports, I cannot
take upon myself to decide. Certain it is there are
many wonderful stories in circulation, and all the
accidents that take place in the country for ten miles
round are attributed to her mischievous disposition.
Not long since, Jenkins, the schoolmaster, was
thrown from his horse and broke his arm; and the
old woman at the same time was discovered crossing
the road with a bundle of sticks upon her head. The
sexton had the misfortune to quarrel with her, and
the next morning, when business called him to a
neighbouring village, his nag was taken with a string
halt. And Betty the milk-maid tells me, that once
having churned for three hours without any sign of
butter, she looked into the lid of the churn, and saw
old mother Tanner's face at the bottom of it,
laughing
at her. But this was entrusted to me on
promise
of secrecy, as she would not have it come to
the ears of the old woman for the world.
We now observed the hearse approaching at a
brisk pace, through the dark lane of thick cedars
that led to the grave yard. The driver whistled
carelessly on his seat. The retinue consisted of
four or five ragged urchins, without hat or shoes,
who ran almost breathless beside the hearse, to see
old Davy buried, each striving to be at the
grave-yard
first. But there was one mourner whose sorrow
was sincerehe appeared as if he had lost the only
friend that he had in this world, for he had been
the only friend and constant companion of the pauper
through all his wanderings. It was his dog! who
trotted dejectedly beneath the hearse, with tail
hanging
,
and head bent to the earth. Was this reason?
Was the poor animal conscious of his loss?or did
he follow his master to the grave merely from the
habit of being with him? Man, in his wisdom, no
doubt will call it powerful instinctwell, be it so;
the name is of little weight, for the warm tear of
instinct, I humbly trust, may plead as eloquently at
the gates of heaven as that which is shed by cold
calculating reason.
The hearse was drawn to the grave, and the
remains of the pauper, enclosed in a rough board
coffin, were taken from it. The boys crowded
together on the brink of the grave, to witness the
performance of the last sad ceremony, but not a tear
was shed. The dog was driven back repeatedly,
for being in the way, until he came to where I stood,
and seemed to beg protection. The coffin was
deposited
,
and they were proceeding to cover it, when I
interrupted them, by commencing the funeral
service
they
paused and heard me patiently to the
end. The mourner, during the whole time, stood
gazing intently where his master lie, and when the
first shovel-full of earth rattled on the coffin, he
leapt across the grave, and violently bit the sexton
on the legthe old man smote him with his spade,
for his heart was not framed to value the affection
of a dog. The earth being hastily closed, the driver
remounted his hearse, and drove off rapidly through
the dark lane of cedars, followed by the raggamuffin
boys, who ran away delighted at having seen old
Davy buried. The sexton shouldered his
pick-axe
and spade, and slowly bent his way towards the
village, repeating to his little son the faults of the
wealthy villager. The dog and myself remained
alone.
The last glimpse of twilight now was vanishing
a few light clouds, made nearly transparent by the
beams of the moon, hung motionless in the air. The
shriek of the whip-poor-will, as he darted his rapid
flight, and the whirl of the beetle were the only
sounds now heard. The lofty pines that cast their
deep shadows over the tenements of the dead, slowly
waved their tops in the gentle breeze, and seemed
to sleep in the calmness of the evening. By caresses
VOL. II.15
and attention at length I induced the dog to leave
the grave of his master; he licked my hand and
reluctantly followed me, but stopt repeatedly and
looked back in expectation of poor Davy.
Imagination
can flatter the strongest reasoning mind with
such a hope, when leaving the last remains of those
we lovethen do not smile that instinct was
deluded
.
I had not proceeded more than half way
through the solitary lane of cedars, when I
discovered
that the dog had left me. I called him several
times, but as he did not return, I pursued my way,
reflecting most bitterly how very few men I have
met with in the course of my life, possessing hearts
as sincere and affectionate as the pauper's dog.
The next evening, in the course of my walk, I
visited the grave of Davy. All was as still as the
night precedinga solitary crow was cawing and
rocking himself upon the blighted top of an aged
oak that stood beside the grave yard. The dog was
there lying upon the earth that covered his master,
keeping a flock of sheep at bay that was pasturing
all around upon the tombs of those who had full
many a tear of friendship shed for them. One
mourner only attended the pauper's burial, but the
sorrows of that one speak more plainly the virtues
of his master's heart, than if a long train of sabled
mourners had bewailed his loss. Reason may easily
be deceived and cheated into lovethe blackest
heart, from interested motives, may assume the face
of virtue, and blind all reasoninstinct never errs,
for man has here no motive for deceit, and every
caress must spring from the innate virtues of his
heart. Farewell, poor wandererthy sufferings are
over. The close of thy life was a solitary one, and
shows the vanity of human prediction. There was a
timebut whose life is exempt from a close like this?
Not one. It may be your fate, and it may be mine;
but be that as it may, I very much question whether
either of us shall have as sincere a mourner as poor
Davy's dog. Well, he had but one!and may the
tears shed by the humble partaker of his tenderness
have due weight in that place where every drop
from the heart's sincerity is recorded. I will erect
a stone to the pauper's memorynot in ostentation,
nor the vanity of human pride, but to teach a lesson
to mankind. One short line will include all his
virtueshe needs no longer epitaph, for it speaks
volumes:
He was beloved by his dog
.
THE
OLD MAID'S LEGACY.
CHAPTER I.
Old
maids, at times, have singular notions of
metaphysics
,
and why should they not; since the remark
is equally applicable to some able professors, who
receive large salaries to declaim in colleges.
Penelope Singleton, early imbibed the idea that
there was no family as free from alloy as the
Singletons
on this side of the Atlantic. There was
not a tradesman or mechanic to be found even
among the most distant branches of the genealogical
tree. All the Singletons were either gentlemen or
ladies;born to consume, not to produce.
Ornamental
,
but not useful. Panoplied with these notions, Miss
Penelope was unapproached, and unapproachable.
Her brother, Reginald Singleton, of Singleton Hall,
was the magnus Apollo of the family. Every family
has its magnus Apollo. There is a white bird in all
flocks, no matter how black the rest may be.
Reginald
had been a colonel in the
militia, before it
was customary to appear on parade armed with
corn-stocks and broom-sticks, and as he had been
called colonel time out of mind, it was generally
believed that he had served under Washington.
This opinion he deemed it unnecessary to rectify,
and whenever the question was too closely pressed,
he would evade it by saying, it was unpleasant to
talk about the services he had rendered his
country
.
Like the rest of the family, the colonel was
a great stickler for gentility, and that he might
maintain
his pretensions to the last, he died one day with
a fit of the gout in his stomach. There needs no
other proof that he was a gentleman; for as Galen
sagely remarks, the gout is the most aristocratic of
all diseases, and Galen was tolerable authority
before
panaceas and catholicons came in fashion.
The colonel, like non-productives generally, died
involved. He had made a nice calculation that
Singleton Hall would supply his wants for a certain
number of years, and when that time elapsed the
accuracy of his arithmetic was fully tested. The
colonel died, having spent his last dollar, and his
property was found to be mortgaged for its full
value. It requires talents of no ordinary grade to
make a calculation of this description; for if he had
accidentally slipped a figure, and the gout in his
stomach had not come to his relief, at the precise
moment his resources had left him, it is no difficult
matter to conceive how the colonel would have been
astonished. It is the lot of many to play their part
through life with credit, but few have the knack to
time a happy exit, and that to the ambitious is all
important, for we are remembered only as we were
when we died, and not as when we lived.
The colonel, besides a host of creditors, left two
daughters to mourn his loss. The elder, whose
name was Isabel, was about twenty, and her sister
Mary two years younger. They were both lovely
girls, though the elder had been partially deprived
of reason for several years. The girls at the time
of our story resided in Singleton Hall, a splendid
mansion on the banks of the Delaware, without any
other means of support than the interest of what
15*
their father owed. Many live in a similar manner
and keep their coaches.
The time having arrived when aunt Penelope felt
that she was about to be gathered to her fathers, she
prepared to set her house in order; and though she
had herself done but little to perpetuate the
Singleton
family, she imagined that the world would come
to an end, should it become extinct. What would
after ages do without them! No; Mary must be
married to give the world assurance of a man.
But who was worthy to receive the hand of the sole
heir of all the pride of the Singletons! No one but
a Singleton! Fortunately Mary had a cousin
Arthur
,
a lieutenant in the navy, otherwise her worthy
aunt would have condemned her to the Malthusian
life she had led herself.
Arthur was fixed upon for this important duty.
But he was at sea, and as the young couple had not
seen each other for four years, possibly in this world
of disappointments something might occur to thwart
her latest wishes. Accordingly, she framed her will
in such a way as she imagined would bring about
what she most desired. If there was any thing on
earth to be relied upon, it was the generosity of the
Singletons. There was not a selfish bone in the
body of one of them. Taking this position for
granted, she bequeathed all her fortune to Arthur
and Mary, but the one who should first refuse to
accept the other in marriage should be entitled to the
whole legacy. This was working by the rule of
contraries, but then she knew that neither would be
so selfish as to refuse for the purpose of enriching
himself.
There was a certain Mr. Jenkins living in the
vicinity of Singleton Hall. Joseph Jenkins, a
cotton
spinner, who was as full of motion and bustle as
one of his own jennies. He belonged to that class
of men who appear to have been sent into the world
for no other purpose than to spin cotton, and make
money. He possessed the charm of Midas, and he
cared not a rush for high tariff or low tariff, for
whatever he touched was promptly converted into
gold. Your undistinguished Joseph Jenkins is the
right fellow to travel prosperously through this dirty
world. Your high sounding Mortimers and
Fitzhughs
,
too frequently sink dejected by the way-side;
but who ever heard of a Jenkins, Smith or Jones
sticking in the mire. And if such an accident should
chance to befall them, they have the consolation of
not being identified in the myriads of the same
cognomen
,
and shortly you see them brushing the dirt
from their heels, and travelling on as spruce and
impudently as ever. The name of Jones or Smith
is about as convenient an inheritance as a man's
godfather can bestow upon him.
Joseph Jenkins was a good fellow in the main.
He was as industrious as a brewer's horse, and at
the same time as liberal as a prince. Colonel
Singleton
was charmed with his company, for Jenkins
lent him money freely, without examining too closely
into the security, and the cotten spinner was equally
charmed with the company of the colonel, as it
afforded
him frequent opportunities of seeing the
fair face of Mary. And many a long yarn he spun
with her, until she began to look upon him with
much favour in spite of his plebeian calling.
Our veracious history commences in the month of
May, in the year 18. The colonel and his sister
Penelope had resolved themselves into their
primitive
elements, and notwithstanding the large space
they had occupied in their passage through this
world, they now remained perfectly quiet in a very
narrow compass, and in spite of their pride, their
possessions were upon an equality with the meanest
of their neighbours. Death is your only true
radical
;
he reduces all to the same level; a heap of
ashes;nothing more! We occasionally meet with
men, loth to believe this fact, though solemnly
proclaimed
every Sabbath from the pulpit.
It was the smiling month of May; the fields had
put on their livery of green; the blue birds were
singing on the budding trees, and old Delaware
rolled as freely and as majestically as though he had
never been subject to ice-bound fetters. Phbus was
spurring his fiery footed steeds over the Jersey hills,
with such speed, as though he had over slept his time in
the rosy arms of Tethys, or in common parlance, it
was about two hours after sun rise, when a gallant, well
mounted, and gay as a bird in spring, rode up to the
lofty piazza in front of Singleton Hall. He
dismounted
,
deliberately fastened his fine bay hackney
to a post, there planted for the purpose, set his dress
in order, and then knocked at the door, with an air
that spoke, as plainly as a knock could speak, that he
was confident of receiving a cordial welcome.
Having
waited some time and no one appearing, he
repeated
the knock, rather impatiently, when an old
negro man unlocked the door, opened it, and stood
in the door-way. He was dressed in a drab
frock-coat
,
of the fashion of that described in the celebrated
ballad of Old Grimes; the cuffs and collar of which
were of tarnished scarlet, as an evidence that he
belonged
to a family of distinction. There is nothing
like your negro in livery, for settling the true caste
of a family, from Maine to Georgia.
Good morning, Cato; charming morning this,
said the gentleman, as the old black stood in the
door-way.
Fine day, Massa Jenkins, replied Cato, for the
new comer was no other than the veritable Joseph
Jenkins, of cotton spinning celebrity.
Is your Mistress stirring yet, Cato?
Yes, sar. She rises with the lark, every
morning
,
sar. We study to preserve our health at
Singleton
Hall, sar.
That's right, Cato. There is no wealth like
health. The sun seldom catches me with my
nightcap
on. We were not born to sleep out our
existence
.
Now, Cato, announce my arrival to Miss
Singleton, for I must be at the factory again in a
couple of hours. Business, business, you know,
must be attended to. Eh! Cato.
Yes, sar. And you had better lose no time, sar,
for you cannot see my young mistress, sar.
Cannot see her! exclaimed Jenkins, I, her
friend, loveralmost husband! to be denied an
interview! Come, come, old ebony, you are jesting.
No joke, sar. Miss Isabel charged me to give
you your dismissal in as polite a manner as
possible
.
My dismissal! exclaimed Jenkins, starting like
a young tragedian in the ghost scene in Hamlet
My dismissal!
Yes, sar; no joke, sar, continued Cato, with
philosophic phlegm, as you will perceive by this
letter, written by Miss Singleton's own little white
hand. We do every thing according to etiquette at
Singleton Hall, sar.
Cato handed Jenkins a letter, at the same time
slightly bending his erect body, and shaking his
curly gray head, which he considered the only
legitimate
aristocratical bow, being modelled upon that
of his master, the colonel. Jenkins received the
letter, and with some agitation breaking the seal,
read as follows:
My dear Jenkins
,
Circumstances that it is impossible for me to
explain
to-day, compel me to postpone our union for
the present, and perhaps forever. If I have any
influence over you, pray suspend your visits at
Singleton
Hall, until such time as I may deem it
prudent
to recall you.
Mary Singleton
.
It is plain; plain as noon day! ejaculated
Jenkins.
Very true, sar. Nothing could be plainer,
responded Cato, bowing. There is no mistake at
Singleton Hall, sar.
Here is a pretty piece of caprice! It was but
yesterday she partook of all my joy, and nowno
matter! Let those explain woman who can; for my
part, I would sooner attempt to unravel the riddle
of the Sphynx, or find out the philosopher's stone.
It would be an easier task, sar, replied Cato.
I am now sixty, and never attempted to unravel a
woman in my life; and strange to say, the older I
grow, the less am I inclined to undertake it.
Jenkins heard nothing of the interruption of Cato,
for his mind was engrossed with reflections which
arose in too rapid succession even to give them
utterance
.
What was it had created this sudden
revolution
in his matrimonial prospects? Had family
pride, which, according to his notions, was vox et
preterea nihil, made his bank stock,
spinning-jennies
,
cotton stuff, and rail-road scrip kick the
beam? Had she taken a sudden dislike to his
person
?or
had some one made a more advantageous
offer? Had he been slandered?or had he done
any thing to offend her delicacy? Various queries
of this kind arose in the mind of Mr. Jenkins, not
one of which could he answer satisfactorily; but on
one point he was perfectly satisfied, and that was
that he had been very shabbily treated, for it occurred
to Mr. Jenkins that he had already lent more money
on Singleton Hall than he ever expected to see
again, and its inmates had for years past, in all cases
of emergency, first applied to him for advice, and
never failed to receive assistance. Such reflections,
in a moment of irritation, might have occurred to a
less matter of fact mind than that of Mr. Jenkins,
and the obligation might have been cancelled by
giving them utterance; for it is somewhere laid
down, that as soon as you advert to a favour
conferred
you deserve to be repaid with ingratitudea
cheap and common mode, by the way, of repaying
an obligationbut Mr. Jenkins did nothing of the
kind; he kept his thoughts between his teeth, walked
silently and deliberately to the post where he had
hitched his horse, mounted, and retraced his steps
at a brisk canter.
Good morning, sar, and a pleasant ride to you,
exclaimed Cato, bowing; but Mr. Jenkins returned
no answer, and Cato entered the house and closed
the door.
CHAPTER II.
Miss Mary Singleton had witnessed the foregoing
interview from the parlour window, and though she
had overheard nothing she had seen enough to
convince
her that her lover had departed in a less
pleasant
humour than he approached the house. She
arose from the breakfast table as Cato entered.
Well, Cato, has Mr. Jenkins gone?
Yes, Miss, as fast as his horse can carry him;
and a very fine horse dat too of Mr. Jenkinsgood
bit of flesh for a factory man to ride, but not to be
compared to old master's Nicodemus. Han't got
the blood no how.
I hope you acquitted yourself of your message
with all delicacy.
O, certainly, Missold Cato never loses sight of
the family dignity no how. But my politeness was
thrown away. Massa Jenkins has gone off in a
furious passion. Only see how he puts the spur
to his nag. Hard life that, to be a factory man's
hackney.
Miss Singleton looked out of the window, and
beheld her lover riding along the avenue as if he
had studied the art of horsemanship in the school of
the celebrated John Gilpin.
Poor fellow! she sighed, he loves me very
much!
Never saw a man so much in love in all my life,
responded Cato.
Ah! Why do you imagine so?
Thing's very plain, missus. Only see how he
rides. Your true lover always goes ahead as if old
Nick were driving him.
The young lady, perfectly satisfied with the
conclusion
of Cato, withdrew, while the old man
continued
watching the progress of the manufacturer,
inwardly congratulating himself upon the diplomatic
manner in which he had upheld the dignity of the
Singleton family. Indeed, since the death of his
master, he began to look upon himself as one of the
Corinthian pillars of the ancient housein fact
the only one to sustain the magnificent ruin.
Old Cato's meditations were interrupted by a
handsome
vehicle dashing along the avenue, which drove
up to the house and stopped at the door. A
handsome
young fellow dressed in a naval uniform,
alighted and rang at the bell. Cato immediately
recognised
in the new comer, Arthur Singleton, and
hastened to receive him in due form; but before
opening the door, he was heard crying out, John,
William, Thomas! but neither of these imaginary
personages making his appearance, after growling at
their negligence he opened the door, and with an air
of importance proceeded to ring a bell, which
extended
to the back buildings.
Never mind disturbing yourself, old man, said
Arthur, my servant can attend to the horses.
These fellows, sar, are always out of the way,
since the death of the colonel. But they shall all be
discharged. Useless
varment!
And you shall not
see one of them under this roof to night. He could
make that assertion with safety.
Come, come, be pacified, and don't make so much
disturbance on my account.
For whom should I make it, if not for Captain
Singleton?
So, you know me, it seems, old fellow.
Yes, sar. You are the only son of Marmaduke
Singleton, who was the brother of my old master the
colonel, peace to his remainders, who married a
Howard of Howard Park in Virginny, whose mother
was a Talbot, whose grandmother was a Calvert,
Stop, stop, Cato, why you are a living record; and
the genealogical tree, though long since reduced to
ashes is still green in your memory.
Ah! sar, these matters are too important to be
forgotten
;
and we who belong to good families should
set a proper value on our birthright, even when
there's nothing else remaining.
And are you also tinctured with family pride, old
lad?
Yes, sar, replied the old black, standing more
erect, Thank heaven, I can boast that the Catos
have been born and bred in the Singleton family for
two centuries. No low black puddle in these veins.
My great grandfather was old Cudjo, who married
Quashee, whose father was a king in Guinea. Their
eldest son was Sambo, famous in his day for playing
on the banjo. Sambo he married Phillis, then come
the first Cato
I will hear the remainder when I am more at
leisure
,
so show me into the parlour, and announce my
arrival.
Cato, with many bows, ushered the young officer
into the parlour, then returned to the piazza, and
again rang lustily at the bell; but no one appearing,
he called over the roll of imaginary servants, and
then showed the coachman the way to the stable, all
the time muttering at the want of attention on the
part of the useless
varment
.
Mary Singleton, upon whom the care of the
family had almost exclusively devolved, in
consequence
of the mental aberration of her sister,
was of a tall and stately figure, though agile as a
sylph in her movements. Her eyes and
luxuriant
hair were jet black, and her beautiful and
delicate features, had an expression of masculine
firmness, that denoted more decision of
character
than might have been expected from so fragile
and lovely a being, educated in seclusion. Still this
very seclusion may have produced the results
referred
to, as from her childhood she had been taught to
respect herself, and to believe that her family
occupied
VOL. II.16
a large space in the public eye. When opinions of
this kind have taken root, even the harshest collision
with the world proves insufficient to dissipate the
delusion
.
No one can patiently bear even a sprig to be
taken from the tree of his self-esteem. It germinates
in childhood, and too frequently in our progress
through this world, we find that it is all that the
world has left us. Well, let the world take all but
that, for it is heaven's own legacya green spot in
the desert.
Arthur had examined the pictures, with which the
room was decorated, over and over again, with the
eye of a connoisseur, not that he had a taste for the
arts, but for the lack of something to do, when his
fair cousin Mary entered; her cheeks were flushed,
and her manner somewhat embarrassed, as she said,
A thousand pardons, cousin Arthur, for having
made you wait.
Nay, cousin, I should rather ask to be excused,
as I arrive a day sooner than my letter announced.
But my impatience was natural, and now I have seen
you, I regret we had not met earlier.
This compliment only tended to increase the
embarrassment
of Miss Singleton, which doubtless will
appear very strange to my fair reader; but it should
be borne in mind that my heroine was born and
educated
in the country. Arthur, who had not the gift
of ornamental flourish in conversation, proceeded, it
must be allowed, not in the most diplomatic manner,
to explain the object of his visit.
Cousin, you are aware we are destined for each
other. Under these circumstances it is natural on
our first interview to feel some embarrassment, but
I beseech you to banish all restraint with me. Speak
frankly, and act frankly.
Miss Singleton making no reply, Arthur
continued
As for myself, I acknowledge without hesitation
that I find you even more lovely than I anticipated;
and faith coz, I expected much too, for well I
remembered
what a little sylph you were when we were
playfellows. I have thought of you many a time,
when the ocean rolled between us, and taxed my
imagination to present me with the full development
of your early promise.
And are you not disappointed, Arthur?
demanded
Mary, in a tone that denoted any thing but
satisfaction at the favourable impression she had
produced. This may appear strange, but still not
the less true.
Disappointed!I am but too happy that our
names have been joined together in the last will of
our aunt, and for myself I will undertake that there
shall be no lapse of the legacy.
You increase my embarrassment. I know not
how to answer.
Come, come, I am not that coxcomb to imagine
that my merit on a first interview could make as
favourable an impression as your's has done. But
to-morrow
To-morrow! Shall I discover all your merit in
twenty-four hours? replied Mary, archly. Really,
cousin, you must acknowledge the term is rather
short for such a labour.
Not to an apt scholar, Mary, with a good
preceptor
.
But there's a clause in the will which forbids
my giving you longer time. To-morrow we must
demand each other's answer, and I forewarn you
that you will obtain no delay; for it would be
dangerous
for me to prolong my stay near you, when
with a single word you can destroy all my hopes.
Pray be seated, and explain.
The will in question is one of the strangest acts
that can be imagined, even in an age resolved to be
astonished at nothing. Our aunt has laid down two
principles as incontestible truths; the first, that you
are the most accomplished woman on this side of the
Atlantic, and that the possessor of your hand will
be the happiest creature in christendom.
The jest pleases me. Pray go on.
On the first point I confess I am entirely of her
opinion, but as to the second
Well, wellwhy hesitate? Let us hear the
second.
Pardon my confusionshe pretends that I am
exactly such a man as you are a woman.
It appears that she had not a bad opinion of the
family, replied Mary, laughing.
O, she was a woman of discernment, coz, and
notwithstanding her modesty, out of respect to her
memory we must admit that she was right. So,
these two principles being taken for granted
It is easy to foresee the consequences.
Plain as noonday, continued Arthur. We are
absolutely formed for each otherthere is no escape
for either, and in marrying we shall make a match
of both convenience and inclination.
And have we but twenty-four hours to make up
our minds? demanded Miss Singleton.
That's all. The will is positive.
It appears, notwithstanding the perfection which
our aunt supposed us to be possessed of, that she did
not believe us capable of standing a very long
examination
.
She rather presumed an examination to be
altogether
unnecessary. But this is not all; she has
taken other means to insure our union. She leaves
all her fortune between us, in case we fulfil her
wishes, but, on the contrary, should one be refused
by the other
She leaves that one all, no doubt, as a
consolation
,
exclaimed Miss Singleton. Cousin, I have
a great mind to make you rich. What say you?
Make me rich! How?by rejecting me?
Certainly. True, you will lose the most
accomplished
woman on this side the Atlantic; but then
you will receive a handsome fortune, without the
incumbrance of a wife.
Zounds! Have a care, or you will ruin me,
exclaimed the young sailor. The better to insure
the success of her plan, she makes that one her
sole legatee who shall first refuse the other.
Ah! that alters the case. I cannot reject you
on those terms, Arthur.
And she forbids all kind of collusion, on the
penalty of the estate passing to distant relations.
They were interrupted by an exclamation at the
door:I tell you I will go in. It is useless. I will
see him again; I will. Isabel entered the
apartment
with a hurried step. Her long auburn hair
was straying in confusion, her gentle and lovely
countenance was animated and suffused with blushes,
and an unnatural wildness kindled in her deep blue
eyes. Her sylph-like form would have served as a
model for a poet when he peoples his ideal world
with all that is delicate and beautiful, and her gentle
mind might be likened to the eolean harp, that
discourses most eloquent music when wooed by the
summer breeze, but the first rude blast jars every
string and turns all the harmony to discord.
Isabel, looking around wildly, continued:I
wishedI cameI know not now why I camebut
there was something! Assist me sister. I tremble
and I blush as when you sometimes scold me. But
for all that you are very good to me, sister, very
good. Ah! hide me! I'm afraidshe concealed
her face in Mary's bosom.
Recover yourself, dear Isabel, said Mary, and
turning to Arthur, continued, You see, cousin, the
situation of this poor unfortunate.
I am distressed that my presence has caused
this apprehension, he replied, and at the sound of
his voice Isabel raised her head, but did not turn her
face towards him.
Mary, I believe he spoke to me. Did he not
speak?
He did.
O! how sweet his voice is! I remember that
voice.
My presence, I fear, offends her; I had better
retire.
Isabel turned to him, her face illuminated with
smiles, and exclaimed hurriedly
16*
O! no, no, no! Do not leave us. Stay, stay.
She paused and looked at him intentlyAh! I
have it. StayArthur.
You have not forgot my name, then?
I just this moment recollected it. Arthur!
Arthur! she repeated, and laughed. Is it not
strange I had forgotten it! When I spoke of you
to my sister, and said `
he
,' he loved me much,
he
was very good to me, she always asked me, what
he?
She could not understand me. Nevertheless it was
very clear.
He
that meant Arthur. And you have
not forgotten my name, I hope?
Dear Isabel!
Right, that is my name. I knew you would not
forget it. But years ago you used to call me your
little Bell. We were children then. Still call me
so, and I shall feel like a happy child again.
My gentle little Bell.
That's it. The same gentle tone. It has rung
in my ears since we parted. I always hear it at
night, but never in the day time. But, Arthur
you see I do not forgetI have two names now;
they have given me another since I last saw you,
and a very terrible one it is. Whenever I go to the
village, the little children follow me, and point their
fingers at me, crying `the silly girl, there goes the
silly girl.' My sister is very good to mevery
she always calls me Isabel; and you too, Arthur
you seewill you not call me Isabel?'
I will call you my little Bell, as in the days of
our childhood.
Do, O! do! and then I shall dream of the green
fields and the flowers, and shall hear the gay birds
sing again as sweetly as they sang in our childhood.
It is strange that the birds no longer sing as blithely
as they used to.
The major domo of Singleton Hall, old Cato,
now entered, and with many bows announced that
Arthur's chamber was now ready for him. That
the room assigned to him was that in which
Lafayette
had slept the night after the battle of
Brandywine
,
which would account for the furniture being
somewhat antiquated, as, for the honour of the
family
,
nothing had been changed since that memorable
epoch.
That's well, Cato, replied Arthur, a seaman
is not difficult to please. Give him but sea room
and a hammock, and he is satisfied.
Then, sar, continued Cato, there is a fine view
of the river, the green meadows, and a garden of
flowers under your window.
A fine view, and a garden of flowers! nothing
more is wanting. I love flowers.
Farewell, sister. Good-by, Arthur, exclaimed
Isabel, gaily; and was about hurrying out of the
room.
Where are you going, child?
Isabel approached her sister, and said, with a
mysterious
airI will return presently; but do not
betray
me. Say nothing to any one. It is a secret.
Good-by, Arthur. She raised her finger to Mary,
as if she would impose secrecy, and ran smiling out
of the room.
Where is she going in such haste?
I know not, replied Miss Singleton. Some
idea has struck her, but the light of reason no
sooner
breaks upon her than she becomes crazed again.
Your pardon, cousin, you are fatigued. Cato,
conduct
Lieutenant Singleton to his chamber.
She was about to retire, and Arthur handed her
to the door of the apartment. Old Cato placed his
fore-finger beside his ebony proboscis, and thus gave
vent to his cogitations:
Well, all goes right. The captain will carry the
day. I was half afraid of that cotton spinning Massa
Jenkins; but O! these women! An officer's coat,
with a handsome man in it, is a good excuse for
changing her mind.
Arthur returned, and clapping the old philosopher
on the shoulder, awakened him from his reverie, and
said,
Well, Cato, you have not shown me the La
Fayette
chamber.
Pardon me, captain. I wait on you. This way,
this way, sar; and he showed him out with all the
ceremony of the grand chamberlain of the court of
France, or any other court where flummery is in
fashion.
CHAPTER III.
Colonel Singleton had been twice married; Isabel
was the daughter of the first wife, and Mary of her
successor. There exists a vulgar prejudice against
step-mothers; and the conduct of the colonel's
helpmate
towards Isabel, did not form an exception to the
prevalent opinion. She was a haughty, selfish
woman
,
and ambitious that all the honours and wealth
of the family should descend to her own daughter, to
the exclusion of Isabel; and when she heard that
aunt Penelope purposed making her nephew Arthur,
and the colonel's eldest daughter her heirs, she
determined
that her own child's name should be
inserted
in the will, in the place of that of her sister; and
what cannot woman accomplish when she devotes all
her energies to one object.
Isabel's life became one series of annoyance; her
step-mother's dislike was manifested on all occasions,
and finally the poor girl perceived that even the
affection
of her father was in some degree alienated
from her. In order to make assurance double sure,
her step-mother proposed that she should be married
to a penurious old man, who, attracted by her beauty,
had solicited her hand, and the colonel was tempted
by the proposal, as the suitor was wealthy, which
encouraged his helpmate to press the matter
zealously
,
and at the same time enabled her to cloak her
sinister motives. Persuasion failing, force was
threatened, and the poor girl whose mind had been
enfeebled by a series of persecutions, finding herself
about to be consigned to the arms of an old man she
despised, fell into convulsions, from which she
narrowly
escaped with life; and when she was restored
to health her tears ceased to flow; her countenance
was changed; and the vacant glare of the eye
denoted
an alienated mind. About a year after this
event, death issued his summons for her step-mother;
but in the mean time aunt Penelope had made her
will, as already recited.
Early in the morning, following the arrival of
Arthur
,
Isabel was alone in the parlour, arranging a
beautiful bouquet of spring flowers. She performed
her task with an air of caution, as if she wished to
avoid being detected, and her blushing countenance
was illuminated by a smile of satisfaction. When
her task was completed, she murmured as she stood
gazing at it, I love flowersthose were his words.
This will afford him pleasure, and I shall be very
happy. Arthur entered the apartment without
perceiving
hershe ran to him and said,
Arthuryes, it is you. I knew your step.
Isabel!what, here alone!
Alone! oh, no; you are here! she replied,
placing her hand upon her heart.
My charming cousin.
And youhave you thought about poor Isabel,
since we parted last evening?
Have I thought of you? Indeed have I,
incessantly
.
I am glad of that. I have thought of you until I
dreamt that you had returned. Tell me, you have
been far distant, and have at length returned.
Yes, Isabel.
Heavens! If she should also return!
Whom do you mean?
My mother. Hark! do you not hear her, she
exclaimed wildly. She comesthat is her voice!
therethere! Ah! she threatens me. She
clasped her hands in an imploring attitude.
Mother
,
mercy, mercy, I beseech you. Do not force
me,I cannot marry him. My heart's another's.
Ah! approach me not, she continued with increased
violence. I cannot, will notdeath sooner. She
recoiled and threw herself, trembling, into the arms
of her cousin.
Dear Isabel, recover yourself.
Where am I! Who calls me, in that kind and
gentle voice! Ahis it you, Arthur, is it you!
What has happened? How I burn here, she added,
touching her forehead.
You suffer.
O, no; she replied in a voice of tenderness, and
smiling fondly on him, O, no!I have seen you
once again, and that repays me for all. But who
was it told me you had gone awayforsaken me.
It is not true, is it? You would not give me pain.
You love me too much for that, Arthur?
Indeed do I.
Take care, she continued with an air of
mystery
,
if you deceive me, I shall soon discover it.
She ran smiling to the vase of flowers, and taking
one of them, carefully stripped it of its leaves, one
by one. You remember, this is the way I tested
your love in our childhood.
They were interrupted by Mary, who now entered
the parlour, followed by old Cato, who stood erect
at the door. She spoke to him as they entered
It is well, Cato; if he returns, let me know.
Fortunately
he has gone without seeing Arthur, she
added, in a low tone.
The bustling Mr. Joseph Jenkins, early as it was,
had already been at Singleton Hall, and this time
he determined to have an interview with his
dulcinea
,
for Joseph was as systematic in his love
affairs
as he was in business, and he succeeded. The
interview was a brief one, and abruptly terminated
in the cotton spinner leaping on his hackney in a
huff, and starting off at a brisk trot, after bidding a
hasty and cold adieu to his mistress. Cato
withdrew
.
Good morning, cousin. How do you like
Singleton
Hall? said Mary.
It is a charming spot, and its inmates render it
more so. I have been conversing with Isabel. What
a strange existence. So young, so beautiful, and
for ever deprived of reason. But let us quit so
painful
a subject. I thank you Miss, for the delicate
attention you have paid me.
How! in what manner?
I yesterday by chance, spoke of my taste for
flowers, and I find the parlour decorated with them.
No, cousin, it is not to me, but doubtless to old
Cato, that you are indebted for this attention.
At all events, allow me to present you this, he
said, selecting a bouquet and presenting it to Mary.
Isabel, who watched him in silence, darted forward
and snatched the flowers from her sister, saying,
That must not be. That bouquet is for me, me
only. It was I who gathered them.
You! exclaimed Arthur.
Yes. Why should that astonish you. I heard
you say that you loved flowers, and I remember a
little flaxen headed boy who used to gather the wild
flowers in the meadows with me; he loved them
much, and he loved me also.
It was for me then. Pardon me Isabel, I will
repair the wrong. He took the bouquet and
presented
it to her; she received it with a smile, and
pressed it to her heart, saying, Now it shall never
leave me, but wither and fade there.
Truly, dear Arthur, you work miracles, said
Mary. Since your arrival she seems at times to
have some recollection.
Ah! look at her now. She has again fallen into
the reverie from which she escaped for a moment.
Isabel stood motionless, her eyes fixed on the ground.
Cato entered, and said to Miss Singleton in an
under
tone,
Massa Jenkins come back again, Missus.
Tell him, I will see him presently. She
apologised
to Arthur for abruptly leaving him, and went
out of the room with the old servant.
I am glad they are gone, said Isabel, We can
now talk together. Tell me, Arthur, what were
we speaking of when my sister interrupted us.
Help me to recall my thoughts. How terrible it is
to forget, and to know that one forgets!
Dear Isabel, do not dwell on this subject, it
injures
you much.
It has injured me; it injures me still. It was of
my step-mother we were speaking.
You have been very unhappy in my absence,
have you not?
O, yes; for I was fearful. But that is over; you
have returned, and my fears are gone. You will
defend me, will you not?
Certainly, I will protect you, and be ever near
you.
How you encourage me! My good sister also
often strove to encourage me, but she did not
succeed
so well. Your presence, your looks, the tone
of your voice inspire me with confidence. Speak,
speak, I love to hear you speak.
Dear Isabel, listen to me. Let us try to reason
together.
O yes, yes, let us reason, she exclaimed,
laughing
and rubbing her hands.
There is one thing I must premise, and that is,
if you relapse into your terrors, I shall believe that
you don't love me.
O, don't believe any such thing. I no longer
fear, and as a proof of it, I am now thinking of my
step-mother, speaking of her, and scarcely tremble.
Since that is the case, let us dwell on the
subject
,
and you shall see that it will cease to alarm
you. It is long since you beheld her?
I have not forgot that. One day she slept so
profoundly that they could not awaken her. Her
face was as pale as the vestments in which they
wrapped her, and they bore her to the church and
sung a long time around her, but she still slept.
My sister Mary wept much, and I also wept, because
she grieved. Then they clothed me all in black,
and since that time I have been very happy, except
when she comes back to threaten me.
But she will never threaten you again.
Ah! do you believe so?
I am sure of it.
If you are sure, then I am satisfied. What a
weight you have taken from my mind. I am now
tranquil; breathe freely, and it is to you that I owe
this happiness. How I love you!
Dear Isabel!
But if you should again leave me!
Be composed. I am coming, perhaps, to remain
here alwaysto marry your sister.
Marry, marry my sister! Then who will marry
me? she said dejectedly, and her mind suddenly
relapsed, as she continued, without recognising
him
You know not how constant I am. I was once
to have been married formerly, to one of my cousins
named Arthurbut this is a secret, which I have
told to no one except yourself. We were both very
young, and I loved him more than a brother, he was
so good, so gentle and generous. How happy I was
when he was near me. All the marvellous stories
and old legends of the country, were related to me
by him, and we had bright visions of the future.
But alas! one day he was forced to leave us; he
went on board his ship, and I saw him no more, but
I have always thought of himalways.
You saw him no more, Isabel? You do not
recollect
me, then? demanded Arthur in a tone of
increased
interest.
How! not recollect you, she replied with an air
of gaiety, thou art Arthur; I recollected thee
immediately
.
I have been unconsciously guilty; each word
renders
me more criminal still. Can you ever pardon
me?
VOL. II.17
Pardon thee! Ah, yes! I always forgive when
I am supplicated; it would be so cruel to refuse.
She drew nigher to him, paused and gazed fondly in
his face, as she added, To prove I haven't forgot
you, I will search for the ring you sent me from the
sea side. I have preserved it carefully, and no
person
has seen it. Wait for me here, and I will return
directly. Arthur, I love thee,do not forget that
I am your betrothed. She ran away smiling, and
kissed her hand to him as she closed the door.
Our hero was as much perplexed as most heroes
are, when they get two women into their heads at
the same time. He was amazed to discover that the
silken web, that he had unconsciously woven in his
boyhood, had been so closely intertwined with the
thread of that fair creature's life, as to serve as a
clue to lead her wandering mind even through the
mazes of her madness; and was the sole idea to
which she fondly clung in the general wreck and
ruin. He was at a loss how to act; by marrying
the one, he would disinherit the other; and by
fulfilling
the conditions of the will, he would for ever
extinguish the returning spark of reason, in the mind
of the delicate being so long and devotedly attached
to him. At length, he resolved to ascertain the true
state of Mary's fortune, and should it prove ample,
he would reject her, and enrich her sister with
his hand and aunt Penelope's legacy. Old Cato
entered
opportunely, to throw some light on the
subject
.
My mistress begs you to excuse her absence,
captain, said the old man bowing, she will be
disengaged
presently.
Stand on no ceremony with me. Fine property
this, old Cato?
Splendid estate; none better on the Delaware,
sar.
Still affords a very handsome living?
None better, sar. A fortune might be made
from this farm; but the Singletons are above selling
their produce,consume all. Then there's bank
stock, and loans, and mortgages
Enough, I am satisfied; and with this assurance
I can no longer hesitate not to marry your
mistress
.
Not marry her, sar? Pardon me, captain, you
misunderstand me, exclaimed the old servant,
somewhat disconcerted.
No, no, I understand you perfectly. Your
mistress
is at least in easy circumstances.
Better than that, sar,very rich. The greatest
fortune in these parts. The old fellow knew this
to be a lie; but felt satisfied that it ought to be true.
Mr. Joseph Jenkins happened to bustle into the
parlour at this critical moment, and overhearing
Cato's
boastful speech, exclaimed,
Rich! A great fortune! they deceive you, sir,
she is ruined, totally ruined.
Ruined, sir! exclaimed Arthur.
Will you be silent, sar! He don't know what
he says, sar, exclaimed the old man in confusion.
Examine for yourself, sir, continued Joseph
Jenkins, producing papers. Read these documents,
and you will perceive that Singleton Place belongs
to me. I am the master here.
Arthur cast his eyes over the papers and
returned
them saying, It is true. I cannot recover from
my surprise. Miss Singleton reduced to a state of
poverty.
If you longer doubt, behold the confusion of this
old domestic, continued Jenkins. That speaks
more plainly than all my words.
My poor cousin in distress! sighed Arthur, In
that case I will marry her.
How! you marry her! What the devil do you
mean? exclaimed Jenkins with increased
restlessness
.
Go and inform your mistress, Cato, that I am
ready to make her my wife this evening if she
consents
,
said Arthur. The faithful old fellow's ebony
visage, creamed and mantled like a standing pool,
and as he left the room, he was heard to ejaculate,
This now is, just like a Singleton. Gem'man all
over! Jenkins, after making a few nervous circuits
around the parlour, suddenly stopped, and said,
How! marry her this evening! Do you intend to
insult me, sir?
Insult you? I was not thinking about you at
all.
Not thinking about me! But you shall think
about me. I will be thought about in this matter,
sir; and I demand the motives of your conduct,
replied Joseph, testily.
Indeed. But I am not in the habit of answering,
when interrogated in so gentle a manner, replied
the other, coolly.
Then there may be a mode of making you speak,
said Joseph, with increased irritation.
Pray, name it.
Pistols, exclaimed the cotton spinner.
Precisely. That is a branch of my business, and
I never neglect business.
I like you the better for that, continued
Jenkins
.
I have a pair of bull dogs in the next room;
I used to practise shooting at a mark with the old
colonel. We can jump into a boat, and be on the
Jersey shore in half an hour.
That's unnecessary trouble. You are at home
here, you know, and we can just step out behind the
stable, and settle the affair quietly. We shall avoid
both delay and trouble.
Zounds! you are right again! exclaimed
Jenkins
.
Do you know that you have risen fifty per
cent. in my esteem, and if I drill a hole through you,
I shall grieve for you, and do the decent thing by
your remains.
You are very good.
I give you my word and honour, sir.
Thank you; but I shall endeavour to dispense
with your grief.
A spirited young fellow! exclaimed Jenkins. I
begin to like him. A business man. I will go for
the pistols, sir, and shall expect you behind the
stable
in five minutes.
Jenkins bustled out, and at the same instant
Isabel
rushed into the room, and threw her arms about
the neck of her cousin, who was about to follow him,
and exclaimed,
Stay, stay, you shall not go. I know your
fearful
purpose; but you shall not leave me. I'll hang
upon you.
Unfortunate! would you drive me to
dishonour
?
Would you drive me to despair?
Isabel, you will see me again in five minutes.
Yes, I shall see you again, as I saw my brother,
perhaps, brought back, pale and covered with blood.
She shrieked and fainted in his arms. We omitted
to state in the proper place, that a son of Colonel
Singleton had been killed in a duel, and that Isabel's
aberration of mind was in some degree attributed to
the shock received on the occasion. It is of
importance
to every family that one member, at least,
should be killed in a duel, as that circumstance alone
is sufficient to establish the courage and gentility of
all the survivors.
The shriek brought Miss Singleton and her major
domo into the parlour. Arthur consigned the
unconscious
Isabel to the arms of her sister, and without
saying a word, hurried from the room. Isabel
slowly recovered; the expression of her countenance
was calm, and she assumed an air of gaiety, as she
said,
Sister, if you only knew the good news I have to
tell you. She will never come back,never! Then
there's going to be a wedding; do you know the
bride? I know her. And there will be a splendid
ball. I ought to open it with him. I love dancing
so much!
The report of pistols was now heard, and Isabel
starting from her sister's arms, stood motionless for a
moment, then pressed her forehead with both hands,
and shrieked, Ah! I remember now! Death is at
17*
work! Let go your hold; I fly to save him! She
violently disengaged herself from Mary, who
attempted
to restrain her, and rushed from the room.
Her sister and the old servant alarmed and amazed,
hastily followed her.
Isabel reached the spot where the combatants
stood opposed to each other, pistols in hand, ready
to fire a second time. She rushed between them,
her hair dishevelled, wildness in her looks, and
summoning all her energy, she shrieked, Hold!
Forbear your murderous intent, I implore you, I
command you! and fell senseless to the ground.
Our worthies forgot their angry feelings, in their
amazement at this singular interruption, and
mutually
hastened to her assistance, and supported her
to the house. She was conducted to her chamber,
and the next moment the prompt and active Joseph
Jenkins was seen hurrying along the avenue, upon
his bay hackney, in pursuit of medical assistance,
without having intimated to any one his errand.
The doctor, like all prudent practitioners, could
not pronounce with certainty,he was of opinion
that the fearful impressions she had received from
the duel, would have a decisive influence over her
mind; that a crisis had arrived, that would either
bring about a complete restoration to reason, or
destroy
all hope of her recovery. This was considered
a sound, and certainly a safe opinion.
Joseph Jenkins returned to Singleton Hall, shortly
after the physician, and on entering the parlour, he
found Miss Singleton alone. She arose as he entered
and exclaimed in evident alarmGood heavens!
What is it brings you back after the scene which
has just passed? If my cousin should meet you!
Have no fear, Miss; I shall not be here long,
replied Joseph, taking a stride or two across the
room.
Ah! why speak to me so coolly. Can you
believe
Now Joseph was any thing but cool, and he hastily
interrupted her with saying,
No more of that, Miss. You have no need to
justify yourself to me. I came not here to reproach
you. If I have failed to please you, the fault is
mine, and not yours. You are handsome and lively,
your cousin is a dashing, brave and generous
young fellow, but as for me, I am rough, plain and
without address. He is entitled to the preference;
but perhaps the future may prove that with all my
abruptness, I loved you as tenderly as he does. But
I do not wish thathe turned his face to conceal
a starting tear. I hope you may always be happy.
We are now about to part, but before we separate,
we have some affairs of importance to settle together.
Your father, at his death, owed to John Jones five
thousand dollarshere are the bonds; to me ten
thousand on mortgagethis is the instrument, he
deliberately tore the papers into fragments, and
added, now those debts are settled.
What are you doing?
Nothing. I restore the property to you
unencumbered
,
for I would not have your future husband
reproach the woman whom I have loved, with her
want of fortune.
Ah! Joseph, so much generosity.
No thanks, Miss. I only ask one thing from
you. If ever you should experience any reverse,
which is very possible, then think of your old friend.
Write to me, and the next mail will bring you a
satisfactory answer. Farewell, Miss, farewell.
He bustled out of the room, and even Mary's
tender
exclamation, of Dear Joseph, listen to me, in
no measure retarded his impetus. Finding he
returned
no answer, and was already out of hearing,
she called aloud for Cato, who promptly obeyed the
summons, followed by the young lieutenant. She
turned to the old servant, and said in a low voice,
Cato, hasten after Mr. Jenkins, who has just gone,
and tell him to defer his departure for an hour. I
wish to speak to himmust speak to him. Go.
Cato left the room muttering, what de devil
signify
,
running first after one, den after toder, and
cotch no body at last. Jenkins and his poney
were now seen from the parlour windows, scudding
along the avenue, at even a brisker gait than usual.
Possibly the horse felt that his master was several
thousand dollars lighter than when he came.
The young couple, finding themselves alone, again
attempted to broach the delicate subject of the will,
each feeling the impossibility of complying with its
conditions, and yet from generosity afraid to reject
the other. After much manuvring and finesse on
both sides, without success, each came to the
conclusion
that the other wished for nothing so ardently
as to have Aunt Penelope's will carried into effect,
and heaved a sigh of regret for the sudden and
hopeless
passion. Old Cato entered at this critical
juncture
,
to inform Miss Singleton that he had
despatched
a man on horseback after Mr. Jenkins, which
timely interruption relieved them from their mutual
embarrassment.
What news have you of your mistress Isabel?
demanded Arthur.
You must see her directly, sar. She is looking
for you, and desires to speak to you.
To speak to me! Has she left her chamber?
Yes, sar. The doctor ordered that we should
obey her in every thing, and not contradict her.
Here she comes, sar.
Isabel entered the apartment. Her manner had
undergone a striking change; it was now serious,
collected, composed. She calmly said:
Sister, I have caused you much trouble; is it not
so? But I am better at presentmuch better. I
thank you for all your attentions to me, but I have
a favour to ask; retire, for I would speak with my
cousin, alone.
Cousin, I leave you, and in a little time expect
to receive your answer, said Mary, and left the
room, followed by Cato.
What can she want with me? What is passing
in her mind? That singular air! said Arthur,
mentallyIsabel, my dear Isabel.
Sir.
Why this reserve?why this coldness towards
me?
It becomes the position in which I find myself.
What do I hear! You, who seemed but
yesterday
She proceeded, with slight emotionIf my words
have not been always what they ought to be, it
would be generous on your part to forget the past,
as I shall study to forget it myself.
Unhappy that I am! he exclaimedShe no
longer recollects me, no longer loves me! This
apparent
flash of reason may be only a new feature of her
madness. My dear Isabel, in the name of heaven
listen to melook at me. I am Arthur, your cousin,
your friend,in one word, he who has chosen you for
his betrothed.
She became more deeply affected as she replied,
I recollect you perfectly, Arthur; but this word
betrothed recalls to me the object of this interview.
I was your betrothed, it is trueI have not forgotten
that; but I come to give you back your promise,
and the ring with which you sealed it. Take it
be henceforth free; marry my sister, and receive
every wish that I can form for your happiness.
Heavens! What say you, Isabel! Can you
imagine
I know all, have heard alleven at a time when
I could not comprehend its meaning. But singular
changes have taken place. It seems that until now
I have not lived. Even yesterday I spoke without
reflection; I answered without listening, or listened
without understanding; but now the cloud has
vanished, ideas crowd upon me, words rush to
explain
my thoughts, and I am no longer an object of
pity. This happiness I owe to Arthur. When near
him I am animated, exalted; but without him I feel
that I should relapse into my former state. Ah,
stay, stay always near menever leave mebe my
support, my guide, my husband. I live only in thee,
for thee, and shall be nothing without thee.
Dear Isabel, you are once more restored to me.
Do not repent of the avowal that insures my
happiness
.
Speak, will you be my wife. You cannot
refuse me?
How, refuse what I so much desire, she replied,
artlessly.
You no longer believe that I love your sister?
O, no, no. I rely on you. You would not
deceive
me; it would render me so unhappy.
But reflect. I am poor, without resources.
Poor! I scarcely know what that means.
I cannot surround you with luxuries.
I shall not love you the lessand ask no other
luxury.
No dressno equipage.
Shall I appear less attractive in your eyes? If
not, I care not.
I can no longer resist, he exclaimed, and
falling
on his knees, passionately kissed her hand. Mary
entered at the same instant.
Ah! cousin, you refuse me then. I came for
your answer, but you have anticipated a reply to all
my questions.
No, coz, I don't refuse you, said Arthur,
rising. I love you very much, but will marry
Isabel. I don't want to ruin youkeep the fortune.
You will marry her, coz? Then I will have
nothing to do with this legacy, which constrains us
both, and thank you for having laid it at the feet of
my sister.
This generosity
Is mixed up with a little selfishness, Arthur, as
you will see in the end, replied Mary.
There was a noise at the door, and Joseph Jenkins
bustled in, followed by Cato. He entered just as
Arthur was in the act of gallantly kissing Mary's
hand, in gratitude for her generosity.
Death and the devil! exclaimed Josephand
was it for this that you brought me back?
Dear Joseph, be a witnesssaid Mary.
Damn it, I have seen too much already,
exclaimed
Jenkins.
Arthur commencedMr. Jenkins, I wish you to
understand
I don't want to understand any thing more.
Isabel ran to him, and placed her sister's hand in
his, saying, There, understand that. She is yours
Arthur is mine. Will you kill him now?
Ha! What! How! Bless my soul! Mary, is it
so? ejaculated Jenkins. Mary smiled and blushed
in a manner plain to be understood by the dullest
physiognomist, and the cotton-spinner whirled about
like one of his jennies.
All very strange! Don't understand! muttered
Cato. Captain, will you marry
Love has restored her to reason.
More strange still. You told me love usually
turns young ladies' heads. Can't understand, no
how I can fix him.
Arthur and Jenkins became fast friends, and the
fallen family was once again restored to its former
consequence, through the exertions of the worthy
and unpretending Joseph Jenkins. He called his
eldest son Reginald, after his old friend, the colonel;
but he protested against christening his daughter
after Aunt Penelope, as he could not forget the
annoyance
that her absurd legacy had occasioned.
THE END.My dear Jenkins
,
Circumstances that it is impossible for me to
explain
to-day, compel me to postpone our union for
the present, and perhaps forever. If I have any
influence over you, pray suspend your visits at
Singleton
Hall, until such time as I may deem it
prudent
to recall you.
Mary Singleton
.